CHAPTER I.
Forthwith a guard at every gun
Was placed along the wall;
The beacon blazed upon the roof
Of Edgecombe's lofty hall;
And many a fishing bark put out,
To pry along the coast;
And with loose rein, and bloody spur
Rode inland many a post.
The Spanish Armada
.
Macauley
.
The
building of the houses, and of the schooner, was
occupation for everybody, for a long time. The first were
completed in season to escape the rains; but the last was
on the stocks fully six months after her keel had been laid.
The fine weather had returned, even, and she was not yet
launched. So long a period had intervened since Waally's
visit to Rancocus Island without bringing any results, that
the council began to hope the Indians had given up their
enterprises, from the consciousness of not having the
means to carry them out; and almost every one ceased to
apprehend danger from that quarter. In a word, so
smoothly did the current of life flow, on the Reef and at
Vulcan's Peak, that there was probably more danger of
their inhabitants falling into the common and fatal error
of men in prosperity, than of anything else; or, of their
beginning to fancy that they deserved all the blessings that
were conferred on them, and forgetting the hand that
bestowed
them. As is to recall them to a better sense of
things, events now occurred which it is our business to
relate, and which aroused the whole colony from the sort
of pleasing trance into which they had fallen, by the united
influence of security, abundance, and a most seductive
climate.
As time rolled on, in the first place, the number of the
colony had begun to augment by natural means. Friend
Martha had presented Friend Robert with a little Robert;
and Bridget made Mark the happy parent of a very
charming
girl. This last event occurred about the
commencement
of the summer, and just a twelvemonth after the
happy reunion of the young couple. According to Mark's
prophecy, Jones had succeeded with Joan, and they were
married even before the expiration of the six months
mentioned
.
On the subject of a marriage ceremony there was
no difficulty, Robert and Martha holding a Friends'
meeting
especially to quiet the scruples of the bride, though
she was assured the form could do no good, since the
bridegroom did not belong to meeting. The governor read
the church service on the occasion, too, which did no
harm, if it did no good. About this time, poor Peters,
envying the happiness of all around him, and still pining
for his Petrina, or Peggy, as he called her himself, begged
of the governor the use of the Dido, in order that he might
make a voyage to Waally's group in quest of his lost
companion
.
Mark knew how to feel for one in the poor
fellow's
situation, and he could not think of letting him go
alone on an expedition of so much peril. After
deliberating
on the matter, he determined to visit Rancocus Island
himself  not having been in that direction, now, for
monthsand to go in the Neshamony, in order to take a
couple of hogs over; it having long been decided to
commence
breeding that valuable animal, in the wild state, on
the hills of that uninhabited land.
The intelligence that a voyage was to be made to
Rancocus
Island seemed to infuse new life into the men of the
colony, every one of whom wished to be of the party. The
governor had no objection to indulging as many as it might
be prudent to permit to go; but he saw the necessity of
putting some restraint on the movement. After canvassing
the matter in the council, it was determined that, in
addition
to Mark and Peters, who went of course, the party
1 *
should consist of Bob, Bigelow, and Socrates. The
carpenter
was taken to look for trees that might serve to make
the ways of the schooner, which had yet to be launched;
and the latter was thought necessary in his capacity of a
cook. As for Betts, he went along as the governor's
counsellor
and companion.
Bridget's little girl was born in the cabin of the ship;
and the week preceding that set for the voyage, she and
the child were taken across to the Peak, that the former
might spend the period of ner husband's absence with
Anne, in the Garden of Eden. These absences and
occasional
visits gave a zest to lives that might otherwise have
become too monotonous, and were rather encouraged than
avoided. It was, perhaps, a little strange that Bridget
rather preferred the Reef than the Peak for a permanent
residence; but there was her much-beloved ship, and there
she ever had her still more beloved husband for a
companion
.
On the appointed day, the Neshamony set sail, having
on board a family of three of the swine. The plan for the
excursion included a trip to the volcano, which had not
yet been actually visited by any of the colonists. Mark
had been within a league of it, and Bob had passed quite
near to it in his voyage to the Peak; but no one had ever
positively landed, or made any of those close examinations
of the place, which, besides being of interest in a general
way, was doubly so to those who were such near
neighbours
to a place of the kind. This visit Mark now
decided
to make on his way to leeward, taking the volcano
in his course to Rancocus Island. The
dtour
would lead
the Neshamony some fifteen or eighteen leagues on one
side; but there was abundance of time, and the volcano
ought to be no longer neglected.
The wind did not blow as fresh as in common, and the
Neshamony did not draw near to the volcano until late in
the afternoon of the day she sailed. The party approached
this place with due caution, and not without a good deal
of awe. As the lead was used, it was found that the water
shoaled gradually for several leagues, becoming less and
less deep as the boat drew near to the cone, which was
itself a circular and very regular mountain, of some six or
eight hundred feet in height, with a foundation of dry rock
and lava, that might have contained a thousand acres.
Everything seemed solid and permanent; and our mariners
were of opinion there was very little danger of this
formation
ever disappearing below the surface of the sea again.
The volcano being in activity, some care was necessary
in landing. Mark took the Neshamony to windward, and
found a curvature in the rocks where it was possible to get
ashore without having the boat knocked to pieces. He
and Bob then went as near the cone as the falling stones
would allow, and took as good a survey of the place as
could be done under the circumstances. That there would
be soil, and plenty of it, sooner or later, was plain enough;
and that the island might become a scene of fertility and
loveliness, in the course of ages, like so many others of
volcanic origin in that quarter of the world, was probable.
But that day was distant; and Mark was soon satisfied
that the great use of the spot was its being a vent to what
would otherwise be the pent and dangerous forces that
were in the course of a constant accumulation beneath.
The party had been about an hour on the island, and
was about to quit it, when a most startling discovery was
made. Bob saw a canoe drawn close in among the rocks
to leeward, and, on a further examination, a man was seen
near it. At first, this was taken as an indication of
hostilities
,
but, on getting a second look, our mariners were
satisfied that nothing of that sort was to be seriously
apprehended
.
It was determined to go nearer to the stranger,
at once, and learn the whole truth.
A cry from Peters, followed by his immediately
springing
forward to meet a second person, who had left the
canoe, and who was bounding like a young antelope to
meet him, rendered everything clear sooner even than had
been anticipated. All supposed that this eager visiter was
a woman, and no one doubted that it was Peggy, the poor
fellow's Indian wife. Peggy it proved to be; and after the
weeping, and laughing, and caressing of the meeting were
a little abated, the following explanation was made by
Peters, who spoke the language of his wife with a good
leal of facility, and who acted as interpreter.
According to the accounts now given by Peggy, the
warfare between Ooroony and Waally had been kept up
with renewed vigour, subsequently to the escape of Jones
and her own husband. Fortune had proved fickle, as so
often happens, and Waally got to be in the ascendant. His
enemy was reduced to great straits, and had been
compelled
to confine himself to one of the smallest islands of
the group, where he was barely able to maintain his party,
by means of the most vigilant watchfulness. This left
Waally at liberty to pursue his intention of following the
party of whites, which was known to have gone to the
southward
,
with so much valuable property, as well as to extend
his conquests, by taking possession of the mountain visited
by him the year previously. A grand expedition was
accordingly
planned, and a hundred canoes had actually
sailed from the group, with more than a thousand warriors
on board, bent on achieving a great exploit. In this
expedition
,
Unus, the brother of Peggy, had been compelled to
join, being a warrior of some note, and the sister had come
along, in common with some fifty other women; the rank
of Unus and Peggy not being sufficient to attract attention
to their proceedings. Waally had postponed this, which he
intended for the great enterprise of a very turbulent life, to
the most favourable season of the year. There was a
period of a few weeks every summer, when the trades
blew much less violently than was usually the case, and
when, indeed, it was no unusual thing to have shifts of
wind, as well as light breezes. All this the Indians
perfectly
well understood, for they were bold navigators, when
the sizes and qualities of their vessels were considered.
As it appeared, the voyage from the group to Rancocus
Island, a distance of fully a hundred leagues, was effected
without any accident, and the whole of that formidable
force was safely landed at the very spot where Betts had
encamped on his arrival out with the colonists. Nearly a
month had been passed in exploring the mountain, the first
considerable eminence most of the Indians had ever beheld;
and in making their preparations for further proceedings.
During that time, hundreds had seen Vulcan's Peak, as
well as the smoke of the volcano, though the reef, with all
its islands, lay too low to be discerned from such a
distance
.
The Peak was now the great object to be attained,
for there it was universally believed that Betto (meaning
Betts) and his companions had concealed themselves and
their much-coveted treasures. Rancocus Island was well
enough, and Waally made all his plans for colonizing it at
once, but the other, and distant mountain, no doubt was
the most desirable territory to possess, or white men would
not have brought their women so far in order to occupy it.
As a matter of course, Unus and Peggy learned the
nature of the intended proceedings. The last might have
been content to wait for the slower movements of the
expedition
,
had she not ascertained that threats of severely
punishing the two deserters, one of whom was her own
husband, had been heard to fall from the lips of the dread
Waally himself. No sooner, therefore, did this faithful
Indian
girl become mistress of the intended plan, than she
gave her brother no peace until he consented to put off
into the ocean with her, in a canoe she had brought from
home, and which was her own property. Had not Unus
been disaffected to his new chief, this might not so easily
have been done, but the young Indian was deadly hostile
to Waally, and was a secret friend of Ooroony; a state
of feeling which disposed him to desert the former, at the
first good opportunity.
The two adventurers put off from Rancocus Island just
at dark, and paddled in the direction that they believed
would carry them to the Peak. It will be remembered
that the last could not be seen from the ocean, until about
half the passage between the islands was made, though it
was plainly apparent from the heights of Rancocus, as
already
mentioned. Next morning, when day returned, the
smoke of the volcano was in sight, but no Peak. There
is little question that the canoe had been set too much to
the southward, and was diagonally receding from its
desired
point of debarkation, instead of approaching it.
Towards
the smoke, Unus and his sister continued to paddle,
and, after thirty-six hours of nearly unremitted labour, they
succeeded in landing at the volcano, ignorant of its
nature
,
awe-struck and trembling, but compelled to seek a
refuge there, as the land-bird rests its tired wing on the
ship's spars, when driven from the coast by the unexpected
gale. When discovered, Peggy and her brother were
about to take a fresh start from their resting-place, the
Peak being visible from the volcano.
Mark questioned these two friends concerning the
contemplated
movement of Waally, with great minuteness,
Unsus was intelligent for a savage, and appeared to
understand
himself perfectly. He was of opinion that his
countrymen
would endeavour to cross, the first calm day, or the
first day when the breeze should be light; and that was just
the time when our colonists did not desire to meet the
savages out at sea. He described the party as formidable
by numbers and resolution, though possessing few arms
besides those of savages. There were half a dozen old
muskets in the canoes, with a small supply of ammunition;
but, since the desertion of Jones and Peters, no one
remained
who knew how to turn these weapons to much
account. Nevertheless, the natives were so numerous,
possessed so many weapons that were formidable in their
own modes of fighting, and were so bent on success, that
Unus did not hesitate to give it as his opinion, the
colonists
would act wisely in standing off for some other
island
,
if they knew where another lay, even at the cost of
abandoning most of their effects.
But, our governor had no idea of following any such
advice. He was fully aware of the strength of his position
on the Peak, and felt no disposition to abandon it. His
great apprehension was for the Reef, where his territories
were much more assailable. It was not easy to see how
the crater, and ship, and the schooner on the stocks, and
all the other property that, in the shape of hogs, poultry,
&c., was scattered far and wide in that group, could be
protected against a hundred canoes, by any force at his
command. Even with the addition of Unus, who took
service at once, with all his heart, among his new friends,
Mark could muster but eight men; viz., himself, Heaton,
Betts, Bigelow, Socrates, Peters, Jones and Unus. To
these might possibly be added two or three of the women,
who might be serviceable in carrying ammunition, and as
sentinels, while the remainder would be required to look
after the children, to care for the stock, &c. All these
facts passed through Mark's mind, as Peters translated the
communication of Unus, sentence by sentence.
It was indispensable to come to some speedy decision.
Peters was now happy and contented with his nice little
Peggy, and there was no longer any necessity for pursuing
the voyage on his account. As for the project of placing
the hogs on Rancocus, this was certainly not the time to do
it, even if it were now to be done at all; we say `now,'
since the visits of the savages would make any species of
property on that island, from this time henceforth, very
insecure
.
It was therefore determined to abandon the voyage,
and to shape their course back to the Peak, with as little
delay as possible. As there were indications of shell-fish,
sea-weed, &c., being thrown ashore at the Volcano, two
of the hogs were put ashore there to seek their fortunes.
According to the new plan, the Neshamony made sail on
her return passage, about an hour before the sun set. As
was usual in that strait, the trades blew pretty fresh, and
the boat, although it had the canoe of Unus in tow, came
under the frowning cliffs some time before the day
reappeared
.
By the time the sun rose, the Neshamony was off
the cove, into which she hastened with the least possible
delay. It was the governor's apprehension that his sails
might be seen from the canoes of Waally, long before the
canoes could be seen from his boat, and he was glad to get
within the cover of his little haven. Once there, the
different
crafts were quite concealed from the view of
persons
outside, and it now remained to be proved whether
their cover was not so complete as effectually to baffle a
hostile attempt to find it.
The quick and unexpected return of the Neshamony
produced a great deal of surprise on the Plain. She had
not been seen to enter the cove, and the first intimation
any one in the settlement had of such an occurrence, was
the appearance of Mark before the door of the dwelling.
Bigelow was immediately sent to the Peak with a glass, to
look out for canoes, while Heaton was called in from the
woods by means of a conch. In twenty minutes the council
was regulary in session, while the men began to collect
and to look to their arms. Peters and Jones were ordered
to go down to the magazine, procure cartridges, and then
proceed to the batteries and load the carronades. In a
word, orders were given to make all the arrangements
necessary
for the occasion.
It was not long ere a report came down from Bigelow.
It was brought by his Spanish wife, who had accompanied
her husband to the Peak, and who came running in, half
breathless, to say that the ocean was covered with canoes
and catamarans; a fleet of which was paddling directly for
the island, being already within three leagues of it.
Although this intelligence was expected, it certainly caused
long faces and a deep gloom to pervade that little
community
.
Mark's fears were always for the Reef, where
there happened to be no one just at that moment but the
black women, who were altogether insufficient to defend
it, under the most favourable circumstances, but who were
now without a head. There was the hope, however, of the
Indians not seeing those low islands, which they certainly
could not do as long as they remained in their canoes. On
the other hand, there was the danger that some one might
cross from the Reef in one of the boats, a thing that was
done as often as once a week, in which case a chase might
ensue, and the canoes be led directly towards the spot that
it was so desirable to conceal. Juno could sail a boat as
well as any man among them, and, as is usually the case,
that which she knew she could do so well, she was fond of
doing; and she had not now been across for nearly a week.
The cow kept at the crater gave a large mess of milk, and
the butter produced by her means was delicious when eaten
fresh, but did not keep quite as well in so warm a climate
as it might have done in one that was colder, and Dido was
ever anxious to send it to Miss Bridget, as she still called
her mistress, by every available opportunity. The boat used
by the negresses on such occasions, was the Dido, a
perfectly
safe craft in moderate weather, but she was just the
dullest
sailer of all those owned by the colony. This created
the additional danger of a capture, in the event of a chase.
Taking all things into consideration therefore, Mark
adjourned
the council to the Peak, a feverish desire to look
out upon the sea, causing him to be too uneasy where he
was, to remain there in consultation with any comfort to
himself. To the Peak, then, everybody repaired, with the
exception of Bigelow, Peters, and Jones, who were now
regularly stationed at the carronades to watch the entrance
of the cove. In saying everybody, we include not only
all the women, but even their children.
So long as the colonists remained on the plain, there was
not the smallest danger of any one of them being seen from
the surrounding ocean. This the woods, and their great
elevation, prevented. Nor was there much danger of the
party in the batteries being seen, though so much lower,
and necessarily on the side of the cliff, since a strict order
had been given to keep out of sight, among the trees, where
they could see everything that was going on, without being
seen themselves. But on the naked Peak it was different.
High as it was, a man might be seen from the ocean, if
moving about, and the observer was tolerably near by.
Bob had seen Mark, when his attention was drawn to the
spot by the report of the latter's fowling-piece; and the
governor had often seen Bridget, on the look-out for him,
as he left the island, though her fluttering dress probably
made her a more conspicuous object than most persons
would have been. From all this, then, the importance of
directing the movements of the party that followed him
became apparent to Mark, who took his measures
accordingly
.
By the time the governor reached the Peak, having
ascended it on its eastern side, so as to keep his person
concealed, the hostile fleet was plainly to be seen with the
naked eye. It came on in a tolerably accurate line, or
lines, abreast; being three deep, one distant from the other
about a cable's length. It steered directly for the centre
of the island, whereas the cove was much nearer to its
northern than to its southern end; and the course showed
that the canoes were coming on at random, having nothing
in view but the island.
But Mark's eyes were turned with the greatest interest
to the northward, or in the direction of the Reef. As they
came up the ascent, Bridget had communicated to him the
fact that she expected Juno over that day, and that it was
understood she would come quite alone. Bridget was
much opposed to the girl's taking this risk; but Juno had
now done it so often successfully, that nothing short of a
positive command to the contrary would be likely to stop
Vol. II.  2
her. This command, most unfortunately, as Mark now felt,
had not been given; and great was his concern when Betts
declared that he saw a white speck to the northward, which
looked like a sail. The glass was soon levelled in that
direction, and no doubt any longer remained on the
subject
.
It was the Dido, steering across from the Reef,
distant
then about ten miles; and she might be expected to
arrive in about two hours! In other words, judging by the
progress of the canoes, there might be a difference of
merely half an hour or so between the time of the arrival
of the boat and that of the canoes.
This was a very serious matter; and never before had the
council a question before it which gave its members so much
concern, or which so urgently called for action, as this of
the course that was now to be taken to avert a danger so
imminent. Not only was Juno's safety involved; but the
discovery of the cove and the reef, one or both, was very
likely to be involved in the issue, and the existence of the
whole colony placed in extreme jeopardy. As the canoes
were still more than a league from the island, Bob thought
there was time to go out with the Bridget, and meet the
Dido, when both boats could ply to windward until it was
dark; after which, they might go into the reef, or come
into the cove, as circumstances permitted. The governor
was about to acquiesce in this suggestion, little as he liked
it, when a new proposition was made, that at first seemed
so strange that no one believed it could be put in
execution
,
but to which all assented in the end.
Among the party on the Peak were Unus and Peggy.
The latter understood a good deal of English, and that
which she did not comprehend, in the course of the
discussions
on this interesting occasion, Bob, who had picked
up something of the language of her group, explained to
her, as well as he could. After a time, the girl ran down
to the battery and brought up her husband, through whom
the proposal was made that, at first, excited so much
wonder
.
Peggy had told Unus what was going on, and had
pointed out to him the boat of Juno, now sensibly drawing
nearer to the island, and Unus volunteered to
swim
out
and meet the girl, so as to give her timely warning, as
well as instructions how to proceed!
Although Mark, and Heaton, and Bridget, and all
present
indeed, were fully aware that the natives of the South
Seas could, and often did pass hours in the water, this
proposal
struck them all, at first, as so wild, that no one
believed
it could be accepted. Reflection, however, did its
usual office, and wrought a change in these opinions. Peters
assured the governor that he had often known Unus to
swim from island to island in the group, and that on the
score of danger to him, there was not the least necessity
of feeling any uneasiness. He did not question the
Indian's
power to swim the entire distance to the Reef,
should it be necessary.
Another difficulty arose, however, when the first was
overcome. Unus could speak no English, and how was he
to communicate with Juno, even after he had entered her
boat? The girl, moreover, was both resolute and strong,
as her present expedition sufficiently proved, and would be
very apt to knock a nearly naked savage on the head, when
she saw him attempting to enter her boat. From this
last opinion, however, Bridget dissented. Juno was
kind-hearted
,
and would be more disposed, she thought, to pick
up a man found in the water at sea, than to injure him.
But Juno could read writing. Bridget herself had taught
her slaves to read and write, and Juno in particular was a
sort of `expert,' in her way. She wrote and read half the
nigger-letters of Bristol, previously to quitting America.
She would now write a short note, which would put the
girl on her guard, and give her confidence in Unus. Juno
knew the whole history of Peters and Peggy, having taken
great interest in the fate of the latter. To own the truth,
the girl had manifested a very creditable degree of
principle
on the subject, for Jones had tried to persuade his
friend to take Juno, a nice, tidy, light-coloured black, to
wife, and to forget Peggy, when Juno repelled the attempt
with spirit and principle. It is due to Peters, moreover,
to add that he was always true to his island bride. But the
occurrence had made Juno acquainted with the whole
history
of Peggy; and Bridget, in the few lines she now wrote
to the girl, took care to tell her that the Indian was the
brother of Peggy. In that capacity, he would be almost
certain of a friendly reception. The rest of the note was
merely an outline of their situation, with an injunction to
let Unis direct the movements.
No sooner was this important note written, than Unus
hastened down to the cove. He was accompanied by
Mark, Peters and Peggy; the former to give his
instructions
,
and the two latter to act as interpreters. Nor was
the sister without feeling for the brother on the occasion.
She certainly did not regard his enterprise as it would have
been looked upon by a civilized woman, but she manifested
a proper degree of interest in its success. Her parting
words to her brother, were advice to keep well to
windward
,
in order that, as he got near the boat, he might float
down upon it with the greater facility, aided by the waves.
The young Indian was soon ready. The note was
secured
in his hair, and moving gently in the water, he swam
out of the cove with the ease, if not with the rapidity of a
fish. Peggy clapped her hands and laughed, and
otherwise
manifested a sort of childish delight, as if pleased
that one of her race should so early make himself useful
to the countrymen of her husband. She and Peters
repaired
to the battery, which was the proper station of the
man, while Mark went nimbly up the Stairs, on his way to
the Peak. And here we might put in a passing word on
the subject of these ascents and descents. The governor
had now been accustomed to them more than a twelvemonth,
and he found that the effect they produced on the muscles
of his lower limbs was absolutely surprising. He could
now ascend the Stairs in half the time he had taken on
his first trials, and he could carry burthens up and down
them, that at first he would not have dreamed of
attempting
even to take on his shoulders. The same was true
with all the colonists, male and female, who began to run
about the cliffs like so many goats
chamois
would be more
poetical  and who made as light of the Stairs as the
governor
himself.
When Mark reached the Peak again, he found matters
drawing near to a crisis. The canoes were within a league
of the island, coming on steadily in line, and paddling with
measured sweeps of their paddles. As yet, the sail of
Juno's boat had escaped them. This was doubtless owing
to their lowness in the water, and the distance that still
separated them. The Dido was about five miles from the
northern end of the island, while the fleet was some five
more to the southward of it. This placed the two almost
ten miles apart; though each seemed so near, seen from
the elevation of the Peak, that one might have fancied
that he could throw a shot into either.
Unus was the great point of interest for the moment.
He was just coming out clear of the island, and might be
seen with the naked eye, in that pure atmosphere, a dark
speck floating on the undulating surface of the ocean. By
the aid of the glass, there was no difficulty in watching his
smallest movement. With a steady and sinewy stroke of
his arms, the young savage pursued his way, keeping to
windward, as instructed by his sister, and making a
progress
in the midst of those rolling billows that was really
wonderful. The wind was not very fresh, nor were the
seas high; but the restless ocean, even in its slumbers,
exhibits the repose of a giant, whose gentlest heavings are
formidable and to be looked to. In one particular, our
colonists were favoured. Owing to some accidental
circumstances
of position, a current set round the northern
end of the island, and diffused itself on its western side
by expanding towards the south. This carried the canoes
from the boat and the cove, and insomuch increased Juno's
chance of escape.
The meeting between Unus and the boat took place
when the latter was within a league of the land. As the
sailing directions were for every craft to fall in with the
island rather to windward of the Peak, on account of the
very current just mentioned, it was questionable with Mark
and Betts whether any in the canoes could now perceive
the boat, on account of the intervening heights. It was
pretty certain no one, as yet, had made this important
discovery
,
for the impetuosity of savages would instantly
have let the fact be known through their shouts and their
eagerness to chase. On the contrary, all remained
tranquil
in the fleet, which continued to approach the land
with a steady but regulated movement, that looked as if a
secret awe pervaded the savages as they drew nearer and
nearer to that unknown and mysterious world. To them
the approaching revelations were doubtless of vast import;
2 *
and the stoutest heart among them must have entertained
some such sensations as were impressed on the spirits of
Columbus and his companions, when they drew near to
the shores of Guanahani.
In the mean time, Juno came confidingly on, shaping
her course rather more to windward than usual even, on
account of the lightness of the breeze. This effectually
prevented her seeing or being seen from the canoes; the
parties diagonally drawing nearer, in utter ignorance of
each other's existence. As for Unus, he manuvred quite
skilfully. After getting a couple of miles off the land, he
swam directly to windward; and it was well he did, the
course of the boat barely permitting his getting well on her
weather-bow, when it was time to think of boarding.
Unus displayed great judgment in this critical part of
the affair. So accurately did he measure distances, that
he got alongside of the Dido, with his hand on her weather
gunwale, without Juno's having the least idea that he was
anywhere near her. At one effort he was in the boat; and
while the girl was still uttering her scream of alarm, he
stood holding out the note, pronouncing the word Missus
as well as he could. The girl had acquired too much
knowledge of the habits of the South Sea islanders, while
passing through and sojourning in the different groups she
had visited, to be overwhelmed with the occurrence. What
is more, she recognised the young Indian at a glance;
some passages of gallantry having actually taken place
between
them during the two months Heaton and his party
remained among Ooroony's people. To be frank with the
reader, the first impression of Juno was, that the note thus
tendered to her was a love-letter, though its contents
instantly
undeceived her. The exclamation and changed
manner of the girl told Unus that all was right; and he
went quietly to work to take in the sail, as the most effectual
method of concealing the presence of the boat from the
thousand hostile and searching eyes in the canoes. The
moment Mark saw the canvas come in, he cried out `all
is well,' and descended swiftly from the Peak, to hasten
to a point where he could give the necessary attentions to
the movements of Waally and his fleet.
CHAPTER II.
Ho! strike the flag-staff deep, Sir Knight,
Ho! scatter flowers, fair maids,
Ho! gunners fire a loud salute
Ho! gallants, draw your blades;
Macaulay
.
So much time had passed in the execution of the plan
of Unus, that the canoes were close under the cliffs, when
the governor and his party reached the wood that fringed
their summits, directly over the northern end of their line.
Even this extremity of their formation was a mile or two
to leeward of the cove, and all the craft, catamarans
included
,
were drifting still further south, under the influence
of the current. So long as this state of things continued,
there was nothing for the colonists to apprehend, since they
knew landing at any other spot than the cove was out of
the question. The strictest orders had been given for
every one to keep concealed, a task that was by no means
difficult, the whole plain being environed with woods, and
its elevation more than a thousand feet above the sea. In
short, nothing but a wanton exposure of the person, could
render it possible for one on the water to get a glimpse of
another on the heights above him.
The fleet of Waally presented an imposing sight. Not
only were his canoes large, and well filled with men, but
they were garnished with the usual embellishments of
savage magnificence. Feathers and flags, and symbols of
war and power, were waving and floating over the prows
of most of them, while the warriors they contained were
gay in their trappings. It was apparent, however, to the
members of the council, who watched every movement of
the fleet with the utmost vigilance, that their foes were
oppressed with doubts concerning the character of the
place they had ventured so far to visit. The smoke of the
Volcano was visible to them, beyond a doubt, and here
was a wall of rock interposed between them and the
accomplishment
of their desire to land. In this last respect,
Rancocus Island offered a shore very different from that
of Vulcan's Peak. The first, in addition to the long, low
point so often mentioned, had everywhere a beach of some
sort or other; while, on the last, the waves of the Pacific
rose and fell as against a precipice, marking their power
merely by a slight discoloration of the iron-bound coast.
Those superstitious and ignorant beings naturally would
connect all these unusual circumstances with some
supernatural
agencies; and Heaton early gave it as his opinion
that Waally, of whom he had some personal knowledge,
was hesitating, and doubtful of the course he ought to
pursue, on account of this feeling of superstition. When
this opinion was expressed, the governor suggested the
expediency
of firing one of the carronades, under the
supposition
that the roar of the gun, and most especially the
echo, of which there was one in particular that was truly
terrific, might have the effect to frighten away the whole
party. Heaton was in doubt about the result, for Waally
and his people knew something of artillery, though of
echoes they could not know anything at all. Nothing like
an echo, or indeed a hill, was to be found in the low
coral islands of their group, and the physical agents of
producing such sounds were absolutely wanting among
them. It might be that something like an echo had been
heard at Rancocus Island, but it must have been of a very
different calibre from that which Heaton and Mark were
in the habit of making for the amusement of the females,
by firing their fowling-pieces down the Stairs. As yet
neither of the guns had been fired from the proper point,
which was the outer battery, or that on the shelf of rock,
though a very formidable roaring had been made by the
report of the gun formerly fired, as an experiment to
ascertain
how far it would command the entrance of the cove.
After a good deal of discussion, it was decided to try the
experiment, and Betts, who knew all about the means
necessary
to produce the greatest reverberations, was
despatched
to the shelf-battery with instructions to scale its
gun, by pointing it along the cliff and making all the
uproar he could.
This plan was carried out just as Waally had
assembled
his chiefs around his own canoe, whither he had called
them by an order, to consult on the manner in which the
entire coast of the island ought to be examined, that a
landing might be effected. The report of the gun came
quite unexpectedly to all parties; the echo, which rolled
along the cliffs for miles, being absolutely terrific! Owing
to the woods and intervening rocks, the natives could see
no smoke, which added to their surprise, and was
doubtless
one reason they did not, at first, comprehend the long,
cracking, thundering sounds that, as it might be, rolled
out towards them from the island. A cry arose that the
strange rocks were speaking, and that the Gods of the
place were angry. This was followed by a general and
confused flight;  the canoes, paddling away as if their
people were apprehensive of being buried beneath the
tumbling rocks. For half an hour nothing was seen but
frantic efforts to escape, nothing heard but the dip of the
paddle and the wash of its rise.
Thus far the plan of the governor had succeeded even
beyond his expectations. Could he get rid of these savages
without bloodshed, it would afford him sincere delight, it
being repugnant to all his feelings to sweep away rows of
such ignorant men before the murderous fire of his cannon.
While he and Heaton were congratulating each other on
the encouraging appearances, a messenger came down from
the Peak, where Bridget remained on the look-out, to
report
that the boat had drifted in, and was getting close
under the cliffs, on the northern end of the island, which
was in fact coming close under the Peak itself. A signal
to push for the cove had been named to Juno, and Bridget
desired to know whether it ought to be made, else the boat
would shortly be too near in, to see it. The governor
thought the moment favourable, for the canoes were still
paddling in a body away from the spot whence the roar
had proceeded, and their course carried them to the
southward
and westward, while Unus would approach from the
northward and eastward. Word was sent, accordingly, to
make the signal.
Bridget no sooner received this order than she showed
the flag, which was almost immediately answered by
setting the boat's sail. Unus now evidently took the
direction
of matters on board the Dido. It is probable he
appreciated
the effect of the gun and its echo, the first of
which he fully comprehended, though the last was as great
and as awful a mystery to him, as to any one of his
countrymen
.
Nevertheless, he imputed the strange and fearful
roar of the cliffs to some control of the whites over the
power of the hills, and regarded it as a friendly roar, even
while he trembled. Not so would it be with his
countrymen
,
did he well know; they would retire before it; and
the signal being given at that instant, the young Indian
had no hesitation about the course he ought to take.
Unus understood sailing a boat perfectly well. On
setting
his sail, he stood on in the Dido until he was obliged
to bear up on account of the cliffs. This brought him so
close to the rocks as greatly to diminish the chances of
being seen. There both wind and current aided his
progress
;
the first drawing round the end of the island, the
coast of which it followed in a sort of eddy, for some time,
and the latter setting down towards the cove, which was
less than two miles from the north bluff. In twenty
minutes
after he had made sail, Unus was entering the secret
little harbour, Waally and his fleet being quite out of sight
from one as low as the surface of the ocean, still paddling
away to the south-west, as hard as they could.
Great was the exultation of the colonists, at this escape
of Juno's. It even surpassed their happiness at the retreat
of their invaders. If the boat were actually unseen, the
governor believed the impression was sufficient to keep the
savages aloof for a long time, if not for ever; since they
would not fail to ascribe the roar, and the smoke of the
volcano, and all the mysteries of the place, to supernatural
agencies. If the sail
had
been seen, however, it was
possible
that, on reflection, their courage might revive, and
more would be seen of them. Unus was extolled by
everybody
,
and seemed perfectly happy. Peggy communicated
his thoughts, which were every way in favour of his new
friends. Waally he detested. He denounced him as a
ruthless tyrant, and declared he would prefer death to
submission
to his exactions. Juno highly approved of all his
sentiments, and was soon known as a sworn friend of
Peggy's. This hatred of tyranny is innate in man, but it
is necessary to distinguish between real oppression and
those restraints which are wholesome, if not indispensable
to human happiness. As for the canoes, they were soon
out of sight in the south-western board, running off, under
their sails, before the wind. Waally, himself, was too
strong-minded and resolute, to be as much overcome by
the echo, as his companions; but, so profound and general
was the awe excited, that he did not think it advisable to
persevere in his projects, at a moment so discouraging.
Acquiescing in the wishes of all around him, the
expedition
drew off from the island, making the best of its way
back to the place from which it had last sailed. All these
circumstances became known to the colonists, in the end,
as well as the reasoning and the more minute incidents
that influenced the future movements. For the time
being
,
however, Woolston and his friends were left to their
own conjectures on the subject; which, however, were not
greatly out of the way. It was an hour after Juno and
Unus were safe up on the plain, before the look-outs at the
Peak finally lost sight of the fleet, which, when last seen,
was steering a course that would carry it between the
volcano and Rancocus Island, and might involve it in
serious
difficulties in the succeeding night. There was no
land in sight from the highest points on Rancocus Island,
nor any indications of land, in a south-westerly direction;
and, did the canoes run past the latter, the imminent
danger
of a general catastrophe would be the consequence.
Once at sea, under an uncertainty as to the course to be
steered, the situation of those belonging to the expedition
would be painful, indeed, nor could the results be foreseen.
Waaly, nevertheless, escaped the danger. Edging off to
keep aloof from the mysterious smoke, which troubled his
followers almost as much as the mysterious echoes, the
party, most fortunately for themselves, got a distant view
of the mountains for which they were running, and altered
their course in sufficient time to reach their place of
destination
,
by the return of light the succeeding morning.
All thoughts of the expedition to Rancocus Island were
temporarily abandoned by the governor and his council.
Mark was greatly disappointed, nor did his regrets cease
with disappointment only. Should Waally leave a portion
of his people on that island, a collision must occur, sooner
or later; there being a moral impossibility of the two
colonies
continuing friends while so near each other. The
nature of an echo would be ascertained, before many
months, among the hills of Rancocus Island, and when that
came to be understood, there was an end of the sacred
character that the recent events had conferred on the
Peak. Any straggling vagabond, or runaway from a ship,
might purchase a present importance by explaining things,
and induce the savages to renew their efforts. In a word,
there was the moral certainty that hostilities must be
renewed
ere many months, did Waally remain so near them,
and the question now seriously arose, whether it were
better
to press the advantage already obtained, and drive him
back to his group, or to remain veiled behind the sort of
mystery that at present enshrouded them. These points
were gravely debated, and became subjects of as great
interest among the colonists, as ever banks, or
abolitionism
,
or antimasonry, or free-trade, or any other of the
crotchets of the day, could possibly be in America. Many
were the councils that were convened to settle this
important
point of policy, which, after all, like most other
matters
of moment, was decided more by the force of
circumstances
,
than by any of the deductions of human reason.
The weakness of the colony and the dangers to its
existence
,
disposed of the question of an aggressive war.
Waally was too strong to be assailed by a dozen enemies,
and all the suggestions of prudence were in favour of
remaining
quiet, until the Friend Abraham White could, at
least, be made available in the contest. Supported by that
vessel, indeed, matters would be changed; and Mark
thought it would be in his power to drive in Waally, and
even to depose him and place Ooroony at the head of the
natives once more. To finish and launch the schooner,
therefore, was now the first great object, and, after a week
of indecision and consultations, it was determined to set
about that duty with vigour.
It will be easily seen, that the getting of the Abraham
into the water was an affair of a good deal of delicacy,
under the circumstances. The strait between the Peak
and Cape South was thirty miles wide, and it was twenty
more to the crater. Thus the party at work on the vessel
would be fully fifty miles from the main abodes of the
colony, and thrown quite out of the affair should another
invasion be attempted. As for bringing the Neshamony,
the Did, the Bridget, and the lighter, into the combat,
everybody was of opinion it would be risking too much.
It is true, one of the swivels was mounted on the former,
and might be of service, but the natives had got to be too
familiar with fire-arms to render it prudent to rely on
the potency of a single swivel, in a conflict against a
force so numerous, and one led by a spirit as determined
as that of Waally's was known to be. All idea of fighting
at sea, therefore, until the schooner was launched, was out
of the question, and every energy was turned to effect the
latter most important object. A separation of the forces of
the colony was inevitable, in the meanwhile; and reliance
must be placed on the protection of Providence, for
keeping
the enemy aloof until the vessel was ready for active
service.
The labour requiring as much physical force as could
be mustered, the arrangement was settled in council and
approved by the governor, on the following plan, viz.:
Mark was to proceed to the Reef with all the men that
could be spared, and a portion of the females. It was not
deemed safe, however, to leave the Peak with less than
three defenders, Heaton, Peters and Unus being chosen
for that important station; the former commanding, of
course. Mark, Betts, Bigelow, Socrates, and Jones,
formed the party for the Reef, to which were attached
Bridget, Martha, Teresa, and the blacks. Bigelow went
across, indeed, a day or two before the main party sailed,
in order to look after Dido, and to get his work forward
as fast as possible. When all was ready, and that was
when ten days had gone by after the retreat of Waally,
without bringing any further tidings from him, the
governor
sailed in the Neshamony, having the Bridget and the
tighter in company, leaving the Dido for the convenience
of Heaton and his set. Signals were agreed on, though
the distance was so great as to render them of little use,
unless a boat were mid-channel. A very simple and
ingenious
Vol. II.  3
expedient, nevertheless, was suggested by Mark,
in connection with this matter. A single tree grew so near
the Peak as to be a conspicuous object from the ocean; it
was not large, though it could be seen at a great distance,
more particularly in the direction of the Reef. The
governor
intimated an intention to send a boat daily far
enough out into the strait to ascertain whether this tree
were, or were not standing; and Heaton was instructed to
have it felled as soon as he had thoroughly ascertained
that Waally was abroad again with hostile intentions.
Other signals were also agreed on, in order to regulate
the movements of the boats, in the event of their being
called back to the Peak to repel an invasion.
With the foregoing arrangements completed and
thoroughly
understood, the governor set sail for the Reef,
accompanied
by his little squadron. It was an exquisitely
beautiful day, one in which all the witchery of the climate
developed itself, soothing the nerves and animating the
spirits. Bridget had lost most of her apprehensions of the
natives, and could laugh with her husband and play with
her child almost as freely as before the late events.
Everybody
,
indeed, was in high spirits, the launching of the
schooner being regarded as a thing that would give them
complete command of the adjacent seas.
The passage was short, a fresh breeze blowing, and four
hours after quitting the cliffs, the Neshamony was under
the lee of Cape South, and heading for the principal inlet.
As the craft glided along, in perfectly smooth water now,
Mark noted the changes that time was making on those
rocks, which had so lately emerged from the depths of the
ocean. The prairie, in particular, was every way worthy
of his attention. A mass of sea-weed, which rested on a
sort of stratum of mud immediately after the eruption, had
now been the favourite pasturage of the hogs for more than
a twelvemonth. These hogs at the present time exceeded
fifty full-grown animals, and there were twice that number
of grunters at their heels. Then the work they had done
on the Prairie was incredible. Not less than hundreds of
acres had they rooted over, mixing the sea-weed with the
mud, and fast converting the whole into soil. The rains
had washed away the salt, or converted it into manure, as
well as contributing to the more rapid decay of the
vegetable
substances. In that climate the changes are very
rapid, and Mark saw that another year or two would
convert
the whole of that vast range, which had been formerly
computed at a surface of a thousand acres, into very
respectable
pastures, if not into meadows. Of meadows,
however, there was very little necessity in that latitude;
the eternal summer that reigned furnishing pasturage the
year round. The necessary grasses might be wanting to
seed down so large a surface, but those which Socrates
had put in were well-rooted, and it was pretty certain they
would, sooner or later, spread themselves over the whole
field. In defiance of the hogs, and their increasing
inroads
,
large patches were already green and flourishing.
What is more, young trees were beginning to show
themselves
along the margin of the channels. Heaton had
brought over from Betto's group several large panniers
made of green willows, and these Socrates had cut into
strips, and thrust into the mud. Almost without an
exception
they had struck out roots, and never ceasing, day or
night, to grow, they were already mostly of the height of a
man. Four or five years would convert them into so many
beautiful, if not very useful trees.
Nor was this all. Heaton, under the influence of his
habits, had studied the natures of the different trees he had
met with on the other islands. The cocoa-nut, in
particular
,
abounded in both groups, and finding it was a tree that
much affected low land and salt water, he had taken care
to set out various samples of his roots and fruits, on
certain
detached islets near this channel, where the soil and
situation induced him to believe they would flourish.
Seasand
he was of opinion was the most favourable for the
growth of this tree, and he had chosen the sites of his
plantations with a view to those advantages. On the Peak
cocoa-nuts were to be found, but they were neither very
fine, nor in very large quantities. So long as Mark had
that island to himself, the present supply would more than
equal the demand, but with the increase of the colony a
greater number of the trees would become very desirable.
Five or six years would be needed to produce the
fruit-bearing
tree, and the governor was pleased to find that the
growth of one of those years had been already secured.
In the case of those he had himself planted, in and on the
crater, near three years had contributed to their growth,
and neither the Guano nor Loam Island having been
forgotten
,
many of them were now thirty feet high. As he
approached the crater, on that occasion, he looked at those
promising fruits of his early and provident care for the
future with great satisfaction, for seldom was the labour
of man better rewarded. Mark well knew the value of
this tree, which was of use in a variety of ways, in
addition
to the delicious and healthful fruit it bears; delicious
and healthful when eaten shortly after it is separated from
the tree. The wood of the kernel could be polished, and
converted into bowls, that were ornamental as well as
useful
.
The husks made a capital cordage, and a very
respectable
sail-cloth, being a good substitute for hemp,
though hemp, itself, was a plant that might be grown on
the prairies to an almost illimitable extent. The leaves
were excellent for thatching, as well as for making brooms,
mats, hammocks, baskets and a variety of such articles,
while the trunks could be converted into canoes, gutters,
and timber generally. There was also one other expensive
use of this tree, which the governor had learned from
Heaton
.
While Bridget was still confined to the ship, after
the birth of her daughter, Mark had brought her a dish
of greens, which she pronounced the most delicious of any
thing in its way she had ever tasted. It was composed of
the young and delicate leaves of the new growth, or of the
summit of the cocoa-nut tree, somewhat resembling the
artichoke in their formation, though still more exquisite in
taste. But the tree from which this treat was obtained
died,a penalty that must ever be paid to partake of that
dish. As soon as Bridget learned this, she forbade the
cutting of any more for her use, at least. All the boats
got into port in good season, and the Reef once more
became
a scene of life and activity. The schooner was soon
completed, and it only remained to put her into the water.
This work was already commenced by Bigelow, and the
governor directed everybody to lend a hand in effecting
so desirable an object. Bigelow had all his materials
ready, and so perseveringly did our colonists work, that
the schooner was all ready to be put into the water on the
evening of the second day. The launch was deferred only to
have the benefit of daylight. That afternoon Mark,
accompanied
by his wife, had gone in the Bridget, his favourite
boat, to look for the signal tree. He went some distance
into the strait, ere he was near enough to get a sight of
it even with the glass; when he did procure a view, there
it was precisely as he had last seen it. Putting the helm
of the boat up, the instant he was assured of his fact, the
governor wore short round, making the best of his way
back to the crater, again. The distances, it will be
remembered
,
were considerable, and it required time to
make the passage. The sun was setting as Mark was
running
along the channel to the Reef, the young man
pointing
out to his charming wife the growth of the trees, the
tints of the evening sky, the drove of hogs, the extent of
his new meadows, and such other objects as would be
likely to interest both, in the midst of such a scene. The
boat rounded a point where a portion of the hogs had been
sleeping, and as it came sweeping up, the animals rose in
a body, snuffed the air, and began scampering off in the
way conformable to their habits, Mark laughing and
pointing
with his fingers to draw Bridget's attention to their
antics.
There
are more of the creatures, said Bridget;
yonder, on the further side of the prairieI dare say
the two parties will join each other, and have a famous
scamper, in company.
More! echoed Mark; that can hardly be, as we
passed some thirty of them several miles to the southward.
What is it you see, dearest, that you mistake for hogs?
Why, yondermore than a mile from us; on the
opposite
side of the prairie and near the water, in the other
channel.
The other is not a channel at all; it is a mere bay that
leads to nothing; so none of our boats or people can be
there. The savages, as I am your husband, Bridget!
Sure enough, the objects which Bridget had mistaken
for mere hogs, were in truth the heads and shoulders of
some twenty Indians who were observing the movements of
the boat from positions taken on the other side of the plain,
3 *
so as to conceal all but the upper halves of their bodies.
They had two canoes; war canoes, moreover; but these
were the whole party, at that point at least.
This was a most grave discovery. The governor had
hoped the Reef, so accessible on every side by means of
canoes, would, for years at least, continue to be a
terra
incognita
to the savages. On this ignorance of the natives
would much of its security depend, for the united forces
of the colonists could scarcely suffice to maintain the place
against the power of Waally. The matter as it was, called
for all his energies, and for the most prompt measures.
The first step was to apprise the people at the Reef of
the proximity of these dangerous neighbours. As the boat
was doubtless seen, its sails rising above the land, there
was no motive in changing its course, or for attempting to
conceal it. The crater, ship and schooner on the stocks,
were all in sight of the savages at that moment, though not
less than two leagues distant, where they doubtless
appeared
indistinct and confused. The ship might produce an
influence in one or two ways. It might inflame the
cupidity
of Waally, under the hope of possessing so much
treasure
,
and tempt him on to hasten his assault; or it might
intimidate him by its imagined force, vessels rarely visiting
the islands of the Pacific without being prepared to defend
themselves. The savages would not be likely to
comprehend
the true condition of the vessel, but would naturally
suppose that she had a full crew, and possessed the usual
means of annoying her enemies. All this occurred to the
governor in the first five minutes after his discovery, while
his boat was gliding onwards towards her haven.
Bridget behaved admirably. She trembled a little at
first, and pressed her child to her bosom with more than
the usual warmth, but her self-command was soon regained,
and from that instant, Mark found in her a quick,
ingenious
,
and useful assistant and counsellor. Her faculties
and courage seemed to increase with the danger, and so
far from proving an encumbrance, as might naturally
enough have been expected, she was not only out of the
way, as respects impediments, but she soon became of real
use, and directed the movements of the females with almost
as much skill and decision as Mark directed those of their
husbands.
The boat did not reach the Reef until dusk, or for an
hour after the savages had been seen. The colonists had
just left their work, and the evening being cool and
refreshing
after a warm summer's day, they were taking their
suppers under a tent or awning, at no great distance from
the ship-yard, when the governor joined them. This tent,
or awning, had been erected for such purposes, and had
several advantages to recommend it. It stood quite near
the beach of the spring, and cool fresh water was always
at hand. It had a carpet of velvet-like grass, too, a rare
thing for the Reef, on the outside of the crater. But, there
were cavities on its surface, in which foreign substances
had collected, and this was one of them. Sea-weed, loam,
dead fish, and rain-water had made a thin soil on about an
acre of rocks at this spot, and the rain constantly assisting
vegetation, the grass-seed had taken root there, and this
being its second season, Betts had found the sward already
sufficient for his purposes, and caused an awning to be
spread, converting the grass into a carpet. There might
now have been a dozen similar places on the reef, so many
oases in its desert, where soil had formed and grass was
growing. No one doubted that, in time and with care,
those then living might see most of those naked rocks
clothed with verdure, for the progress of vegetation in such
a climate, favoured by those accidental causes which
seemed to prevent that particular region from ever
suffering
by droughts, is almost magical, and might convert a
wilderness into a garden in the course of a very few years.
Mark did not disturb the happy security in which he
found his people by any unnecessary announcement of
danger. On the contrary, he spoke cheerfully,
complimented
them on the advanced state of their work, and took
an occasion to get Betts aside, when he first communicated
the all-important discovery he had made. Bob was
dumfounded
at first; for, like the governor himself, he had
believed
the Reef to be one of the secret spots of the earth,
and had never anticipated an invasion in that quarter.
Recovering himself, however, he was soon in a state of
mind to consult intelligently and freely.
Then we're to expect the rep
tyles
to-night? said
Betts, as soon as he had regained his voice.
I think not, answered Mark. The canoes I saw
were in the false channel, and cannot possibly reach us
without returning to the western margin of the rocks, and
entering one of the true passages. I rather think this
cannot
be done before morning. Daylight, indeed, may be
absolutely necessary to them; and as the night promises to
be dark, it is not easy to see how strangers can find their
way to us, among the maze of passages they must meet.
By land, they cannot get here from any of the islands on
the western side of the group; and even if landed on the
central island, there is only one route, and that a crooked
one, which will bring them here without the assistance of
their canoes. We are reasonably well fortified, Betts,
through natural agencies, on that side; and I do not
apprehend
seeing anything more of the fellows until morning.
What a misfortin 'tis that they should ever have
discovered
the Reef!
It certainly is; and it is one, I confess, I had not
expected
.
But we must take things as they are, Betts, and
do our duty. Providencethat all-seeing Power, which
spared you and me when so many of our shipmates were
called away with short notice  Providence may still be
pleased to look on us with favour.
That puts me in mind, Mr. Mark, of telling you
something
that I have lately l'arn'd from Jones, who was about
a good deal among the savages, since his friend's marriage
with Peggy, and before he made his escape to join us.
Jones says that, as near as he can find out, about three
years ago, a ship's launch came into Betto's Land, as we
call itWaally's Country, however, is meant; and that is
a part of the group I never ventured into, seeing that my
partic'lar friend, Ooroony, and Waally, was always at
daggers
drawnbut a ship's launch came in there, about three
years since, with seven living men in it. Jones could never
get a sight of any of the men, for Waally is said to have
kept them all hard at work for himself; but he got
tolerable
accounts of them, as well as of the boat in which
they arrived.
Surely, Bob, you do not suppose that launch to have
been ours, and those men to have been a part of our old
crew! exclaimed Mark, with a tumult of feeling he had
not experienced since he had reason to think that Bridget
was about to be restored to him.
Indeed, but I do, sir. The savages told Jones that the
boat had a bird painted in its starn-sheets; and that was
the case with our launch, Mr. Mark, which was
ornamented
with a spread-eagle in that very spot. Then, one of the
men was said to have a red mark on his face; and you may
remember, sir, that Bill Brown had a nat'ral brand of that
sort. Jones only mentioned the thing this arternoon, as
we was at work together; and I detarmined to let you
know all about it, at the first occasion. Depend on it, Mr.
Woolston, some of our chaps is still living.
This unexpected intelligence momentarily drove the
recollection of the present danger from the governor's
mind. He sent for Jones, and questioned him closely
touching the particulars of his information; the answers
he received certainly going far towards corroborating
Betts's idea of the character of the unknown men. Jones
was never able even to get on the island where these men
were said to be; but he had received frequent descriptions
of their ages, appearances, numbers, &c. It was also
reported by those who had seen them, that several of the
party had died of hunger before the boat reached the
group; and that only about half of those who had
originally
taken to the boat, which belonged to a ship that had
been wrecked, lived to get ashore. The man with a mark
on his face was represented as being very expert with tools,
and was employed by Waally to build him a canoe that
would live out in the gales of the ocean. This agreed
perfectly
with the trade and appearance of Brown, who had
been the Rancocus's carpenter, and had the sort of mark
so particularly described.
The time, the boat, the incidents of the wreck, meagre
as the last were, as derived through the information of
Jones, and all the other facts Mark could glean in a close
examination of the man's statements, went to confirm the
impression that a portion of those who had been carried to
leeward in the Rancocus's launch, had escaped with their
lives, and were at that moment prisoners in the power of
the very savage chief who now threatened his colony with
destruction.
But the emergency did not admit of any protracted
inquiry
into, or any consultation on the means necessary to
relieve their old shipmates from a fate so miserable.
Circumstances
required that the governor should now give his
attention to the important concerns immediately before
him.
CHAPTER III.
To whom belongs this valley fair,
That sleeps beneath the filmy air,
Even like a living thing?
Silent as infant at the breast,
Save a still sound that speaks of rest,
That streamlet's murmuring?
Wilson
.
When
the governor had communicated to his people
that the savages were actually among the islands of their
own group, something very like a panic came over them.
A few minutes, however, sufficed to restore a proper
degree
of confidence, when the arrangements necessary to
their immediate security were entered into. As some
attention
had previously been bestowed on the fortifications
of the crater, that place was justly deemed the citadel of
the Reef. Some thought the ship would be the most
easily defended, on account of the size of the crater, and
because it had a natural ditch around it, but so much
property
was accumulated in and around the crater that it
could not be abandoned without a loss to which the
governor
had no idea of submitting. The gate of the crater
was nothing in the way of defence, it is true; but one of
the carronades had been planted so as to command it, and
this was thought sufficient for repelling all ordinary
assaults
.
It has been said, already, that the outer wall of
the crater was perpendicular at its base, most probably
owing to the waves of the ocean in that remote period
when the whole Reef was washed by them in every gale
of wind. This perpendicular portion of the rock, moreover,
was much harder than the ordinary surface of the Summit,
owing in all probability to the same cause. It was even
polished in appearance, and in general was some eighteen
or twenty feet in height, with the exception of the two or
three places, by one of which Mark and Betts had
clambered
up on their first visit to the Summit. These places,
always small, and barely sufficient to allow of a man's
finding
footing on them, had long been picked away, in order
to prevent the inroads of Kitty, and when the men had
turned their attention to rendering the place secure against
a sudden inroad, they being the only points where an
enemy
could get up, without resorting to ladders or artificial
assistance, had, by means of additional labour, been
rendered
as secure as all the rest of the `outer wall,' as the
base of the crater was usually termed among them. It was
true, that civilized assailants, who had the ordinary means
at command, would soon have mastered this obstacle; but
savages would not be likely to come prepared to meet it.
The schooner, with her cradle and ways, had required all
the loose timber, to the last stick, and the enemy was not
likely to procure any supplies from the ship-yard. Two
of the carronades were on the Summit, judiciously planted;
two were on board the Abraham, as was one of the long
sixes, and the remainder of the guns, (three at the rock
excepted) were still on board the ship.
Mark divided his forces for the night. As Bridget
habitually
lived in the Rancocus' cabins, he did not derange
her household at all, but merely strengthened her crew, by
placing Bigelow and Socrates on board her; each with his
family; while Betts assumed the command of the crater,
having for his companion Jones. These were small
garrisons
;
but the fortresses were strong, considering all the
circumstances, and the enemy were uncivilized, knowing
but little of fire-arms. By nine o'clock everything was
arranged, and most of the women and children were on
their beds, though no one there undressed that night.
Mark and Betts met, by agreement, alongside of the
schooner, as soon as their respective duties elsewhere
would allow. As the Reef, proper, was an island, they
knew no enemy could find his way on it without coming
by water, or by passing over the narrow bridge which has
already been mentioned as crossing the little strait near
the spring. This rendered them tolerably easy for the
moment, though Mark had assured his companion it was
not possible for the canoes to get to the Reef under several
hours. Neither of the men could sleep, however, and they
thought it as well to be on the look-out, and in company,
as to be tossing about in their berths, or hammocks, by
themselves. The conversation turned on their prospects,
almost as a matter of course.
We are somewhat short-handed, sir, to go to quarters
ag'in them vagabonds, observed Betts, in reply to some
remark of the governor's. I counted a hundred and
three of their craft when they was off the Peak the other
day, and not one on 'em all had less than four hands aboard
it, while the biggest must have had fifty. All told, I do
think, Mr. Mark, they might muster from twelve to fifteen
hundred fighting men.
That has been about my estimate of their force, Bob;
but, if they were fifteen thousand, we must bring them to
action, for we fight for everything.
Ay, ay, sir, answered Betts, ejecting the tobacco juice
in the customary way, there's reason in roasted eggs, they
say, and there's reason in firing a few broadsides afore a
body gives up. What a different place this here rock's got
to be, sir, from what it was when you and I was floating
sea-weed and rafting loam to it, to make a melon or a
cucumber
bed! Times is changed, sir, and we're now at
war. Then it was all peace and quiet; and now it's all
hubbub and disturbance.
We have got our wives here now, and that I think
you'll admit is something, Bob, when you remember the
pains taken by yourself to bring so great a happiness
about.
Why, yes, sirI'll allow the wives is something
Ship ahoy! hailed a voice in good English, and in
the most approved seaman-like tones of the voice.
The hail came from the margin of the island nearest to
the Reef, or that which was connected with the latter by
means of the bridge, but not from a point very near the
latter.
In the name of heavenly marcy! exclaimed Betts,
what can that mean, governor?
I know that voice, said Mark, hurriedly: and the
whole matter begins to clear up to me. Who hails the
Rancocus?
Is that ship the Rancocus, then? answered the voice
from the island.
The Rancocus, and no otherare you not Bill Brown,
her late carpenter?
The very same, God bless you, Mr. Woolston, for I
now know
your
voice, too. I'm Bill, and right down glad
am I to have things turn out so. I half suspected the truth
when I saw a ship's spars this arternoon in this place,
though little did I think, yesterday, of ever seeing anything
more of the old 'Cocus. Can you give me a cast across
this bit of a ferry, sir?
Are you alone, Billor who have you for companions?
There's two on us, sir, only  Jim Wattles and I
seven on us was saved in the launch; Mr. Hillson and the
supercargo both dying afore we reached the land, as did
the other man, we seven still living, though only two on us
is here.
Are there any black fellows with you?Any of the
natives?
Not one, sir. We gave 'em the slip two hours ago, or
as soon as we saw the ship's masts, being bent on getting
afloat in some craft or other, in preference to stopping with
savages any longer. No, Mr. Woolston; no fear of them
to-night, for they are miles and miles to leeward, bothered
in the channels, where they'll be pretty sartain to pass the
night; though you'll hear from 'em in the morning. Jim
and I took to our land tacks, meeting with a good
opportunity
;
and by running directly in the wind's eye, have
come out here. We hid ourselves till the canoes was out
of sight, and then we carried sail as hard as we could. So
give us a cast and take us aboard the old ship again, Mr.
Woolston, if you love a fellow-creatur', and an old
shipmate
in distress.
Such was the singular dialogue which succeeded the
Vol. II.  4
unexpected hail. It completely put a new face on things
at the Reef. As Brown was a valuable man, and one
whose word he had always relied on, Mark did not
hesitate
,
but told him the direction to the bridge, where he and
Betts met him and Wattles, after each of the parties had
believed the others to be dead now fully three years!
The two recovered seamen of the Rancocus were alone,
having acted in perfect good faith with their former officer,
who led them to the awning, gave them some refreshment,
and heard their story. The account given by Jones, for
the first time that very day, turned out to be essentially
true. When the launch was swept away from the ship, it
drove down to leeward, passing at no great distance from
the crater, of which the men in her got a glimpse, without
being able to reach it. The attention of Hillson was mainly
given to keeping the boat from filling or capsizing; and
this furnished abundance of occupation. The launch got
into one of the channels, and by observing the direction,
which was nearly east and west, it succeeded in passing
through all the dangers, coming out to leeward of the
shoals. As everybody believed that the ship was hopelessly
lost, no effort was made to get back to the spot where she
had been left. No island appearing, Hillson determined
to run off to the westward, trusting to fall in with land
of some sort or other. The provisions and water were
soon consumed, and then came the horrors usual to such
scenes at sea. Hillson was one of the first that perished,
his previous excesses unfitting him to endure privation.
But seven survived when the launch reached an island in
Waally's part of the group, so often mentioned. There
they fell into the hands of that turbulent and warlike chief.
Waally made the seamen his slaves, treating them
reasonably
well, but exacting of them the closest attention to his
interests. Brown, as a ship-carpenter, soon became a
favourite
,
and was employed in fashioning craft that it was
thought might be useful in carrying out the ambitious
projects
of his master. The men were kept on a small island,
and were watched like any other treasure, having no
opportunity
to communicate with any of those whites who
appeared in other parts of the group. Thus, while Betts
passed two months with Ooroony, and Heaton and his
party nearly as much more time, these sailors, who heard
of such visitors, could never get access to them. This
was partly owing to the hostilities between the two chiefs
Ooroony being then in the ascendantand partly owing
to the special projects of Waally, who, by keeping his
prisoners
busily employed on his fleet, looked forward to the
success which, in fact, crowned his efforts against his
rival.
At length Waally undertook the expedition which had
appeared in such force beneath the cliffs of the Peak. By
this time, Brown had become so great a favourite, that he
was permitted to accompany the chief; and Wattles was
brought along as a companion for his shipmate. The
remaining
five were left behind, to complete a craft on which
they had now been long employed, and which was intended
to be the invincible war-canoe of those regions. Brown
and Wattles had been in Waally's own canoe when the
terrible
echoes so much alarmed the uninstructed beings who
heard it. They described them as much the most
imposing
echoes they had ever heard; nor did they, at first,
know what to make of them, themselves. It was only on
reflection, and after the retreat to Rancocus Island, that
Brown, by reasoning on the subject, came to the
conclusion
that the whites, who were supposed to be in possession
of the place, had fired a gun, which had produced the
astounding uproar that had rattled so far along the cliff.
As all Brown's sympathies were with the unknown people
of his own colour, he kept his conjectures to himself, and
managed to lead Waally in a different direction, by
certain
conclusions of his own touching the situation of the
reef where the Rancocus had been lost.
Bill Brown was an intelligent man for his station and
pursuits. He knew the courses steered by the launch, and
had some tolerably accurate notions of the distances run.
According to his calculations, that reef could not be very
far to the northward of the Peak, and, by ascending the
mountains on Rancocus Island, he either saw, or fancied
he saw, the looming of land in that part of the ocean. It
then occurred to Brown that portions of the wreck might
still be found on the reef, and become the means of
effecting
his escape from the hands of his tyrants. Waally
listened to his statements and conjectures with the utmost
attention, and the whole fleet put to sea the very next day,
in quest of this treasure. After paddling to windward
again, until the Peak was fairly in sight, Brown steered to
the north-east, a course that brought him out, after
twenty-four
hours of toil, under the lee of the group of the reef.
This discovery of itself, filled Waally with exultation and
pride. Here were no cliffs to scale, no mysterious
mountain
to appal, nor any visible obstacle to oppose his
conquests
.
It is true, that the newly-discovered territory did
not appear to be of much value, little beside naked rock,
or broad fields of mud and sea-weed intermingled,
rewarding
their first researches. But better things were hoped for.
It was something to men whose former domains were so
much circumscribed and girded by the ocean, to find even
a foundation for a new empire. Brown was now consulted
as to every step to be taken, and his advice was implicitly
followed. Columbus was scarcely a greater man, for the
time being, at the court of Ferdinand and Isabella, than
Bill Brown immediately became at the court of Waally.
His words were received as prophecies, his opinions as
oracles.
Honest Bill, who anticipated no more from his
discoveries
than the acquisition of certain portions of wood, iron,
and copper, with, perhaps, the addition of a little rigging,
certain sails and an anchor or two, acted, at first; for the
best interests of his master. He led the fleet along the
margin of the group until a convenient harbour was found.
Into this all the canoes entered, and a sandy beach
supplying
fresh water in abundance having been found, an
encampment
was made for the night. Several hours of
day-light
remaining, however, when these great preliminary
steps had been taken, Brown proposed to Waally an
exploring
expedition in a couple of the handiest of the canoes.
The people thus employed were those who had given the
alarm to the governor. On that occasion, not only was the
boat seen, but the explorers were near enough to the reef,
to discover not only the crater, but the spars of the ship.
Here, then, was a discovery scarcely less important than
that of the group itself! After reasoning on the facts,
Waally came to the conclusion that these, after all, were
the territories that Heaton and his party had come to seek,
and that here he should find those cows which he had once
seen, and which he coveted more than any other riches on
earth. Ooroony had been weak enough to allow strangers
in possession of things so valuable, to pass through
his
islands; but
he
, Waally, was not the man to imitate this
folly. Brown, too, began to think that the white men
sought were to be found here. That whites were in the
group was plain enough by the ship, and he supposed they
might be fishing for the pearl-oyster, or gathering
bche-le-mar
for the Canton market. It was just possible that a
colony had established itself in this unfrequented place, and
that the party of which he had heard so much, had come
hither with their stores and herds. Not the smallest
suspicion
at first crossed his mind that he there beheld the spars
of the Rancocus; but, it was enough for him and Wattles
that Christian men were there, and that, in all probability,
they were men of the Anglo-Saxon race. No sooner was
it ascertained that the explorers were in a false channel,
and that it would not be in their power to penetrate farther
in their canoes, than our two seamen determined to run,
and attach themselves to the strangers. They naturally
thought that they should find a vessel armed and manned,
and ready to stand out to sea as soon as her officers were
apprized of the danger that threatened them, and did not
hesitate about joining their fortune with hers, in preference
to remaining with Waally any longer. Freedom possesses
a charm for which no other advantage can compensate, and
those two old sea-dogs, who had worked like horses all their
lives, in their original calling, preferred returning to the
ancient drudgery rather than live with Waally, in the rude
abundance of savage chiefs. The escape was easily enough
made, as soon as it was dark, Brown and Wattles being on
shore most of the time, under the pretence that it was
necessary
,
in order that they might ascertain the character
of these unknown colonists by signs understood best by
themselves.
Such is a brief outline of the explanations that the two
recovered seamen made to their former officer. In return,
the governor as briefly related to them the manner in which
the ship had been saved, and the history of the colony down
4 *
to that moment. When both tales had been told, a
consultation
on the subject of future proceedings took place, quite
as a matter of course. Brown, and his companion, though
delighted to meet their old ship-mates, were greatly
disappointed
in not finding a sea-going vessel ready to receive
them. They did not scruple to say that had they known
the actual state of things on the Reef, they would not have
left the savages, but trusted to being of more service even
to their natural friends, by continuing with Waally, in their
former relation, than by taking the step they had.
Repentance
,
or regrets, however, came too late; and now
they were fairly in for it, neither expressed any other
determination
than to stand by the service into which they
had just entered, honestly, if not quite as gladly as they
had anticipated.
The governor and Betts both saw that Brown and
Wattles
entertained a high respect for the military prowess of
the Indian chief. They pronounced him to be not only a
bold, but an adroit warrior; one, full of resources and
ingenuity
,
when his means were taken into the account.
The number of men with him, however, Brown assured
Mark, was less than nine hundred, instead of exceeding a
thousand, as had been supposed from the count made on
the cliffs. As it now was explained, a great many women
were in the canoes. Waally, moreover, was not altogether
without fire-arms. He was master of a dozen old,
imperfect
muskets, and what was more, he had a four-pound
gun. Ammunition, however, was very scarce, and of shot
for his gun he had but three. Each of these shot had been
fired several times, in his wars with Ooroony, and days
had been spent in hunting them up, after they had done
their work, and of replacing them in the chief's magazine.
Brown could not say that they had done much mischief,
having, in every instance, being fired at long distances,
and with a very uncertain aim. The business of sighting
guns was not very well understood by the great mass of
Christians, half a century since; and it is not at all
surprising
that savages should know little or nothing about it.
Waally's gunners, according to Brown's account of the
matter, could never be made to understand that the bore
of a gun was not exactly parallel to its exterior surface,
and they invariably aimed too high, by sighting along the
upper side of the piece. This same fault is very common
with the inexperienced in using a musket; for, anxious to
get a sight of the end of their piece, they usually stick it
up into the air and overshoot their object. It was the
opinion of Brown, on the whole, that little was to be
apprehended
from Waally's fire-arms. The spear and club
were the weapons to be dreaded; and with these the
islanders were said to be very expert. But the disparity
in numbers was the main ground of apprehension.
When Brown was told how near the schooner was to
being launched, he earnestly begged the governor to let
him and Bigelow go to work and put her into the water,
immediately. Everything necessary to a cruise was on
board her, even to her provisions and water, the
arrangements
having been made to launch her with her sails bent;
and, once in the water, Bill thought she would prove of
the last importance to the defence. If the worst came to
the worst, all hands could get on board her, and by
standing
through some of the channels that were clear of canoes,
escape into the open water. Once there, Waally could do
nothing with them, and they might be governed by
circumstances
.
Woolston viewed things a little differently. He loved
the Reef; it had become dear to him by association and
history, and he did not relish the thought of abandoning it.
There was too much property at risk, to say nothing of the
ship, which would doubtless be burned for its metals, should
the Indians get possession, even for a day. In that ship
he had sailed; in that ship he had been married; in that
ship his daughter had been born; and in that ship Bridget
loved still to dwell, even more than she affected all the
glories
of the Eden of the Peak. That ship was not to be
given up to savages without a struggle. Nor did Mark
believe anything would be gained by depriving the men of
their rest during the accustomed hours. Early in the
morning, with the light itself, he did intend to have Bigelow
under the schooner's bottom; but he saw no occasion for
his working in the dark. Launching was a delicate
business
,
and some accident might happen in the obscurity.
After talking the matter over, therefore, all hands retired
to rest, leaving one woman at the crater, and one on board
the ship, on the look-out; women being preferred to men,
on this occasion, in order that the latter might reserve their
strength for the coming struggle.
At the appointed hour next morning, every one on the
Reef was astir at the first peep of day. No disturbance
had occurred in the night, and, what is perhaps a little
remarkable, the female sentinels had not given any false
alarm. As soon as a look from the Summit gave the
governor
reason to believe that Waally was not very near
him, he ordered preparations to be made for the launch of
the Friend Abraham White. A couple of hours' work was
still required to complete this desirable task; and
everybody
set about his or her assigned duty with activity and
zeal. Some of the women prepared the breakfast; others
carried ammunition to the different guns, while Betts went
round and loaded them, one and all; and others, again,
picked up such articles of value as had been overlooked in
the haste of the previous evening, carrying them either
into the crater, or on board the ship.
On examining his fortifications by daylight, the governor
resolved to set up something more secure in the way of a
gate for the crater. He also called off two or three of the
men to get out the boarding-netting of the ship, which was
well provided in that respect; a good provision having been
made, by way of keeping the Fejee people at arms' length.
These two extraordinary offices delayed the work on the
ways; and when the whole colony went to breakfast, which
they did about an hour after sunrise, the schooner was not
yet in the water, though quite ready to be put there. Mark
announced that there was no occasion to be in a hurry;
no canoes were in sight, and there was time to have
everything
done deliberately and in order.
This security came very near proving fatal to the whole
party. Most of the men breakfasted under the awning,
which was near their work; while the women took that
meal in their respective quarters. Some of the last were
in the crater, and some in the ship. It will be remembered
that the awning was erected near the spring, and that the
spring was but a short distance from the bridge. This
bridge, it will also be recollected, connected the Reef with
an island that stretched away for miles, and which had
formed the original range for the swine, after the changes
that succeeded the eruption. It was composed of merely
two long ship's planks, the passage being only some fifty or
sixty feet in width.
The governor, now, seldom ate with his people. He
knew enough of human nature to understand that authority
was best preserved by avoiding familiarity. Besides, there
is, in truth, no association more unpleasant to those whose
manners have been cultivated, than that of the table, with
the rude and unrefined. Bridget, for instance, could
hardly be expected to eat with the wives of the seamen;
and Mark naturally wished to eat with his own family. On
that occasion he had taken his meal in the cabin of the
Rancocus, as usual, and had come down to the awning to
see that the hands turned-to as soon as they were through
with their own breakfasts. Just as he was about to issue
the necessary order, the air was filled with frightful yells,
and a stream of savages poured out of an opening in the
rocks, on to the plain of the hog pasture, as the
adjoining
field was called, rushing forward in a body towards the
crater. They had crept along under the rocks by
following
a channel, and now broke cover within two hundred
yards of the point they intended to assail.
The governor behaved admirably on this trying occasion.
He issued his orders clearly, calmly, and promptly.
Calling
on Bigelow and Jones by name, he ordered them to
withdraw the bridge, which could easily be done by
hauling
over the planks by means of wheels that had long been
fitted for that purpose. The bridge withdrawn, the
channel
,
or harbour, answered all the purposes of a ditch;
though the South Sea islanders would think but little of
swimming across it. Of course, Waally's men knew
nothing
of this bridge, nor did they know of the existence of
the basin between them and their prey. They rushed
directly
towards the ship-yard, and loud were their yells of
disappointment when they found a broad reach of water
still separating them from the whites. Naturally they
looked for the point of connection; but, by this time, the
planks were wheeled in, and the communication was
severed
.
At this instant, Waally had all his muskets
discharged
,
and the gun fired from the catamaran, on which
it was mounted. No one was injured by this volley, but a
famous noise was made; and noise passed for a good deal
in the warfare of that day and region.
It was now the turn of the colonists. At the first alarm
everybody rushed to arms, and every post was manned, or
womaned
, in a minute. On the poop of the ship was
planted one of the cannon, loaded with grape, and pointed
so as to sweep the strait of the bridge. It is true, the
distance
was fully a mile, but Betts had elevated the gun with
a view to its sending its missiles as far as was necessary.
The other carronades on the Summit were pointed so as
to sweep the portion of the hog pasture that was nearest,
and which was now swarming with enemies. Waally,
himself, was in front, and was evidently selecting a party
that was to swim for the sandy beach, a sort of forlorn
hope. No time was to be lost. Juno, a perfect heroine
in her way, stood by the gun on the poop, while Dido was
at those on the Summit, each brandishing, or blowing, a
lighted match. The governor made the preconcerted
signal
to the last, and she applied the match. Away went
the grape, rattling along the surface of the opposite rocks,
and damaging at least a dozen of Waally's men. Three
were killed outright, and the wounds of the rest were very
serious. A yell followed, and a young chief rushed
towards
the strait, with frantic cries, as if bent on leaping
across the chasm. He was followed by a hundred
warriors
.
Mark now made the signal to Juno. Not a
moment
was lost by the undaunted girl, who touched off her
gun in the very nick of time. Down came the grape,
hissing
along the Reef; and, rebounding from its surface,
away it leaped across the strait, flying through the thickest
of the assailants. A dozen more suffered by that discharge.
Waally now saw that a crisis was reached, and his efforts
to recover the ground lost were worthy of his reputation.
Calling to the swimmers, he succeeded in getting them
down into the water in scores.
The governor had ordered those near him to their
stations
.
This took Jones and Bigelow on board the
Abraham
,
where two carronades were pointed through the stern
ports, forming a battery to rake the hog pasture, which it
was foreseen must be the field of battle if the enemy came
by land, as it was the only island that came near enough
to the Reef to be used in that way. As for Mark
himself
,
accompanied by Brown and Wattles, all well armed,
he held his party in reserve, as a corps to be moved
wherever
it might be most needed. At that all-important
moment
a happy idea occurred to the young governor. The
schooner was all ready for launching. The reserve were
under her bottom, intending to make a stand behind the
covers of the yard, when Mark found himself at one of the
spur-shores, just as Brown, armed to the teeth, came up
to the other.
Lay aside your arms, cried the governor, and knock
away your spur-shore, Bill!Down with it, while I knock
this away!Look out on deck, for we are about to launch
you!
These words were just uttered, when the schooner began
to move. All the colonists now cheered, and away the
Abraham went, plunging like a battering-ram into the
midst of the swimmers. While dipping deepest, Bigelow
and Jones fired both their carronades, the shot of which
threw the whole basin into foam. This combination of
the means of assault was too much for savages to resist.
Waally was instantly routed. His main body retreated into
the coves of the channel, where their canoes lay, while the
swimmers and stragglers got out of harm's way, in the best
manner they could.
Not a moment was to be lost. The Abraham was brought
up by a hawser, as is usual, and was immediately boarded
by Mark, Bigelow and Wattles. This gave her a crew of
five men, who were every way equal to handling her. Betts
was left in command of the Reef, with the remainder of
the forces. To make sail required but two minutes, and
Mark was soon under way, rounding Loam Island, or what
had
once
been Loam Island, for it was now connected
with the hog pasture, in order to get into the reach where
Waally had his forces. This reach was a quarter of a
mile wide, and gave room for manuvring. Although the
schooner bore down to the assault with a very determined
air, it was by no means Mark's cue to come to close
quarters
.
Being well to windward, with plenty of room, he kept
the Abraham tacking, yawing, waring, and executing other
of the devices of nautical delay, whilst his men loaded and
fired her guns as fast as they could. There were more
noise and smoke, than there was bloodshed, as commonly
happens on such occasions; but these sufficed to secure the
victory. The savages were soon in a real panic, and no
authority of Waally's could check their flight. Away they
paddled to leeward, straining every nerve to get away from
pursuers, whom they supposed to be murderously bent on
killing them to a man. A more unequivocal flight never
occurred in war.
Although the governor was much in earnest, he was not
half as bloodthirsty as his fleeing enemies imagined. Every
dictate of prudence told him not to close with the canoes
until he had plenty of sea-room. The course they were
steering would take them all out of the group, into the
open water, in the course of three or four hours, and he
determined to follow at a convenient distance, just
hastening
the flight by occasional hints from his guns. In this
manner, the people of the Abraham had much the easiest
time of it, for they did little besides sail, while the savages
had to use all their paddles to keep out of the schooner's
way; they sailed, also, but their speed under their
cocoa-nut
canvas was not sufficient to keep clear of the Friend
Abraham White, which proved to be a very fast vessel, as
well as one easily handled.
At length, Waally found his fleet in the open ocean,
where he trusted the chase would end. But he had greatly
mistaken the course of events, in applying that `flattering
unction.' It was now that the governor commenced the
chase in good earnest, actually running down three of the
canoes, and making prisoners of one of the crews. In
this canoe was a young warrior, whom Bill Brown and
Wattles at once recognised as a favourite son of the chief.
Here was a most important conquest, and, Mark turned it to
account. He selected a proper agent from among the
captives
,
and sent him with a palm-branch to Waally himself,
with proposals for an exchange. There was no difficulty
in communicating, since Brown and Wattles both spoke
the language of the natives with great fluency. Three
years of captivity had, at least, taught them that much.
A good deal of time was wasted before Waally could be
brought to confide in the honour of his enemies. At last,
love for his offspring brought him, unarmed, alongside of
the schooner, and the governor met this formidable chief,
face to face. He found the latter a wily and intelligent
savage. Nevertheless, he had not the art to conceal his
strong affection for his son, and on that passion did Mark
Woolston play. Waally offered canoes, robes of feathers,
whales' teeth, and every thing that was most esteemed
among his own people, as a ransom for the boy. But this
was not the exchange the governor desired to make. He
offered to restore the son to the arms of his father as soon
as the five seamen who were still prisoners on his citadel
island should be brought alongside of the schooner. If
these terms were rejected, the lad must take the fate of
war.
Great was the struggle in the bosom of Waally, between
natural affection, and the desire to retain his captives.
After two hours of subterfuges, artifices, and tricks, the
former prevailed, and a treaty was made. Agreeably to its
conditions, the schooner was to pilot the fleet of canoes to
Betto's group, which could easily be done, as Mark knew
not only its bearings, but its latitude and longitude. As
soon as this was effected, Waally engaged to send a
messenger
for the seamen, and to remain himself on board the
Abraham until the exchange was completed. The chief
wished to attach terms, by which the colonists were to aid
him in more effectually putting down Ooroony, who was
checked rather than conquered, but Mark refused to listen
to any such proposition. He was more disposed to aid,
than to overcome the kind hearted Ooroony, and made up
his mind to have an interview with him before he returned
from the intended voyage.
Some delay would have occurred, to enable Mark to let
Bridget know of his intended absence, had it not been for
the solicitude of Betts. Finding the sails of the schooner
had gone out of sight to leeward, Bob manned the
Neshamony
,
and followed as a support. In the event of a wreck,
for instance, his presence might have been of the last
importance
.
He got alongside of the Abraham just as the
treaty was concluded, and was in time to carry back the
Vol. II.  5
news to the crater, where he might expect still to arrive
that evening. With this arrangement, therefore, the
parties
separated, Betts beating back, through the channels
of the Reef, and the governor leading off to the northward
and westward, under short canvas; all of Waally's canoes,
catamarans, &c. following about a mile astern of him.
CHAPTER IV.
Nay, shrink not from the word `farewell!'
As if 'twere friendship's final knell;
Such fears may prove but vain:
So changeful is life's fleeting day,
Whene'er we severhope may say,
We partto meet again.
Bernard Barton
.
The
Abraham went under short canvas, and she was
just three days, running dead before the wind, ere she
came in sight of Waally's islands. Heaving-to to-windward
of the group, the canoes all passed into their respective
harbours, leaving the schooner in the offing, with the
hostages
on board, waiting for the fulfilment of the treaty.
The next day, Waally himself re-appeared, bringing with
him Dickinson, Harris, Johnson, Edwards and Bright, the
five seamen of the Rancocus that had so long been
captives
in his hands. It went hard with that savage chief to
relinquish these men, but he loved his son even more than
he loved power. As for the men themselves, language
cannot portray their delight. They were not only rejoiced
to be released, but their satisfaction was heightened on
finding
into whose hands they had fallen. These men had all
kept themselves free from wives, and returned to their
colour
,
that word being now more appropriate than
colours
,
or ensign, unshackled by any embarrassing engagements.
They at once made the Abraham a power in that part of
the world. With twelve able seamen, all strong, athletic
and healthy men, to handle his craft, and with his two
carronades and a long six, the governor felt as if he might
interfere with the political relations of the adjoining states
with every prospect of being heard. Waally was,
probably
,
of the same opinion, for he made a great effort to
extend the treaty so far as to overturn Ooroony altogether,
and thus secure to their two selves the control of all that
region. Woolston inquired of Waally, in what he should
be benefited by such a policy? when the wily savage told
him, with the gravest face imaginable, that he, Mark,
might retain, in addition to his territories at the Reef,
Rancocus Island! The governor thanked his fellow
potentate
for this hint, and now took occasion to assure him
that, in future, each and all of Waally's canoes must keep
away from Rancocus Island altogether; that island
belonged
to him, and if any more expeditions visited it, the
call should be returned at Waally's habitations. This
answer
brought on an angry discussion, in which Waally,
once or twice, forgot himself a little; and when he took
his leave, it was not in the best humour possible.
Mark now deliberated on the state of things around him.
Jones knew Ooroony well, having been living in his
territories
until they were overrun by his powerful enemy, and
the governor sent him to find that chief, using a captured
canoe, of which they had kept two or three alongside of
the schooner for the purpose. Jones, who was a sworn
friend of the unfortunate chief, went as negotiator. Care
was taken to land at the right place, under cover of the
Abraham's guns, and in six hours Mark had the real
gratification
of taking Ooroony, good, honest, upright Ooroony,
by the hand, on the quarter-deck of his own vessel. Much
as the chief had suffered and lost, within the last two
years, a gleam of returning happiness shone on him when
he placed his foot on the deck of the schooner. His
reception
by the governor was honourable and even
touching
.
Mark thanked him for his kindness to his wife, to
his sister, to Heaton, and to his friend Bob. In point of
fact, without this kindness, he, Woolston, might then have
been a solitary hermit, without the means of getting
access
to any of his fellow-creatures, and doomed to remain
in that condition all his days. The obligation was now
frankly admitted, and Ooroony shed tears of joy when he
thus found that his good deeds were remembered and
appreciated
.
It has long been a question with moralists, whether or
not, good and evil bring their rewards and punishments in
this state of being. While it might be dangerous to infer
the affirmative of this mooted point, as it would be cutting
off the future and its consequences from those whose real
hopes and fears ought to be mainly concentrated in the life
that is to come, it would seem to be presuming to suppose
that principles like these ever can be nugatory in the
control
even of our daily concerns.
If it be true that God visits the sins of the fathers upon
the children even to the third and fourth generations of
them that hate him, and that the seed of the righteous
man is never seen begging his bread, there is much reason
to believe that a portion of our transgressions is to meet
with its punishment here on earth. We think nothing can
be more apparent than the fact that, in the light of mere
worldly expediency, an upright and high-principled course
leads to more happiness than one that is the reverse; and
if honesty is the best policy, after all the shifts and
expedients
of cupidity, so does virtue lead most unerringly
to happiness here, as it opens up the way to happiness
hereafter.
All the men of the Abraham had heard of Ooroony, and
of his benevolent qualities. It was his goodness, indeed,
that had been the cause of his downfall; for had he
punished
Waally as he deserved to be, when the power was in his
hands, that turbulent chief, who commenced life as his
lawful tributary, would never have gained a point where
he was so near becoming his master. Every man on board
now pressed around the good old chief, who heard on all
sides of him assurances of respect and attachment, with
pledges of assistance. When this touching scene was over,
Mark held a council on the quarter-deck, in which the
whole matter of the political condition of the group was
discussed, and the wants and dangers of Ooroony laid
bare.
As commonly happens everywhere, civilized nations and
popular governments forming no exceptions to the rule,
the ascendency of evil in this cluster of remote and savage
islands was owing altogether to the activity and audacity
of a few wicked men, rather than to the inclination of the
mass. The people greatly preferred the mild sway of their
lawful chief, to the violence and exactions of the turbulent
warrior who had worked his way into the ascendant; and,
if a portion of the population had, unwittingly, aided the
latter in his designs, under the momentary impulses of a
love of change, they now fully repented of their mistake,
and would gladly see the old condition of things restored.
There was one island, in particular, which might be
considered
as the seat of power in the entire group. Ooroony
had been born on it, and it had long been the residence
of his family; but Waally succeeded in driving him off of
it, and of intimidating its people, who, in secret, pined for
the return of their ancient rulers. If this island could be
again put in his possession, it would, itself, give the good
chief such an accession of power, as would place him, at
once, on a level with his competitor, and bring the war
back to a struggle on equal terms. Could this be done
with the assistance of the schooner, the moral effect of
such an alliance would, in all probability, secure Ooroony's
ascendency as long as such an alliance lasted.
It would not have been easy to give a clearer illustration
of the truth that knowledge is power, than the case now
before us affords. Here was a small vessel, of less than a
hundred tons in measurement, with a crew of twelve men,
and armed with three guns, that was not only deemed to
be sufficient, but which was in fact amply sufficient to
change a dynasty among a people who counted their hosts
in thousands. The expedients of civilized life gave the
governor this ascendency, and he determined to use it
justly, and in moderation. It was his wish to avoid
bloodshed
;
and after learning all the facts he could, he set about
his task coolly and with prudence.
The first thing done, was to carry the schooner in,
within
reach of shot of Waally's principal fortress, where his
ruling chiefs resided, and which in fact was the hold where
about a hundred of his followers dwelt; fellows that kept
the whole island in fear, and who rendered it subservient
to Waally's wishes. This fortress, fort, or whatever it
should be called, was then summoned, its chief being
commanded
5 *
to quit, not only the hold, but the island
altogether
.
The answer was a defiance. As time was given for
the reception of this reply, measures had been taken to
support the summons by a suitable degree of concert and
activity. Ooroony landed in person, and got among his
friends on the island, who, assured of the support of the
schooner, took up arms to a man, and appeared in a force
that, of itself, was sufficient to drive Waally's men into the
sea. Nevertheless, the last made a show of resistance
until the governor fired his six-pounder at them. The shot
passed through the wooden pickets, and, though it hurt no
one, it made such a clatter, that the chief in command sent
out a palm-branch, and submitted. This bloodless conquest
caused a revolution at once, in several of the less important
islands, and in eight-and-forty hours, Ooroony found
himself
where he had been when Betts appeared in the
Neshamony
.
Waally was fain to make the best of matters, and
even he came in, acknowledged his crimes, obtained a
pardon, and paid tribute. The effect of this submission
on the part of Waally, was to establish Ooroony more
strongly than ever in authority, and to give him a chance
of reigning peacefully for the remainder of his days. All
this was done in less than a week after the war had begun
in earnest, by the invasion of the Reef!
The governor was too desirous to relieve the anxiety of
those he had left behind him to accept the invitations that
he, and his party, now received to make merry. He traded
a little with Ooroony's people, obtaining many things that
were useful in exchange for old iron, and other articles of
little or no value. What was more, he ascertained that
sandal-wood was to be found on Rancocus Island in small
quantities, and in this group in abundance. A contract
was made, accordingly, for the cutting and preparing of a
considerable quantity of this wood which was to be ready
for delivery in the course of three months, when it was
understood that the schooner was to return and take it in.
These arrangements completed, the Friend Abraham White
sailed for home.
Instead of entangling himself in the channels to leeward,
Mark made the land well to the northward, entering the
group by a passage that led him quite down to the Reef,
as the original island was now uniformly called, with a
flowing sheet. Of course the schooner was seen an hour
before she arrived, and everybody was out on the Reef to
greet the adventurers. Fears mingled with the other
manifestations
of joy, when the result of this great enterprise
came to be known. Mark had a delicious moment when
he folded the sobbing Bridget to his heart, and Friend
Martha was overcome in a way that it was not usual for
her to betray feminine weakness.
Everybody exulted in the success of the colony, and it
was hoped that the future would be as quiet as it was secure.
But recent events began to give the governor trouble, on
other accounts. The accession to his numbers, as well as
the fact that these men were seamen, and had belonged to
the Rancocus, set him thinking on the subject of his duty
to the owners of that vessel. So long as he supposed
himself
to be a cast-away, he had made use of their property
without compunction, but circumstances were now changed,
and he felt it to be a duty seriously to reflect on the
possibility
of doing something for the benefit of those who had,
undesignedly it is true, contributed so much to his own
comfort. In order to give this important subject a due
consideration, as well as to relieve the minds of those at
the Peak, the Abraham sailed for the cove the morning
after her arrival at the Reef. Bridget went across to pay
Anne a visit, and most of the men were of the party. The
Neshamony had carried over the intelligence of Waally's
repulse, and of the Abraham's having gone to that chief's
island, but the result of this last expedition remained to be
communicated.
The run was made in six hours, and the Abraham was
taken into the cove, and anchored there, just as easily as
one of the smaller craft. There was water enough for
anything that floated, the principal want being that of
room, though there was enough even of room to receive a
dozen vessels of size. The place, indeed, was a snug,
natural basin, rather than a port, but art could not have
made it safer, or even much more commodious. It was
all so small an island could ever require in the way of a
haven, it not being probable that the trade of the place
would reach an amount that the shipping it could hold
would not carry.
The governor now summoned a general council of the
colony. The seven seamen attended, as well as all the
others, one or two at the crater excepted, and the business
in hand was entered on soberly, and, in some respects,
solemnly. In the first place, the constitution and intentions
of the colonists were laid before the seven men, and they
were asked as to their wishes for the future. Four of these
men, including Brown, at once signed the constitution,
and were sworn in as citizens. It was their wish to pass
their days in that delicious climate, and amid the
abundance
of those rich and pleasing islands. The other three
engaged with Mark for a time, but expressed a desire to
return to America, after awhile. Wives were wanting;
and this the governor saw, plainly enough, was a difficulty
that must be got over, to keep the settlement contented.
Not that a wife may not make a man's home very
miserable
,
as well as very happy; but, most people prefer trying
the experiment for themselves, instead of profiting by the
experience of others.
As soon as the question of citizenship was decided, and
all the engagements were duly made, the governor laid his
question of conscience before the general council. For a
long time it had been supposed that the Rancocus could
not be moved. The eruption had left her in a basin, or
hole, where there was just water enough to float her, while
twelve feet was the most that could be found on the side
on which the channel was deepest. Now, thirteen feet aft
was the draught of the ship when she was launched. This
Bob well knew, having been launched in her. But, Brown
had suggested the possibility of lifting the vessel eighteen
inches or two feet, and of thus carrying her over the rock
by which she was imprisoned. Once liberated from that
place, every one knew there would be no difficulty in
getting
the ship to sea, since in one of the channels, that
which led to the northward, a vessel might actually carry
out fully five fathoms, or quite thirty feet. This channel
had been accurately sounded by the governor himself, and
of the fact he was well assured. Indeed, he had sounded
most of the true channels around the Reef. By true
channels
is meant those passages that led from the open water
quite up to the crater, or which admitted the passage of
vessels, or boats; while the false were
culs de sac
, through
which there were no real passages.
The possibility, thus admitted, of taking the Rancocus
to sea, a grave question of conscience arose. The property
belonged to certain owners in Philadelphia, and was it not
a duty to take it there? It is true, Friend Abraham White
and his partners had received back their money from the
insurersthis fact Bridget remembered to have heard
before
she left home; but those insurers, then, had their
claims. Now, the vessel was still sound and seaworthy.
Her upper works might require caulking, and her rigging
could not be of the soundest; but, on the whole, the
Rancocus
was still a very valuable ship, and a voyage might
be made for her yet. The governor thought that could
she get her lower hold filled with sandal-wood, and that
wood be converted into teas at Canton, as much would be
made as would render every one contented with the result
of the close of the voyage, disastrous as had been its
commencement
.
Then Bridget would be of age shortly, when
she would become entitled to an amount of property that,
properly invested, would contribute largely to the wealth
and power of the colony, as well as to those of its governor.
In musing on all these plans, Mark had not the least
idea of abandoning the scheme for colonizing. That was
dearer to him now than ever; nevertheless, he saw
obstacles
to their execution. No one could navigate the ship
but himself; in truth, he was the only proper person to
carry her home, and to deliver her to her owners,
whomsoever
those might now be, and he could not conceal from
himself the propriety, as well as the necessity, of his going in
her himself. On the other hand, what might not be the
consequences
to the colony, of his absence for twelve months?
A less time than that would not suffice to do all that was
required to be done. Could he take Bridget with him, or
could he bear to leave her behind? Her presence might
be necessary for the disposal of the real estate of which
she was the mistress, while her quitting the colony might
be the signal for breaking it up altogether, under the
impression
that the two persons most interested in it would
never return.
Thus did the management of this whole matter become
exceedingly delicate. Heaton and Betts, and in the end
all the rest, were of opinion that the Rancocus ought to be
sent back to America, for the benefit of those to whom she
now legally belonged. Could she get a cargo, or any
considerable
amount of sandal-wood, and exchange it for teas
in Canton, the proceeds of these teas might make a very
sufficient return for all the outlays of the voyage, as well
as for that portion of the property which had been used by
the colonists. The use of this property was a very different
thing, now, from what it was when Mark and Betts had
every reason to consider themselves as merely shipwrecked
seamen. Then, it was not only a matter of necessity, but,
through that necessity, one of right; but, now, the most
that could be said about it, was that it might be very
convenient
.
The principles of the colonists were yet too good
to allow of their deceiving themselves on this subject. They
had, most of them, engaged with the owners to take care
of this property, and it might be questioned, if such a wreck
had ever occurred as to discharge the crew. The rule in
such cases we believe to be, that, as seamen have a lien on
the vessel for their wages, when that lien ceases to be of
value, their obligations to the ship terminate. If the
Rancocus
could
be carried to America, no one belonging to her
was yet legally exonerated from his duties.
After weighing all these points, it was gravely and
solemnly declared that an effort should first be made to get
the ship out of her present duresse, and that the question
of future proceedings should then be settled in another
council. In the mean time, further and more valuable
presents were to be sent to both Ooroony and Waally, from
the stores of beads, knives, axes, &c., that were in the ship,
with injunctions to them to get as much sandal-wood as was
possible cut, and to have it brought down to the coast.
Betts was to carry the presents, in the Neshamony,
accompanied
by Jones, who spoke the language, when he was
to return and aid in the work upon the vessel.
The duty enjoined in these decisions was commenced
without delay. Heaton and Unus were left at the Peak, as
usual, to look after things in that quarter, and to keep the
mill from being idle, while all the rest of the men returned
to the Reef, and set about the work on the ship. The first
step taken was to send down all the spars and rigging that
remained aloft; after which everything was got up out of
the hold, and rolled, or dragged ashore. Of cargo, strictly
speaking, the Rancocus had very little in weight, but she
had a great many water-casks, four or five times as many as
would have been put into her in an ordinary voyage. These
casks had all been filled with fresh water, to answer the
double purpose of a supply for the people, and as ballast
for the ship. When these casks were all got on deck,
and the water was started, it was found that the vessel
floated several inches lighter than before. The sending
ashore of the spars, sails, rigging, lumber, provisions, &c.,
produced a still further effect, and, after carefully comparing
the soundings, and the present draught of the vessel, the
governor found it would be necessary to lift the last only
eight inches, to get her out of her natural dock. This
result greatly encouraged the labourers, who proceeded with
renewed spirit. As it would be altogether useless to
overhaul
the rigging, caulk decks, &c., unless the ship could
be got out of her berth, everybody worked with that end
in view at first. In the course of a week, the water-casks
were under her bottom, and it was thought that the vessel
would have about an inch to spare. A gale having blown
in the water, and a high tide coming at the same time, the
governor determined to try the experiment of crossing the
barrier. The order came upon the men suddenly, for no
one thought the attempt would be made, until the ship was
lifted an inch or two higher. But Mark saw what the wind
had been doing for them, and he lost not a moment. The
vessel was moved, brought head to her course, and the
lines were hauled upon. Away went the Rancocus, which
was now moved for the first time since the eruption!
Just as the governor fancied that the ship was going
clear, she struck aft. On examination it was found that
her heel was on a knoll of the rock, and that had she been
a fathom on either side of it, she would have gone clear.
The hold, however, was very slight, and by getting two of
the anchors to the cat-heads, the vessel was canted
sufficiently
to admit of her passing. Then came cheers for
success, and the cry of walk away with her! That
same day the Rancocus was hauled alongside of the Reef,
made fast, and secured just as she would have been at her
own wharf, in Philadelphia.
Now the caulkers began their part of the job. When
caulked and scraped, she was painted, her rigging was
overhauled and got into its places, the masts and yards
were sent aloft, and all the sails were overhauled. A tier
of casks, filled with fresh water, was put into her lower
hold for ballast, and all the stores necessary for the voyage
were sent on board her. Among other things overhauled
were the provisions. Most of the beef and pork was
condemned
,
and no small part of the bread; still, enough
remained
to take the ship's company to a civilized port. So
reluctant was the governor to come to the decision
concerning
the crew, that he even bent sails before a council
was again convened. But there was no longer any good
excuse for delay. Betts had long been back, and brought
the report that the sandal-wood was being hauled to the
coast in great quantities, both factions working with right
good will. In another month the ship might be loaded and
sail for America.
To the astonishment of every one, Bridget appeared in
the council, and announced her determination to remain
behind, while her husband carried the ship to her owners.
She saw and felt the nature of his duty, and could consent
to his performing it to the letter. Mark was quite taken
by surprise by this heroic and conscientious act in his
young wife, and he had a great struggle with himself on
the subject of leaving her behind him. Heaton, however,
was so very prudent, and the present relations with their
neighboursneighbours four hundred miles distantwere
so amicable, the whole matter was so serious, and the duty
so obvious, that he finally acquiesced, without suffering his
doubts to be seen.
The next thing was to select a crew. The three men
who had declined becoming citizens of the colony,
Johnson
,
Edwards, and Bright, all able seamen, went as a matter
of course. Betts would have to go in the character of
mate, though Bigelow might have got along in that
capacity
.
Betts knew nothing of navigation, while Bigelow
might find his way into port on a pinch. On the other
hand, Betts was a prime seaman  a perfect long-cue, in
fact  whereas the most that could be said of Bigelow,
in this respect, was that he was a stout, willing fellow, and
was much better than a raw hand. The governor named
Betts as his first, and Bigelow as his second officer. Brown
remained behind, having charge of the navy in the
governor's
absence. He had a private interview with Mark,
however, in which he earnestly requested that the governor
would have the goodness to pick out for him the sort of
gal that he thought would make a fellow a good and
virtuous
wife, and bring her out with him, in whatever way he
might return. Mark made as fair promises as the
circumstances
of the case would allow, and Brown was
satisfied
.
It was thought prudent to have eight white men on board
the ship, Mark intending to borrow as many more of
Ooroony's people, to help pull and haul. With such a
crew, he thought he might get along very well. Wattles
chose to remain with his friend Brown; but Dickinson and
Harris, though ready and willing to return, wished to sail
in the ship. Like Brown, they wanted wives, but chose to
select them for themselves. On this subject Wattles said
nothing. We may add here, that Unus and Juno were
united before the ship sailed. They took up land on the
Peak, where Unus erected for himself a very neat cabin.
Bridget set the young couple up, giving the furniture, a
pig, some fowls, and other necessaries.
At length the day for sailing arrived. Previously to
departing
,
Mark had carried the ship through the channel,
and she was anchored in a very good and safe roadstead,
outside of everything. The leave-taking took place on
board her. Bridget wept long in her husband's arms, but
finally got so far the command of herself, as to assume an
air of encouraging firmness among the other women. By
this time, it was every way so obvious Mark's presence
would be indispensable in America, that his absence was
regarded as a necessity beyond control. Still, it was hard
to part for a year, nor was the last embrace entirely free
from anguish. Friend Martha Betts took leave of Friend
Vol. II.  6
Robert with a great appearance of calmness, though she
felt the separation keenly. A quiet, warm-hearted woman,
she had made her husband very happy; and Bob was quite
sensible of her worth. But to him the sea was a home,
and he regarded a voyage round the world much as a
countryman would look upon a trip to market. He saw
his wife always in the vista created by his imagination, but
she was at the end of the voyage.
At the appointed hour, the Rancocus sailed, Brown and
Wattles going down with her in the Neshamony as far as
Betto's group, in order to bring back the latest intelligence
of her proceedings. The governor now got Ooroony to
assemble his priests and chiefs, and to pronounce a taboo
on all intercourse with the whites for one year. At the
end of that time, he promised to return, and to bring with
him presents that should render every one glad to welcome
him back. Even Waally was included in these
arrangements
;
and when Mark finally sailed, it was with a strong
hope that in virtue of the taboo, of Ooroony's power, and
of his rival's sagacity, he might rely on the colony's
meeting
with no molestation during his absence. The reader
will see that the Peak and Reef would be in a very
defenceless
condition, were it not for the schooner. By
means of that vessel, under the management of Brown,
assisted
by Wattles, Socrates and Unus, it is true, a fleet of
canoes might be beaten off; but any accident to the
Abraham
would be very likely to prove fatal to the colony, in the
event of an invasion. Instructions were given to Heaton
to keep the schooner moving about, and particularly to
make a trip as often as once in two months, to Ooroony's
country, in order to look after the state of things there.
The pretence was to be trade  beads, hatchets, and old
iron being taken each time, in exchange for sandal-wood;
but the principal object was to keep an eye on the
movements
,
and to get an insight into the policy, of the savages.
After taking in a very considerable quantity of
sandal-wood
,
and procuring eight active assistants from Ooroony,
the Rancocus got under way for Canton. By the
Neshamony
,
which saw her into the offing, letters were sent back
to the Reef, when the governor squared away for his port.
At the end of fifty days, the ship reached Canton, where a
speedy and excellent sale was made of her cargo. So very
lucrative did Mark make this transaction, that, finding
himself with assets after filling up with teas, he thought
himself justified in changing his course of proceeding. A
small American brig, which was not deemed fit to double
the capes, and to come on a stormy coast, was on sale.
She could run several years in a sea as mild as the Pacific,
and Mark purchased her for a song. He put as many
useful things on board her as he could find, including
several
cows, &c. Dry English cows were not difficult to
find, the ships from Europe often bringing out the animals,
and turning them off when useless. Mark was enabled to
purchase six, which, rightly enough, he thought would
prove a great acquisition to the colony. A plentiful
supply
of iron was also provided, as was ammunition, arms,
and guns. The whole outlay, including the cost of the
vessel, was less than seven thousand dollars; which sum
Mark knew he should receive in Philadelphia, on account
of the personal property of Bridget, and with which he
had made up his mind to replace the proceeds of the
sandal-wood
,
thus used, did those interested exact it. As for
the vessel, she sailed like a witch, was coppered and
copper-fastened
,
but was both old and weak. She had
quarters
,
having been used once as a privateer, and mounted
ten sixes. Her burthen was two hundred tons, and her
name the Mermaid. The papers were all American, and
in perfect rule.
The governor might not have made this purchase, had it
not been for the circumstance that he met an old
acquaintance
in Canton, who had got married in Calcutta to a
pretty and very well-mannered English girla step that
lost him his berth, however, on board a Philadelphia ship.
Saunders was two or three years Mark's senior, and of an
excellent disposition and character. When he heard the
history of the colony, he professed a desire to join it,
engaging
to pick up a crew of Americans, who were in his
own situation, or had no work on their hands, and to take the
brig to the Reef. This arrangement was made and carried
out; the Mermaid sailing for the crater, the day before the
Rancocus left for Philadelphia, having Bigelow on board
as pilot and first officer; while Woolston shipped an officer
to supply his place. The two vessels met in the China
seas, and passed a week in company, when each steered
her course; the governor quite happy in thinking that he
had made this provision for the good of his people. The
arrival of the Mermaid would be an eventful day in the
colony, on every account; and, the instructions of
Saunders
forbidding his quitting the islands until the end of the
year, her presence would be a great additional means of
security.
It is unnecessary for us to dwell on the passage of the
Rancocus. In due time she entered the capes of the
Delaware, surprising all interested with her appearance.
Friend Abraham White was dead, and the firm dissolved.
But the property had all been transferred to the insurers
by the payment of the amount underwritten, and Mark
made his report at the office. The teas were sold to great
advantage, and the whole matter was taken fairly into
consideration
.
After deducting the sum paid the firm,
principal
and interest, the insurance company resolved to give
the ship, and the balance of the proceeds of the sale, to
Captain Woolston, as a reward for his integrity and
prudence
.
Mark had concealed nothing, but stated what he
had done in reference to the Mermaid, and told his whole
story with great simplicity, and with perfect truth. The
result was, that the young man got, in addition to the ship,
which was legally conveyed to him, some eleven thousand
dollars in hard money. Thus was honesty shown to be the
best policy!
It is scarcely necessary to say that his success made
Mark Woolston a great man, in a small way. Not only
was he received with open arms by all of his own blood;
but Dr. Yardley now relented, and took him by the hand.
A faithful account was rendered of his stewardship; and
Mark received as much ready money, on account of his
wife, as placed somewhat more than twenty thousand
dollars
at his disposal. With this money he set to work,
without
losing a day, to make arrangements to return to Bridget
and the crater; for he always deemed that his proper abode,
in preference to the Peak. In this feeling, his charming
wife coincided; both probably encouraging a secret
interest
in the former, in consequence of the solitary hours
that had been passed there by the young husband, while
his anxious partner was far away.
CHAPTER V.
There is no gloom on earth, for God above
Chastens in love;
Transmuting sorrows into golden joy
Free from alloy.
His dearest attribute is still to bless,
And man's most welcome hymn is grateful cheerfulness.
Moral Alchemy
.
The
mode of proceeding now required great caution on
the part of Mark Woolston. His mind was fully made up
not to desert his islands, although this might easily be
done, by fitting out the ship for another voyage, filling her
with sandal-wood, and bringing off all who chose to
abandon
the place. But Woolston had become infatuated with
the climate, which had all the witchery of a low latitude
without any of its lassitude. The sea-breezes kept the
frame invigorated, and the air reasonably cool, even at the
Reef; while, on the Peak, there was scarcely ever a day,
in the warmest months, when one could not labour at noon.
In this respect the climate did not vary essentially from
that of Pennsylvania, the difference existing in the fact that
there was no winter in his new country. Nothing takes
such a hold on men as a delicious climate. They may not
be sensible of all its excellencies while in its enjoyment,
but the want of it is immediately felt, and has an influence
on all their pleasures. Even the scenery-hunter submits
to this witchery of climate, which casts a charm over the
secondary beauties of nature, as a sweet and placid temper
renders the face of woman more lovely than the colour of
a skin, or the brilliancy of fine eyes. The Alps and the
Apennines furnish a standing proof of the truth of this
6 *
fact. As respects grandeur, a startling magnificence, and
all that at first takes the reason, as well as the tastes, by
surprise, the first are vastly in advance of the last; yet, no
man of feeling or sentiment, probably ever dwelt a
twelvemonth
amid each, without becoming more attached to the
last. We wonder at Switzerland, while we get to love
Italy. The difference is entirely owing to climate; for, did
the Alps rise in a lower latitude, they would be absolutely
peerless.
But Mark Woolston had no thought of abandoning the
crater and the Peak. Nor did he desire to people them at
random, creating a population by any means, incorporating
moral diseases in his body politic by the measures taken to
bring it into existence. On the contrary, it was his wish,
rather, to procure just as much force as might be necessary
to security, so divided in pursuits and qualities as to
conduce
to comfort and civilization, and then to trust to the
natural increase for the growth that might be desirable in
the end. Such a policy evidently required caution and
prudence. The reader will perceive that governor
Woolston
was not influenced by the spirit of trade that is now
so active, preferring happiness to wealth, and morals to
power.
Among Woolston's acquaintances, there was a young
man of about his own age, of the name of Pennock, who
struck him as a person admirably suited for his purposes.
This Pennock had married very young, and was already
the father of three children. He began to feel the pressure
of society, for he was poor. He was an excellent farmer,
accustomed to toil, while he was also well educated, having
been intended for one of the professions. To Pennock
Mark told his story, exhibited his proofs, and laid bare his
whole policy, under a pledge of secresy, offering at the
same time to receive his friend, his wife, children, and two
unmarried sisters, into the colony. After taking time to
reflect and to consult, Pennock accepted the offer as
frankly
as it had been made. From this time John Pennock
relieved the governor, in a great measure, of the duty of
selecting the remaining emigrants, taking that office on
himself. This allowed Mark to attend to his purchases,
and to getting the ship ready for sea. Two of his own
brothers, however, expressed a wish to join the new
community
,
and Charles and Abraham Woolston were received
in the colony lists. Half-a-dozen more were admitted, by
means of direct application to the governor himself, though
the accessions were principally obtained through the
negotiations
and measures of Pennock. All was done with
great secresy, it being Mark's anxious desire, on many
accounts
,
not to attract public attention to his colony.
The reasons were numerous and sufficient for this wish
to remain unknown. In the first place, the policy of
retaining
the monopoly of a trade that must be enormously
profitable, was too obvious to need any arguments to
support
it. So long as the sandal-wood lasted, so long would
it be in the power of the colonists to coin money; while
it was certain that competitors would rush in, the moment
the existence of this mine of wealth should be known.
Then, the governor apprehended the cupidity and ambition
of the old-established governments, when it should be
known that territory was to be acquired. It was scarcely
possible for man to possess any portion of this earth by a
title better than that with which Mark Woolston was
invested
with his domains. But, what is right compared to
might! Of his native country, so abused in our own times
for its rapacity, and the desire to extend its dominions by
any means, Mark felt no apprehension. Of all the
powerful
nations of the present day, America, though not
absolutely
spotless, has probably the least to reproach herself
with, on the score of lawless and purely ambitious
acquisitions
.
Even her conquests in open was have been few,
and are not yet determined in character. In the end, it
will be found that little will be taken that Mexico could
keep; and had that nation observed towards this, ordinary
justice and faith, in her intercourse and treaties, that which
has so suddenly and vigorously been done, would never
have even been attempted.
It may suit the policy of those who live under the same
system, to decry those who do not; but men are not so
blind that they cannot see the sun at noon-day. One
nation
makes war because its consul receives the rap of a
fan; and men of a different origin, religion and habits, are
coerced into submission as the consequence. Another
nation burns towns, and destroys their people in thousands,
because their governors will not consent to admit a
poisonous
drug into their territories; an offence against the laws
of trade that can only be expiated by the ruthless march
of the conqueror. Yet the ruling men of both these
communities
affect a great sensibility when the long-slumbering
young lion of the West rouses himself in his lair, after
twenty years of forbearance, and stretches out a paw in
resentment for outrages that no other nation, conscious of
his strength, would have endured for as many months,
because
,
forsooth, he
is
the young lion of the West. Never
mind: by the time New Zealand and Tahiti are brought
under the yoke, the Californians may be admitted to an
equal participation in the rights of American citizens.
The governor was fully aware of the danger he ran of
having claims, of some sort or other, set up to his islands,
if he revealed their existence; and he took the greatest
pains to conceal the fact. The arrival of the Rancocus
was mentioned in the papers, as a matter of course; but it
was in a way to induce the reader to suppose she had met
with her accident in the midst of a naked reef, and
principally
through the loss of her men; and that, when a few
of the last were regained, the voyage was successfully
resumed
and terminated. In that day, the great discovery
had not been made that men were merely incidents of
newspapers; but the world had the folly to believe that
newspapers were incidents of society, and were subject to
its rules and interests. Some respect was paid to private
rights, and the reign of gossip had not commenced.
[1]
[1]
We hold in our possession a curious document, the publication
of which might rebuke this spirit of gossip, and give a salutary
warning to certain managers of the press, who no sooner hear a
rumour than they think themselves justified in embalming it among
the other truths of their daily sheets. The occurrences of life
brought us in collision, legally, with an editor; and we obtained a
verdict against him. Dissatisfied with defeat, as is apt to be the
case, he applied for a new trial. Such an application was to be
sustained by affidavits, and he made his own, as usual. Now, in
this affidavit, our competitor swore distinctly and unequivocally to
certain alleged facts (we think to the number of six), every one
of which was untrue. Fortunately for the party implicated, the
matter sworn to was purely
ad captandum
stuff, and, in a legal
sense, not pertinent to the issue. This prevented it from being
perjury in law. Still, it was all untrue, and nothing was easier
than to show it. Now, we do not doubt that the person thus
swearing
believed
all that he swore to, or he would not have had
the extreme folly to expose himself as he did; but he was so much
in the habit of publishing gossip in his journal, that, when an
occasion
arrived, he did not hesitate about swearing to what he had
read in other journals, without taking the trouble to inquire if it
were true! One of these days we may lay all this, along with
much other similar proof of the virtue there is in gossip, so plainly
before the world, that he who runs may read.
In the last century, however, matters were not carried
quite so far as they are at present. No part of this
community
,
claiming any portion of respectability, was willing
to publish its own sense of inferiority so openly, as to
gossip
about its fellow-citizens, for no more direct admissions
of inferiority can be made than this wish to comment on
the subject of any one's private concerns. Consequently
Mark and his islands escaped. There was no necessity
for his telling the insurers anything about the Peak, for
instance, and on that part of the subject, therefore, he
wisely held his tongue. Nothing, in short, was said of any
colony at all. The manner in which the crew had been
driven away to leeward, and recovered, was told minutely,
and the whole process by which the ship was saved. The
property used, Mark said had been appropriated to his
wants, without going into details, and the main results
being so very satisfactory, the insurers asked no further.
As soon as off the capes, the governor set about a serious
investigation of the state of his affairs. In the way of
cargo, a great many articles had been laid in, which
experience
told him would be useful. He took with him
such farming tools as Friend Abraham White had not
thought of furnishing to the natives of Fejee, and a few
seeds that had been overlooked by that speculating
philanthropist
.
There were half a dozen more cows on board,
as well as an improved breed of hogs. Mark carried out,
also, a couple of mares, for, while many horses could never
be much needed in his islands, a few would always be
exceedingly
useful. Oxen were much wanted, but one of
his new colonists had yoked his cows, and it was thought
they might be made useful, in a moderate degree, until
their stouter substitutes could be reared. Carts and
wagons
were provided in sufficient numbers. A good stock
of iron in bars was laid in, in addition to that which was
wrought into nails, and other useful articles. Several
thousand dollars in coin were also provided, being
principally
in small pieces, including copper. But all the
emigrants
took more or less specie with them.
A good deal of useful lumber was stowed in the lower
hold, though the mill by this time furnished a pretty good
home supply. The magazine was crammed with
ammunition
,
and the governor had purchased four light field-guns,
two three-pounders and two twelve-pound howitzers, with
their equipments. He had also brought six long iron
twelves, ship-guns, with their carriages &c. The last he
intended for his batteries, the carronades being too light
for steady work, and throwing their shot too wild for a
long range. The last could be mounted on board the
different
vessels. The Rancocus, also, had an entire new
armament, having left all her old guns but two behind
her. Two hundred muskets were laid in, with fifty brace
of pistols. In a word, as many arms were provided as it
was thought could, in any emergency, become necessary.
But it was the human portion of his cargo that the
governor, rightly enough, deemed to be of the greatest
importance. Much care had been bestowed on the
selection
,
which had given all concerned in it not a little
trouble
.
Morals were the first interest attended to. No one
was received but those who bore perfectly good characters.
The next thing was to make a proper division among the
various trades and pursuits of life. There were
carpenters
,
masons, blacksmiths, tailors, shoemakers, &c., or, one
of each, and sometimes more. Every man was married,
the only exceptions being in the cases of younger brothers
and sisters, of whom about a dozen were admitted along
with their relatives. The whole of the ships' betwixt
decks was fitted up for the reception of these emigrants,
who were two hundred and seven in number, besides
children
.
Of the last there were more than fifty, but they
were principally of an age to allow of their being put into
holes and corners.
Mark Woolston was much too sensible a man to fall into
any of the modern absurdities on the subject of equality,
and a community of interests. One or two individuals,
even in that day, had wished to accompany him, who were
for forming an association in which all property should be
shared in common, and in which nothing was to be done
but that which was right. Mark had not the least
objection
in the world to the last proposition, and would have
been glad enough to see it carried out to the letter, though
he differed essentially with the applicants, as to the mode
of achieving so desirable an end. He was of opinion that
civilization could not exist without property, or property
without a direct personal interest in both its accumulation
and its preservation. They, on the other hand, were
carried
away by the crotchet that community-labour was better
than individual labour, and that a hundred men would be
happier and better off with their individualities compressed
into one, than by leaving them in a hundred subdivisions, as
they had been placed by nature. The theorists might have
been right, had it been in their power to compress a
hundred
individuals into one, but it was not. After all their
efforts, they would still remain a hundred individuals, merely
banded together under more restraints, and with less liberty
than are common.
Of all sophisms, that is the broadest which supposes
personal
liberty is extended by increasing the power of the
community. Individuality is annihilated in a thousand
things, by the community-power that already exists in this
country, where persecution often follows from a man's
thinking and acting differently from his neighbours, though
the law professes to protect him. The reason why this
power becomes so very formidable, and is often so
oppressively
tyrannical in its exhibition, is very obvious. In
countries where the power is in the hands of the few, public
sympathy often sustains the man who resists its injustice;
but no public sympathy can sustain him who is oppressed
by the public itself. This oppression does not often exhibit
itself in the form of law, but rather in its denial. He, who
has a clamour raised against him by numbers, appeals in
vain to numbers for justice, though his claim may be clear
as the sun at noon-day. The divided responsibility of
bodies
of men prevents anything like the control of
conscience
,
and the most ruthless wrongs are committed,
equally without reflection and without remorse.
Mark Woolston had thought too much on the subject, to
be the dupe of any of these visionary theories. Instead of
fancying that men never knew anything previously to the
last ten years of the eighteenth century, he was of the
opinion of the wisest man who ever lived, that `there was
nothing new under the sun.' That `circumstances might
alter cases' he was willing enough to allow, nor did he
intend to govern the crater by precisely the same laws as
he would govern Pennsylvania, or Japan; but he well
understood
,
nevertheless, that certain great moral truths existed
as the law of the human family, and that they were not to
be set aside by visionaries; and least of all, with impunity.
Everything connected with the colony was strictly
practical
.
The decision of certain points had unquestionably given
the governor trouble, though he got along with them pretty
well, on the whole. A couple of young lawyers had desired
to go, but he had the prudence to reject them. Law, as a
science, is a very useful study, beyond a question; but
the governor, rightly enough, fancied that his people could
do without so much science for a few years longer. Then
another doctor volunteered his services. Mark
remembered
the quarrels between his father and his father-in-law,
and thought it better to die under one theory than under
two. As regards a clergyman, Mark had greater
difficulty
.
The question of sect was not as seriously debated
half a century ago as it is to-day; still it was debated.
Bristol had a very ancient society, of the persuasion of
the Anglican church, and Mark's family belonged to it.
Bridget, however, was a Presbyterian, and no small
portion
of the new colonists were what is called Wet-Quakers;
that is, Friends who are not very particular in their
opinions
or observances. Now, religion often caused more
feuds than anything else; still it was impossible to have a
priest for every persuasion, and one ought to suffice for the
whole colony. The question was of what sect should that
one clergyman be? So many prejudices were to be
consulted
,
that the governor was about to abandon the project
in despair, when accident determined the point. Among
Heaton's relatives was a young man of the name of
Hornblower
,
no bad appellation, by the way, for one who had
to sound so many notes of warning, who had received
priest's orders from the hands of the well-known Dr.
White, so long the presiding Bishop of America, and
whose constitution imperiously demanded a milder climate
than that in which he then lived. As respects him, it
became
a question purely of humanity, the divine being too
poor to travel on his own account, and he was received on
board the Rancocus, with his wife, his sister, and two
children, that he might have the benefit of living within
the tropics. The matter was fully explained to the other
emigrants, who could not raise objections if they would,
but who really were not disposed to do so in a case of
such obvious motives. A good portion of them; probably,
came to the conclusion that Episcopalian ministrations
were better than none, though, to own the truth, the
liturgy gave a good deal of scandal to a certain portion of
their number.
Reading
prayers was so profane a thing,
that these individuals could scarcely consent to be present
at such a vain ceremony; nor was the discontent, on this
preliminary point, fully disposed of until the governor once
asked the principal objector how he got along with the
Lord's Prayer, which was not only written and printed,
but which usually was committed to memory!
Notwithstanding
this difficulty, the emigrants did get along with it
without many qualms, and most of them dropped quietly
into the habit of worshipping agreeably to a liturgy, just
as if it were not the terrible profanity that some of them
had imagined. In this way, many of our most intense
prejudices
get lost in new communications.
It is not our intention to accompany the Rancocus,
day by day, in her route. She touched at Rio, and
sailed again at the end of eight and forty hours. The
passage round the Horn was favourable, and having got
well to the westward, away the ship went for her port.
One of the cows got down, and died before it could be
relieved
,
in a gale off the cape; but no other accident worth
mentioning occurred. A child died with convulsions, in
consequence of teething, a few days later; but this did not
diminish the number on board, as three were born the
Vol. II.  7
same week. The ship had now been at sea one hundred
and sixty days, counting the time passed at Rio, and a
general impatience to arrive pervaded the vessel. If the
truth must be said, some of the emigrants began to doubt
the governor's ability to find his islands again, though none
doubted of their existence. The Kannakas, however,
declared
that they began to smell home, and it is odd enough,
that this declaration, coming as it did from ignorant men,
who made it merely on a fanciful suggestion, obtained
more credit with most of the emigrants, than all the
governor's
instruments and observations.
One day, a little before noon it was, Mark appeared on
deck with his quadrant, and as he cleaned the glasses of
the instrument, he announced his conviction that the ship
would shortly make the group of the crater. A current
had set him further north than he intended to go, but
having hauled up to southwest, he waited only for noon to
ascertain his latitude, to be certain of his position. As
the governor maintained a proper distance from his people,
and was not in the habit of making unnecessary
communications
to them, his present frankness told for so much
the more, and it produced a very general excitement in the
ship. All eyes were on the look-out for land, greatly
increasing
the chances of its being shortly seen. The
observation
came at noon, as is customary, and the governor
found he was about thirty miles to the northward of the
group of islands he was seeking. By his calculation, he
was still to the eastward of it, and he hauled up, hoping to
fall in with the land well to windward. After standing on
three hours in the right direction, the look-outs from the
cross-trees declared no land was visible ahead. For one
moment the dreadful apprehension of the group's having
sunk under another convulsion of nature crossed Mark's
mind, but he entertained that notion for a minute only.
Then came the cry of sail ho! to cheer everybody, and
to give them something else to think of.
This was the first vessel the Rancocus had seen since
she left Rio. It was to windward, and appeared to be
standing down before the wind. In an hour's time the
two vessels were near enough to each other to enable the
glass to distinguish objects; and the quarter-deck, on board
the Rancocus, were all engaged in looking at the
stranger
.
'Tis the Mermaid, said Mark to Betts, and it's all
right. Though what that craft can be doing here to
windward
of the islands is more than I can imagine!
Perhaps, sir, they's a cruising arter us, answered
Bob. This is about the time they ought to be expectin'
on us; and who knows but Madam Woolston and Friend
Marthy may not have taken it into their heads to come out
a bit to see arter their lawful husbands?
The governor smiled at this conceit, but continued his
observations in silence.
She behaves very strangely, Betts, Mark, at length,
said. Just take a look at her. She yaws like a galliot
in a gale, and takes the whole road like a drunken man.
There can be no one at the helm.
And how lubberly, sir, her canvas is set! Just look at
that main-taw-sail, sir; one of the sheets isn't home by a
fathom, while the yard is braced in, till it 's almost aback!
The governor walked the deck for five minutes in
intense
thought, though occasionally he stopped to look at
the brig, now within a league of them. Then he suddenly
called out to Bob, to see all clear for action, and to get
everything ready to go to quarters.
This order set every one in motion. The women and
children were hurried below, and the men, who had been
constantly exercised, now, for five months, took their
stations
with the regularity of old seamen. The guns were
cast looseten eighteen-pound carronades and two nines,
the new armamentcartridges were got ready, shot placed
at hand, and all the usual dispositions for combat were
made. While this was doing, the two vessels were fast
drawing nearer to each other, and were soon within
gun-shot
.
But, no one on board the Rancocus knew what to
make of the evolutions of the Mermaid. Most of her
ordinary
square-sails were set, though not one of them all
was sheeted home, or well hoisted. An attempt had been
made to lay the yards square, but one yard-arm was braced
in too far, another not far enough, and nothing like order
appeared to have prevailed at the sail-trmming. But, the
conning of the brig was the most remarkable. Her general
course would seem to be dead before the wind; but she
yawed incessantly, and often so broadly, as to catch some
of her light sails aback. Most vessels take a good deal of
room in running down before the wind, and in a swell;
but the Mermaid took a great deal more than was
common
,
and could scarce be said to look any way in
particular
.
All this the governor observed, as the vessels
approached nearer and nearer, as well as the movements
of those of the crew who showed themselves in the
rigging
.
Clear away a bow-gun, cried Mark, to Betts
something
dreadful must have happened; that brig is in
possession
of the savages, who do not know how to handle her!
This announcement produced a stir on board the
Rancocus
,
as may well be imagined. If the savages had the
brig, they probably had the group also; and what had
become
of the colonists? The next quarter of an hour was
one of the deepest expectation with all in the ship, and of
intense agony with Mark. Betts was greatly disturbed
also; nor would it have been safe for one of Waally's men
to have been within reach of his arm, just then. Could it
be possible that Ooroony had yielded to temptation and
played them false? The governor could hardly believe it;
and, as for Betts, he protested loudly it could not be so.
Is that bow-gun ready? demanded the governor.
Ay, ay, sir; all ready.
Fire, but elevate well we will only frighten them, at
first. Wo betide them, if they resist.
Betts did fire, and to the astonishment of everybody, the
brig returned a broadside! But resistance ceased with this
one act of energy, if it could be so termed. Although five
guns were actually fired, and nearly simultaneously, no
aim was even attempted. The shot all flew off at a
tangent
from the position of the ship; and no harm was done
to any but the savages themselves, of whom three or four
were injured by the recoils. From the moment the noise
and smoke were produced, everything like order ceased
on board the brig, which was filled with savages. The
vessel broached to, and the sails caught aback. All this
time, the Rancocus was steadily drawing nearer, with an
intent to board; but, unwilling to expose his people, most
of whom were unpractised in strife, in a hand-to-hand
conflict
with ferocious savages, the governor ordered a gun
loaded with grape to be discharged into the brig. This
decided the affair at once. Half a dozen were killed or
wounded; some ran below; a few took refuge in the top;
but most, without the slightest hesitation, jumped
overboard
.
To the surprise of all who saw them, the men in
the water began to swim directly to windward; a
circumstance
which indicated that either land or canoes were to
be found in that quarter of the ocean. Seeing the state
of things on board the brig, Mark luffed up under her
counter, and laid her aboard. In a minute, he and twenty
chosen men were on her decks; in another, the vessels
were again clear of each other, and the Mermaid under
command.
No sooner did the governor discharge his duties as a
seaman, than he passed below. In the cabin he found Mr.
Saunders, (or Captain Saunders, as he was called by the
colonists,) bound hand and foot. His steward was in the
same situation, and Bigelow was found, also a prisoner, in
the steerage. These were all the colonists on board, and
all but two who had been on board, when the vessel was
taken.
Captain Saunders could tell the governor very little more
than he saw with his own eyes. One fact of importance,
however, he could and did communicate, which was this:
Instead of being to windward of the crater, as Mark
supposed
,
he was to leeward of it; the currents no doubt
having set the ship to the westward faster than had been
thought. Rancocus Island would have been made by
sunset
,
had the ship stood on in the course she was steering
when she made the Mermaid.
But the most important fact was the safety of the
females
.
They were all at the Peak, where they had lived
for the last six months, or ever since the death of the good
Ooroony had again placed Waally in the ascendant.
Ooroony's son was overturned immediately on the decease
of the father, who died a natural death, and Waally
disregarded
the taboo, which he persuaded his people could
have no sanctity as applied to the whites. The plunder of
these last, with the possession of the treasure of iron and
7 *
copper that was to be found in their vessels, had indeed
been the principal bribe with which the turbulent and
ambitious chief regained his power. The war did not
break out, however, as soon as Waally had effected the
revolution in his own group. On the contrary, that wily
politician had made so many protestations of friendship
after that event, which he declared to be necessary to the
peace of his island; had collected so much sandal-wood,
and permitted it to be transferred to the crater, where a
cargo was already stored; and had otherwise made so
many amicable demonstrations, as completely to deceive
the colonists. No one had anticipated an invasion; but,
on the contrary, preparations were making at the Peak for
the reception of Mark, whose return had now been
expected
daily for a fortnight.
The Mermaid had brought over a light freight of wood
from Betto's group, and had discharged at the crater. This
done, she had sailed with the intention of going out to
cruise for the Rancocus, to carry the news of the colony,
all of which was favourable, with the exception of the
death of Ooroony and the recent events; but was lying in
the roads, outside of everything  the Western Roads, as
they were called, or those nearest to the other group
waiting for the appointed hour of sailing, which was to be
the very morning of the day in which she was fallen in
with by the governor. Her crew consisted only of
Captain
Saunders, Bigelow, the cook and steward, and two
of the people engaged at Canton  one of whom was a
very good-for-nothing Chinaman. The two last had the
look-out, got drunk, and permitted a fleet of hostile canoes
to get alongside in the dark, being knocked on the head
and tossed overboard, as the penalty of this neglect of
duty. The others owed their lives to the circumstance of
being taken in their sleep, when resistance was out of the
question. In the morning, the brig's cable was cut, sail
was set, after a fashion, and an attempt was made to carry
the vessel over to Betto's group. It is very questionable
whether she ever could have arrived; but that point was
disposed of by the opportune appearance of the
Rancocus
.
Saunders could communicate nothing of the subsequent
course of the invaders. He had been kept below the whole
time, and did not even know how many canoes composed
the fleet. The gang in possession of the Mermaid was
understood, however, to be but a very small part of Waally's
force present, that chief leading in person. By certain
half-comprehended declarations of his conquerors, Captain
Saunders understood that the rest had entered the channel,
with a view to penetrate to the crater, where Socrates,
Unus and Wattles were residing, with their wives and
families
,
and where no greater force was left when the
Mermaid
sailed. The property there, however, was out of all
proportion in value to the force of those whose business it
was to take care of it. In consequence of the Rancocus's
removal, several buildings had been constructed on the
Reef, and one house of very respectable dimensions had
been put up on the Summit. It is true, these houses were
not very highly finished; but they were of great value to
persons in the situation of the colonists. Most of the hogs,
moreover, were still rooting and tearing up the
thousand-acre
prairie; where, indeed, they roamed very much in a
state of nature. Socrates occasionally carried to them a
boat-load of `truck' from the crater, in order to keep up
amicable relations with them; but they were little better
than so many wild animals, in one sense, though there had
not yet been time materially to change their natures. In
the whole, including young and old, there must have been
near two hundred of these animals altogether, their
increase
being very rapid. Then, a large amount of the
stores sent from Canton, including most of the iron, was
in store at the crater; all of which would lay at the mercy
of Waally's men; for the resistance to be expected from
the three in possession, could not amount to much.
The governor was prompt enough in his decision, as
soon as he understood the facts of the case. The first
thing was to bring the vessels close by the wind, and to
pass as near as possible over the ground where the
swimmers
were to be found; for Mark could not bear the idea
of abandoning a hundred of his fellow-creatures in the
midst of the ocean, though they were enemies and savages.
By making short stretches, and tacking two or three times,
the colonists found themselves in the midst of the
swimmers
;
not one in ten of whom would probably ever have
reached the land, but for the humanity of their foe.
Alongside
of the Mermaid were three or four canoes; and these
were cast adrift at the right moment, without any
parleying
.
The Indians were quick enough at understanding the
meaning of this, and swam to the canoes from all sides,
though still anxious to get clear of the vessels. On board
the last canoe the governor put all his prisoners, when he
deemed himself happily quit of the whole gang.
There were three known channels by which the
Rancocus
could be carried quite up to the crater. Mark chose
that which came in from the northward, both because it
was the nearest, and because he could lay his course in it,
without tacking, for most of the way. Acquainted now
with his position, Mark had no difficulty in finding the
entrance of this channel. Furnishing the Mermaid with
a dozen hands, she was sent to the western roads, to
intercept
Waally's fleet, should it be coming out with the booty.
In about an hour after the Rancocus altered her course,
she made the land; and, just as the sun was setting, she
got so close in as to be able to anchor in the northern
roads, where there was not only a lee, but good
holding-ground
.
Here the ship passed the night, the governor not
liking to venture into the narrow passages in the dark.
CHAPTER VI.
Fancy can charm and feeling bless
With sweeter hours than fashion knows;
There is no calmer quietness,
Than home around the bosom throws.
Percival
.
Although
the governor deemed it prudent to anchor for
the night, he did not neglect the precaution of
reconnoitring
.
Betts was sent towards the Reef, in a boat well
armed and manned, in order to ascertain the state of things
in that quarter. His instructions directed him to push
forward
as far as he could, and if possible to hold some sort
of communication with Socrates, who might now be
considered
as commander at the point assailed.
Fortunate was it that the governor bethought him of this
measure. As Betts had the ship's launch, which carried two
lugg-sails, his progress was both easy and rapid, and he
actually got in sight of the Reef before midnight. To his
astonishment, all seemed to be tranquil, and Betts at first
believed that the savages had completed their work and
departed. Being a bold fellow, however, a distant
reconnoitring
did not satisfy him; and on he went, until his
boat fairly lay alongside of the natural quay of the Reef
itself. Here he landed, and marched towards the entrance
of the crater. The gate was negligently open, and on
entering the spacious area, the men found all quiet,
without
any indications of recent violence. Betts knew that
those who dwelt in this place, usually preferred the
Summit
for sleeping, and he ascended to one of the huts that
had been erected there. Here he found the whole of the
little garrison of the group, buried in sleep, and totally
without any apprehension of the danger which menaced
them. As it now appeared, Waally's men had not yet
shown themselves, and Socrates knew nothing at all of
what had happened to the brig.
Glad enough was the negro to shake hands with Betts,
and to hear that Master Mark was so near at hand, with a
powerful reinforcement. The party already arrived might
indeed be termed the last, for the governor had sent with
his first officer, on this occasion, no less than
five-and-twenty
men, each completely armed. With such a
garrison
,
Betts deemed the crater safe, and he sent back the
launch, with four seamen in it, to report the condition in
which he had found matters, and to communicate all else
that he had learned. This done, he turned his attention
to the defences of the place.
According to Socrates' account, no great loss in
property
would be likely to occur, could the colonists make
good the Reef against their invaders. The Abraham was
over at the Peak, safe enough in the cove, as was the
Neshamony
and several of the boats, only two or three of the
smaller of the last being with him. The hogs and cows
were most exposed, though nearly half of the stock was
now habitually kept on the Peak. Still, a couple of
hundred
hogs were on the prairie, as were no less than eight
horned cattle, including calves. The loss of the last would
be greatly felt, and it was much to be feared, since the
creatures were very gentle, and might be easily caught.
Betts, however, had fewer apprehensions touching the cattle
than for the hogs, since the latter might be slain with arrows,
while he was aware that Waally wished to obtain the first
alive.
Agreeably to the accounts of Socrates, the progress of
vegetation had been very great throughout the entire group.
Grass grew wherever the seed was sown, provided anything
like soil existed, and the prairie was now a vast range, most
of which was green, and all of which was firm enough to
bear a hoof. The trees, of all sorts, were flourishing also,
and Betts was assured he would not know the group again
when he came to see it by day-light. All this was pleasant
intelligence, at least, to the eager listeners among the new
colonists, who had now been so long on board ship, that
anything in the shape of
terra firma
, and of verdure
appeared
to them like paradise. But Betts had too many
things to think of, just then, to give much heed to the
eulogium of Socrates, and he soon bestowed all his
attention
on the means of defence.
As there was but one way of approaching the crater,
unless by water, and that was along the hog pasture and
across the plank bridge, Bob felt the prudence of
immediately
taking possession of the pass. He ordered Socrates
to look to the gate, where he stationed a guard, and went
himself, with ten men, to make sure of the bridge. It was
true, Waally's men could swim, and would not be very apt
to pause long at the basin; but, it would be an advantage
to fight them while in the water, that ought not to be
thrown away. The carronades were all loaded, moreover;
and these precautions taken, and sentinels posted, Betts
suffered his men to sleep on their arms, if sleep they could.
Their situation was so novel, that few availed themselves
of the privilege, though their commanding officer, himself,
was soon snoring most musically.
As might have been expected, Waally made his assault
just as the day appeared. Before that time, however, the
launch had got back to the ship, and the latter was under
way, coming fast towards the crater. Unknown to all,
though anticipated by Mark, the Mermaid had entered the
western passage, and was beating up through it, closing
fast also on Waally's rear. Such was the state of things,
when the yell of the assailants was heard.
Waally made his first push for the bridge, expecting to
find it unguarded, and hoping to cross it unresisted. He
knew that the ship was gone, and no longer dreaded
her
fire; but he was fully aware that the Summit had its guns,
and he wished to seize them while his men were still
impelled
by the ardour of a first onset. Those formidable
engines of war were held in the most profound respect by
all his people, and Waally knew the importance of success
in a rapid movement. He had gleaned so much
information
concerning the state of the Reef, that he expected no
great resistance, fully believing that, now he had seized
the Mermaid, his enemies would be reduced in numbers
to less than half-a-dozen. In all this, he was right enough;
and there can be no question that Socrates and his whole
party, together with the Reef, and for that matter, the
entire group, would have fallen into his hands, but for the
timely arrival of the reinforcement. The yell arose when
it was ascertained that the bridge was drawn in, and it
was succeeded by a volley from the guard posted near it,
on the Reef. This commenced the strife, which
immediately
raged with great fury, and with prodigious clamour.
Waally had all his muskets fired, too, though as yet he saw
no enemy, and did not know in what direction to aim.
He could see men moving about on the Reef, it is true,
but it was only at moments, as they mostly kept themselves
behind the covers. After firing his muskets, the chief
issued an order for a charge, and several hundreds of his
warriors plunged into the basin, and began to swim
towards
the point to be assailed. This movement
admonished
Betts of the prudence of retiring towards the gate,
which he did in good order, and somewhat deliberately.
This time, Waally actually got his men upon the Reef,
without a panic and without loss. They landed in a crowd,
and were soon rushing in all directions, eager for plunder,
and thirsting for blood. Betts was enabled,
notwithstanding
,
to enter the gate, which he did without delay,
perfectly
satisfied that all efforts of his to resist the torrent
without must be vain. As soon as his party had entered,
the gate was closed, and Betts was at liberty to bestow all
his care on the defence of the crater.
The great extent of the citadel, which contained an area
of not less than a hundred acres, it will be remembered,
rendered its garrison very insufficient for a siege. It is
probable that no one there would have thought of
defending
it, but for the certainty of powerful support being at
hand. This certainty encouraged the garrison, rendering
their exertions more ready and cheerful. Betts divided
his men into parties of two, scattering them along the
Summit, with orders to be vigilant, and to support each
other. It was well known that a man could not enter from
without unless by the gate, or aided by ladders, or some
other mechanical invention. The time necessary to
provide
the last would bring broad daylight, and enable the
colonists to march such a force to the menaced point, as
would be pretty certain to prove sufficient to resist the
assailants. The gate itself was commanded by a carronade,
and was watched by a guard.
Great was the disappointment of Waally when he
ascertained
,
by personal examination, that the Summit could
not be scaled, even by the most active of his party, without
recourse to assistance, by means of artificial contrivances.
He had the sagacity to collect all his men immediately
beneath
the natural walls, where they were alone safe from
the fire of the guns, but where they were also useless. A
large pile of iron, an article so coveted, was in plain sight,
beneath a shed, but he did not dare to send a single hand
to touch it, since it would have brought the adventurer
under fire. A variety of other articles, almost as tempting,
though not perhaps of the same intrinsic value, lay also in
sight, but were tabooed by the magic of powder and balls.
Eleven hundred warriors, as was afterwards ascertained,
landed on the Reef that eventful morning, and assembled
under the walls of the crater. A hundred more remained
in the canoes, which lay about a league off, in the western
passage, or to leeward, awaiting the result of the enterprise.
The first effort made by Waally was to throw a force
upward, by rearing one man on another's shoulders. This
scheme succeeded in part, but the fellow who first showed
his head above the perpendicular part of the cliff, received
a bullet in his brains. The musket was fired by the hands
of Socrates. This one discharge brought down the whole
fabric, several of those who fell sustaining serious injuries,
in the way of broken bones. The completely isolated
position
of the crater, which stood, as it might be, aloof from
all surrounding objects, added materially to its strength in
a military sense, and Waally was puzzled how to overcome
difficulties that might have embarrassed a more civilized
soldier. For the first time in his life, that warrior had
encountered a sort of fortress, which could be entered only
by regular approaches, unless it might be carried by a
coup de main
. At the latter the savages were expert
enough, and on it they had mainly relied; but, disappointed
in this respect, they found themselves thrown back on
resources
that were far from being equal to the emergency.
Tired of inactivity, Waally finally decided on making a
desperate effort. The ship-yard was still kept up as a place
for the repairing of boats, &c., and it always had more or
less lumber lying in, or near it. Selecting a party of a
hundred resolute men, and placing them under the orders
of one of his bravest chiefs, Waally sent them off, on the
run, to bring as much timber, boards, planks, &c., as they
could carry, within the cover of the cliffs. Now, Betts
had foreseen the probability of this very sortie, and had
levelled one of his carronades, loaded to the muzzle with
canister, directly at the largest pile of the planks. No
sooner did the adventurers appear, therefore, than he blew
his match. The savages were collected around the planks
in a crowd, when he fired his gun. A dozen of them fell,
and the rest vanished like so much dust scattered by a
whirlwind.
Just at that moment, the cry passed along the Summit
that the Rancocus was in sight. The governor must have
heard the report of the gun, for he discharged one in return,
an encouraging signal of his approach. In a minute, a
third came from the westward, and Betts saw the sails of
the Mermaid over the low land. It is scarcely necessary
Vol. II.  8
to add, that the reports of the two guns from a distance,
and the appearance of the two vessels, put an end at once
to all Waally's schemes, and induced him to commence,
with the least possible delay, a second retreat from the spot
which, like Nelson's frigates, might almost be said to be
imprinted on his heart.
Waally retired successfully, if not with much dignity.
At a given signal his men rushed for the water, plunged in
and swam across the basin again. It was in Betts's power
to have killed many on the retreat, but he was averse to
shedding blood unnecessarily. Fifty lives, more or less,
could be of no great moment in the result, as soon as a
retreat was decided on; and the savages were permitted to
retire, and to carry off their killed and wounded without
molestation. The last was done by wheeling forward the
planks, and crossing at the bridge.
It was far easier, however, for Waally to gain his canoes,
than to know which way to steer after he had reached them.
The Mermaid cut off his retreat by the western passage,
and the Rancocus was coming fast along the northern. In
order to reach either the eastern, or the southern, it would
be necessary to pass within gun-shot of the Reef, and,
what was more, to run the gauntlet between the crater and
the Rancocus. To this danger Waally was compelled to
submit, since he had no other means of withdrawing his
fleet. It was true, that by paddling to windward, he greatly
lessened the danger he ran from the two vessels, since it
would not be in their power to overtake him in the narrow
channels of the group, so long as he went in the wind's
eye. It is probable that the savages understood this, and
that the circumstance greatly encouraged them in the effort
they immediately made to get into the eastern passage.
Betts permitted them to pass the Reef, without firing at
them again, though some of the canoes were at least half
an hour within the range of his guns, while doing so. It
was lucky for the Indians that the Rancocus did not arrive
until the last of their party were as far to windward as the
spot where the ship had anchored, when she was first brought
up by artificial means into those waters.
Betts went off to meet the governor, in order to make
an early report of his proceedings. It was apparent that
the danger was over, and Woolston was not sorry to find
that success was obtained without recourse to his
batteries
.
The ship went immediately alongside of the natural
quay, and her people poured ashore, in a crowd, the instant
a plank could be run out, in order to enable them to do so.
In an hour the cows were landed, and were grazing in the
crater, where the grass was knee-high, and everything
possessing
life was out of the ship, the rats and cock-roaches
perhaps excepted. As for the enemy, no one now cared for
them. The man aloft said they could be seen, paddling
away as if for life, and already too far for pursuit. It would
have been easy enough for the vessels to cut off the fugitives
by going into the offing again, but this was not the desire of
any there, all being too happy to be rid of them, to take
any steps to prolong the intercourse.
Great was the delight of the colonists to be once more
on the land. Under ordinary circumstances, the
immigrants
might not have seen so many charms in the Reef
and crater, and hog-lot; but five months at sea have a
powerful influence in rendering the most barren spot
beautiful
.
Barrenness, however, was a reproach that could no
longer be justly applied to the group, and most especially
to those portions of it which had received the attention of
its people. Even trees were beginning to be numerous,
thousands of them having been planted, some for their
fruits, some for their wood, and others merely for the
shade. Of willows, alone, Socrates with his own hand
had set out more than five thousand, the operation being
simply that of thrusting the end of a branch into the mud.
Of the rapidity of the growth, it is scarcely necessary to
speak; though it quadrupled that known even to the most
fertile regions of America.
Here, then, was Mark once more at home, after so long
a passage. There was his ship, too, well freighted with a
hundred things, all of which would contribute to the
comfort
and well-being of the colonists! It was a moment
when the governor's heart was overflowing with gratitude,
and could he then have taken Bridget and his children in
his arms, the cup of happiness would have been full.
Bridget
was not forgotten, however, for in less than half an
hour after the ship was secured, Betts sailed in the
Neshamony
,
for the Peak; he was to carry over the joyful tidings,
and to bring the `governor's lady' to the Reef. Ere the
sun set, or about that time, his return might be expected,
the Neshamony making the trip in much less time than
one of the smaller boats. It was not necessary, however,
for Betts to go so far, for when he had fairly cleared Cape
South, and was in the strait, he fell in with the Abraham,
bound over to the Reef. It appeared that some sings of
the hostile canoes had been seen from the Peak, as Waally
was crossing from Rancocus Island, and, after a council,
it had been decided to send the Abraham across, to notify
the people on the Reef of the impending danger, and to
aid in repelling the enemy. Bridget and Martha had both
come in the schooner; the first, to look after the many
valuables
he had left at the `governor's house,' on the Summit,
and the last, as her companion.
We leave the reader to imagine the joy that was
exhibited
,
when those on board the Abraham ascertained the
arrival of the Rancocus! Bridget was in ecstasies, and
greatly did she exult in her own determination to cross on
this occasion, and to bring her child with her. After the
first burst of happiness, and the necessary explanations had
been made, a consultation was had touching what was next
to be done. Brown was in command of the Abraham, with
a sufficient crew, and Betts sent him to windward, outside
of everything, to look after the enemy. It was thought
desirable not only to see Waally well clear of the group,
but to force him to pass off to the northward, in order that
he might not again approach the Reef, as well as to give
him so much annoyance on his retreat, as to sicken him
of these expeditions for the future. For such a service the
schooner was much the handiest of all the vessels of the
colonists, since she might be worked by a couple of hands,
and her armament was quite sufficient for all that was
required of her, on the occasion. Brown was every way
competent to command, as Betts well knew, and he
received
the females on board the Neshamony, and put
about, leaving the schooner to turn to windward.
Bridget reached the Reef before it was noon. All the
proceedings of that day had commenced so early, that there
had been time for this. The governor saw the
Neshamony
,
as she approached, and great uneasiness beset him.
He knew she had not been as far as the Peak, and
supposed
that Waally's fleet had intercepted her, Betts coming
back for reinforcements. But, as the boat drew near, the
fluttering of female dresses was seen, and then his unerring
glass let him get a distant view of the sweet face of his
young wife. From that moment the governor was
incapable
of giving a coherent or useful order, until Bridget had
arrived. Vessels that came in from the southward were
obliged to pass through the narrow entrance, between the
Reef and the Hog Lot, where was the drawbridge so often
mentioned. There was water enough to float a frigate,
and it was possible to take a frigate through, the width
being about fifty feet, though as yet nothing larger than
the Friend Abraham White had made the trial. At this
point, then, Woolston took his station, waiting the arrival
of the Neshamony, with an impatience he was a little
ashamed of exhibiting.
Betts saw the governor, in good time, and pointed him
out to Bridget, who could hardly be kept on board the
boat, so slow did the progress of the craft now seem. But
the tender love which this young couple bore each other
was soon to be rewarded; for Mark sprang on board the
Neshamony as she went through the narrow pass, and
immediately
he had Bridget folded to his heart.
Foreigners are apt to say that we children of this western
world do not submit to the tender emotions with the same
self-abandonment as those who are born nearer to the rising
sun; that our hearts are as cold and selfish as our manners;
and that we live more for the lower and grovelling passions,
than for sentiment and the affections. Most sincerely do
we wish that every charge which European jealousy, and
European superciliousness, have brought against the
American
character, was as false as this. That the people of
this country are more restrained in the exhibition of all
their emotions, than those across the great waters, we
believe
;
but, that the last
feel
the most, we shall be very
unwilling to allow. Most of all shall we deny that the
female form contains hearts more true to all its affections,
spirits more devoted to the interests of its earthly head, or
an identity of existence more perfect than those with which
8*
the American wife clings to her husband. She is literally
bone of his bone, and flesh of his flesh. It is seldom
that her wishes cross the limits of the domestic circle,
which to her is earth itself, and all that it contains which
is most desirable. Her husband and children compose her
little world, and beyond them and their sympathies, it is
rare indeed that her truant affections ever wish to stray.
A part of this concentration of the American wife's
existence
in these domestic interests, is doubtless owing to the
simplicity of American life and the absence of temptation.
Still, so devoted is the female heart, so true to its impulses,
and so little apt to wander from home-feelings and
home-duties
,
that the imputation to which there is allusion, is
just that, of all others, to which the wives of the republic
ought not to be subject.
It was even-tide before the governor was again seen
among his people. By this time, the immigrants had taken
their first survey of the Reef, and the nearest islands,
which the least sanguine of their numbers admitted quite
equalled the statements they had originally heard of the
advantages of the place. It was, perhaps, fortunate that
the fruits of the tropics were so abundant with Socrates
and his companions. By this time, oranges abounded, more
than a thousand trees having, from time to time, been
planted in and around the crater, alone. Groves of them
were also appearing in favourable spots, on the adjacent
islands. It is true, these trees were yet too young to
produce
very bountifully; but they had begun to bear, and it
was thought a very delightful thing, among the fresh
arrivals
from Pennsylvania, to be able to walk in an orange
grove, and to pluck the fruit at pleasure!
As for figs, melons, limes, shaddocks, and even
cocoa-nuts
,
all were now to be had, and in quantities quite
sufficient
for the population. In time, the colonists craved the
apples of their own latitude, and the peach; those two
fruits, so abundant and so delicious in their ancient homes;
but the novelty was still on them, and it required time to
learn the fact that we tire less of the apple, and the peach,
and the potato, than of any other of the rarest gifts of
nature. That which the potato has become among
vegetables
,
is the apple among fruits; and when we rise into
the more luscious and temporary of the bountiful products
of horticulture, the peach (in its perfection) occupies a
place altogether apart, having no rival in its exquisite
flavour
,
while it never produces satiety. The peach and the
grape are the two most precious of the gifts of Providence,
in the way of fruits.
That night, most of the immigrants slept in the ship;
nearly all of them, however, for the last time. About ten
in the forenoon, Brown came running down to the Reef,
through the eastern passage, to report Waally well off,
having
quitted the group to-windward, and made the best of
his way towards his own islands, without turning aside to
make a starting-point of Rancocus. It was a good deal
questioned whether the chief would find his proper
dominions
,
after a run of four hundred miles; for a very trifling
deviation from the true course at starting, would be very
apt to bring him out wide of his goal. This was a matter,
however, that gave the colonists very little concern. The
greater the embarrassments encountered by their enemies,
the less likely would they be to repeat the visit; and should
a few perish, it might be all the better for themselves. The
governor greatly approved of Brown's course in not
following
the canoes, since the repulse was sufficient as it was,
and there was very little probability that the colony would
meet with any further difficulty from this quarter, now that
it had got to be so strong.
That day and the next, the immigrants were busy in
landing their effects, which consisted of furniture, tools
and stores, of one sort and another. As the governor
intended to send, at once, forty select families over to the
Peak, the Abraham was brought alongside of the quay, and
the property of those particular families was, as it came
ashore, sent on board the schooner. Males and females
were all employed in this duty, the Reef resembling a
beehive
just at that point. Bill Brown, who still commanded
the Abraham, was of course present; and he made an
occasion to get in company with the governor, with whom
he held the following short dialogue:
A famous ship's company is this, sir, you 've landed
among us, and some on 'em is what I calls of the right
sort!
I understand you, Bill, answered Mark, smiling.
Your commission has been duly executed; and Phbe is
here, ready to be spliced as soon as there shall be an
opportunity
.
That
is easily enough made, when people's so
inclined
,
said Bill, fidgeting. If you 'd be so good, sir,
as just to point out the young woman to me, I might be
beginning to like her, in the meanwhile.
Young?
Nothing was said about that in the order,
Bill. You wished a wife, invoiced and consigned to
yourself
;
and one has been shipped, accordingly. You must
consider the state of the market, and remember that the
article is in demand precisely as it is youthful.
Well, well, sir, I 'll not throw her on your hands, if
she 's old enough to be my mother; though I do rather
suppose
,
Mr. Woolston, you stood by an old shipmate in a
foreign land, and that there is a companion suitable for a
fellow of only two-and-thirty sent out?
Of that you shall judge for yourself, Bill. Here she
comes, carrying a looking-glass, as if it were to look at
her own pretty face; and if she prove to be only as good
as she is good-looking, you will have every reason to be
satisfied. What is more, Bill, your wife does not come
empty-handed, having a great many articles that will help
to set you up comfortably in housekeeping.
Brown was highly pleased with the governor's choice,
which had been made with a due regard to the interests
and tastes of the absent shipmate. Phbe appeared well
satisfied with her allotted husband; and that very day the
couple was united in the cabin of the Abraham. On the
same occasion, the ceremony was performed for Unus and
Juno, as well as for Peters and his Indian wife; the
governor
considering it proper that regard to appearances and
all decent observances, should be paid, as comported with
their situation.
About sunset of the third day after the arrival of the
Rancocus, the Abraham sailed for the Peak, having on
board somewhat less than a hundred of the immigrants,
including females and children. The Neshamony
preceded
her several hours, taking across the governor and
his family. Mark longed to see his sister Anne, and his
two brothers participated in this wish, if possible, in a still
more lively manner.
The meeting of these members of the same family was
of the most touching character. The young men found
their sister much better established than they had
anticipated
,
and in the enjoyment of very many more comforts
than they had supposed it was in the power of any one to
possess in a colony still so young. Heaton had erected a
habitation for himself, in a charming grove, where there
were water, fruits, and other conveniences, near at hand,
and where his own family was separated from the rest of
the community. This distinction had been conferred on
him, by common consent, in virtue of his near affinity to
the governor, whose substitute he then was, and out of
respect to his education and original rank in life.
Seamen
are accustomed to defer to station and authority, and
are all the happier for the same; and the thought of any
jealousy on account of this privilege, which as yet was
confined to Mark and Heaton, and their respective
families
,
had not yet crossed the mind of any one on the
island.
About twelve, or at midnight, the Abraham entered the
cove. Late as was the hour, each immigrant assumed a
load suited to his or her strength, and ascended the Stairs,
favoured by the sweet light of a full moon. That night
most of the new-comers passed in the groves, under tents
or in an arbour that had been prepared for them; and sweet
was the repose that attended happiness and security, in a
climate so agreeable.
Next morning, when the immigrants came out of their
temporary dwellings, and looked upon the fair scene before
them, they could scarcely believe in its reality! It is true,
nothing remarkable or unexpected met their eyes in the
shape of artificial accessories; but the bountiful gifts of
Providence, and the natural beauties of the spot, as much
exceeded their anticipations as it did their power of
imagining
such glories! The admixture of softness and
magnificence
made a whole that they had never before beheld
in any other portion of the globe; and there was not one
among them all that did not, for the moment, feel and
speak as if he or she had been suddenly transformed to an
earthly paradise.
CHAPTER VII.
You have said they are men;
As such their hearts are something.
Byron
.
The
colony had now reached a point when it became
necessary to proceed with method and caution. Certain
great principles were to be established, on which the
governor
had long reflected, and he was fully prepared to set
them up, and to defend them, though he knew that ideas
prevailed among a few of his people, which might dispose
them to cavil at his notions, if not absolutely to oppose
him. Men are fond of change; half the time, for a reason
no better than that it is change; and, not unfrequently,
they permit this wayward feeling to unsettle interests that
are of the last importance to them, and which find no
small part of their virtue in their permanency.
Hitherto, with such slight exceptions as existed in
deference
to the station, not to say rights of the governor,
everything of an agricultural character had been possessed
in common among the colonists. But this was a state of
things which the good sense of Mark told him could not,
and ought not to last. The theories which have come
into fashion in our own times, concerning the virtues of
association, were then little known and less credited.
Society, as it exists in a legal form, is association enough
for all useful purposes, and sometimes too much; and the
governor saw no use in forming a wheel within a wheel.
If men have occasion for each other's assistance to effect a
particular object, let them unite, in welcome, for that
purpose
;
but Mark was fully determined that there should be
but one government in his land, and that this government
should be of a character to encourage and not to depress
exertion. So long as a man toiled for himself and those
nearest and dearest to him, society had a security for his
doing much, that would be wanting where the proceeds
of the entire community were to be shared in common;
and, on the knowledge of this simple and obvious truth,
did our young legislator found his theory of government.
Protect all in their rights equally, but, that done, let every
man pursue his road to happiness in his own way;
conceding
no more of his natural rights than were necessary
to the great ends of peace, security, and law. Such was
Mark's theory. As for the modern crotchet that men
yielded
no
natural right to government, but were to receive
all and return nothing, the governor, in plain language,
was not fool enough to believe it. He was perfectly aware
that when a man gives authority to society to compel him
to attend court as a witness, for instance, he yields just so
much of his natural rights to society, as might be necessary
to empower him to stay away, if he saw fit; and, so on,
through the whole of the very long catalogue of the claims
which the most indulgent communities make upon the
services
of their citizens. Mark understood the great
desideratum
to be, not the setting up of theories to which every
attendant fact gives the lie, but the ascertaining, as near as
human infirmity will allow, the precise point at which
concession
to government ought to terminate, and that of
uncontrolled
individual freedom commence. He was not visionary
enough to suppose that he was to be the first to make this
great discoverty; but he was conscious of entering on the
task with the purest intentions. Our governor had no
relish for power for power's sake, but only wielded it for
the general good. By nature, he was more disposed to
seek happiness in a very small circle, and would have been
just as well satisfied to let another govern, as to rule
himself
,
had there been another suited to such a station. But
there was not. His own early habits of command, the
peculiar circumstances which had first put him in
possession
of the territory, as if it were a special gift of
Providence
to himself, his past agency in bringing about the
actual state of things, and his property, which amounted to
more than that of all the rest of the colony put together,
contributed to give him a title and authority to rule, which
would have set the claims of any rival at defiance, had such
a person existed. But there was no rival; not a being
present
desiring to see another in his place.
The first step of the governor was to appoint his brother,
Abraham Woolston, the secretary of the colony. In that
age America had very different notions of office, and of its
dignity, of the respect due to authority, and of the men who
wielded if, from what prevail at the present time. The
colonists, coming as they did from America, brought with
them the notions of the times, and treated their superiors
accordingly. In the last century a governor was
the
governor
,
and not
our
governor, and a secretary
the
secretary, and not
our
secretary, men now taking more
liberties with what they fancy their own, than was their
wont with what they believed had been set over them for
their good. Mr. Secretary Woolston soon became a
personage
,
accordingly, as did all the other considerable
functionaries
appointed by the governor.
The very first act of Abraham Woolston, on being sworn
into office, was to make a registry of the entire population.
We shall give a synopsis of it, in order that the reader
may understand the character of the materials with which
the governor had room to work, viz:
Males,
147
Females,
158
Adults,
113
Adults,
121
Children,
34
Children,
37
Married,
101
Married,
101
Widowers,
1
Widows,
4
Seamen,
38
Mechanies,
26
Physician,
1
Student in Medicine,
1
Lawyer,
1
Clergyman,
1
Population,
305
Here, then, was a community composed already of three
hundred and five souls. The governor's policy was not to
increase this number by further immigration, unless in
special cases, and then only after due deliberation and
inquiry
.
Great care had been taken with the characters of
the present settlers, and careless infusions of new members
might undo a great deal of good that had already been
done. This matter was early laid before the new council,
and the opinions of the governor met with a unanimous
concurrence.
On the subject of the council, it may be well to say a
word. It was increased to nine, and a new election was
made, the incumbents holding their offices for life. This
last provision was made to prevent the worst part, and the
most corrupting influence of politics, viz., the elections,
from getting too much sway over the public mind. The
new council was composed as follows, viz:
Messrs. Heaton,
Pennock,
Betts,
C. Woolston,
A. Woolston, the governor's brothers.
Charlton,
Saunders,
Wilmost, and
Warrington.
These names belonged to the most intelligent men of the
colony, Betts perhaps excepted; but his claims were too
obvious to be slighted. Betts had good sense moreover,
and a great deal of modesty. All the rest of the council
had more or less claims to be gentlemen, but Bob never
pretended to that character. He knew his own
qualifications
,
and did not render himself ridiculous by aspiring to
be more than he really was; still, his practical knowledge
made him a very useful member of the council, where his
opinions were always heard with attention and respect.
Charlton and Wilmot were merchants, and intended to
embark regularly in trade; while Warrington, who possessed
more fortune than any of the other colonists, unless it
might be the governor, called himself a farmer, though he
had a respectable amount of general science, and was well
read in most of the liberal studies.
Warrington was made judge, with a small salary, all of
which he gave to the clergyman, the Rev. Mr. White.
This was done because he had no need of the money
himself
,
and there was no other provision for the parson than
free contributions. John Woolston, who had read law,
was named Attorney-General, or colony's attorney, as the
Vol. II.  9
office was more modestly styled; to which duties he added
those of surveyor-general. Charles received his salary, which
was two hundred and fifty dollars, being in need of it.
The question of salary, as respects the governor, was also
settled. Mark had no occasion for the money, owning all
the vessels, with most of the cargo of the Rancocus, as
well as having brought out with him no less a sum than
five thousand dollars, principally in changehalves,
quarters
,
shillings and six-pences. Then a question might
well arise, whether he did not own most of the stock; a
large part of it was his beyond all dispute, though some
doubts might exist as to the remainder. On this subject
the governor came to a most wise decision. He was fully
aware that nothing was more demoralizing to a people
than to suffer them to get loose notions on the subject of
property. Property of all kinds, he early determined,
should be most rigidly respected, and a decision that he
made shortly after his return from America, while acting
in his capacity of chief magistrate, and before the new
court went into regular operation, was of a character to
show how he regarded this matter. The case was as
follows
:
Two of the colonists, Warner and Harris, had bad blood
between them. Warner had placed his family in an
arbour
within a grove, and to aggravate him, Harris came
and walked before his door, strutting up and down like a
turkey-cock, and in a way to show that it was intended to
annoy Warner. The last brought his complaint before
the governor. On the part of Harris, it was contended
that no
injury
had been done the property of Harris, and
that, consequently, no damages could be claimed. The
question of title was conceded,
ex necessitate rerum
.
Governor
Woolston decided, that a man's rights in his
property
were not to be limited by positive injuries to its
market value. Although no grass or vegetables had been
destroyed by Harris in his walks, he had
molested
Warner
in such an enjoyment of his dwelling, as, in intendment of
law, every citizen was entitled to in his possessions. The
trespass was an aggravated one, and damages were given
accordingly. In delivering his judgment, the governor
took occasion to state, that in the administration of the
law, the rights of every man would be protected in the
fullest extent, not only as connected with pecuniary
considerations
,
but as connected with all those moral uses
and feelings which contribute to human happiness. This
decision met with applause, and was undoubtedly right
in itself. It was approved, because the well-intentioned
colonists had not learned to confound liberty with
licentiousness
;
but understood the former to be the protection
of the citizen in the enjoyment of all his innocent tastes,
enjoyments and personal rights, after making such
concessions
to government as are necessary to its
maintenance
.
Thrice happy would it be for all lands, whether
they are termed despotisms or democracies, could they
thoroughly feel the justice of this definition, and carry out
its intention in practice.
The council was convened the day succeeding its
election
.
After a few preliminary matters were disposed of,
the great question was laid before it, of a division of
property
,
and the grant of real estate. Warrington and Charles
Woolston laid down the theory, that the fee of all the land
was, by gift of Providence, in the governor, and that his
patent, or sign-manual, was necessary for passing the title
into other hands. This theory had an affinity to that of
the Common Law, which made the prince the suzerain, and
rendered him the heir of all escheated estates. But Mark's
humility, not to say his justice, met this doctrine on the
threshold. He admitted the sovereignty and its right, but
placed it in the body of the colony, instead of in himself.
As the party most interested took this view of the case,
they who were disposed to regard his rights as more
sweeping, were fain to submit. The land was therefore
declared to be the property of the state. Ample grants,
however, were made both to the governor and Betts, as
original
possessors, or discoverers, and it was held in law that
their claims were thus compromised. The grants to
Governor
Woolston included quite a thousand acres on the
Peak, which was computed to contain near thirty thousand,
and an island of about the same extent in the group, which
was beautifully situated near its centre, and less than a
league from the crater. Betts had one hundred acres
granted to him, near the crater also. He refused any other
grant, as a right growing out of original possession. Nor
was his reasoning bad on the occasion. When he was
driven off, in the Neshamony, the Reef, Loam Island,
Guano Island, and twenty or thirty rocks, composed all the
dry land. He had never seen the Peak until Mark was in
possession of it, and had no particular claim there. When
the council came to make its general grants, he was
willing
to come in for his proper share with the rest of the
people, and he wanted no more. Heaton had a special
grant of two hundred acres made to him on the Peak, and
another in the group of equal extent, as a reward for his
early and important services. Patents were made out, at
once of these several grants, under the great seal of the
colony; for the governor had provided parchment, and
wax, and a common seal, in anticipation of their being
all wanted. The rest of the grants of land were made on
a general principle, giving fifty acres on the Peak, and one
hundred in the group, to each male citizen of the age of
twenty-one years; those who had not yet attained their
majority being compelled to wait. A survey was made,
and the different lots were numbered, and registered by
those numbers. Then a lottery was made, each man's
name being put in one box, and the necessary numbers in
another. The number drawn against any particular name
was the lot of the person in question. A registration of
the drawing was taken, and printed patents were made
out, signed, sealed, and issued to the respective parties.
We say printed, a press and types having been brought
over in the Rancocus, as well as a printer. In this way,
then, every male of full age, was put in possession of one
hundred and fifty acres of land, in fee.
As the lottery did not regard the wishes of parties,
many private bargains were made, previously to the issuing
of the patents, in order that friends and connections might
be placed near to each other. Some sold their rights,
exchanging
with a difference, while others sold altogether on
the Peak, or in the group, willing to confine their
possessions
to one or the other of these places. In this manner
Mr. Warrington, or Judge Warrington, as he was now
called, bought three fifty-acre lots adjoining his own share
on the Peak, and sold his hundred-acre lot in the group.
The price established by these original sales, would seem
to give a value of ten dollars an acre to land on the Peak,
and of three dollars an acre to land in the group. Some
lots, however, had a higher value than others, all these
things being left to be determined by the estimate which
the colonists placed on their respective valuations. As
everything was conducted on a general and understood
principle, and the drawing was made fairly and in public,
there was no discontent; though some of the lots were
certainly a good deal preferable to others. The greatest
difference in value existed in the lots in the group, where
soil and water were often wanted; though, on the whole,
much more of both was found than had been at first
expected
.
There were vast deposits of mud, and others of
sand, and Heaton early suggested the expediency of
mixing
the two together, by way of producing fertility. An
experiment of this nature had been tried, under his orders,
during the absence of the governor, and the result was of
the most satisfactory nature; the acre thus manured
producing
abundantly.
As it was the sand that was to be conveyed to the mud,
the toil was much less than might have been imagined.
This sand usually lay near the water, and the numberless
channels admitted of its being transported in boats along
a vast reach of shore. Each lot having a water front,
every man might manure a few acres, by this process,
without any great expense; and no sooner were the rights
determined, and the decisions of the parties made as to
their final settlements, than many went to work to render
the cracked and baked mud left by the retiring ocean
fertile
and profitable. Lighters were constructed for the
purpose, and the colonists formed themselves into gangs,
labouring in common, and transporting so many loads of
sand to each levee, as the banks were called, though not
raised as on the Mississippi, and distributing it bountifully
over the surface. The spade was employed to mix the two
earths together.
Most of the allotments of land, in the group, were in the
immediate neighbourhood of the Reef. As there were
quite a hundred of them, more than ten thousand acres
of the islands were thus taken up, at the start. By a
9 *
rough calculation, however, the group extended east and
west sixty-three miles, and north and south about fifty,
the Reef being a very little west and a very little south of
its centre. Of this surface it was thought something like
three-fourths was dry land, or naked rock. This would
give rather more than a million and a half of acres of land;
but, of this great extent of territory, not more than
two-thirds
could be rendered available for the purposes of
husbandry
,
for want of soil, or the elements of soil. There
were places where the deposit of mud seemed to be of vast
depth, while in others it did not exceed a few inches. The
same was true of the sands, though the last was rarely of
as great depth as the mud, or alluvium.
A month was consumed in making the allotments, and
in putting the different proprietors in possession of their
respective estates. Then, indeed, were the results of the
property-system made directly apparent. No sooner was
an individual put in possession of his deed, and told that
the lot it represented was absolutely his own, to do what
he pleased with it, than he went to work with energy and
filled with hopes, to turn his new domains to account. It
is true that education and intelligence, if they will only
acquit themselves of their tasks with disinterested probity,
may enlighten and instruct the ignorant how to turn their
means to account; but, all experience proves that each
individual usually takes the best care of his own interests,
and that the system is wisest which grants to him the
amplest
opportunity so to do.
To work all went, the men forming themselves into
gangs, and aiding each other. The want of horses and
neat cattle was much felt, more especially as Heaton's
experience
set every one at the sand, as the first step in a
profitable husbandry: wheelbarrows, however, were made
use of instead of carts, and it was found that a dozen pair
of hands could do a good deal with that utensil, in the
course of a day. All sorts of contrivances were resorted
to in order to transport the sand, but the governor
established
a regular system, by which the lighter should
deliver
one load at each farm, in succession. By the end of
a month it was found that a good deal had been done, the
distances being short and the other facilities constantly
increasing by the accession of new boats.
All sorts of habitations were invented. The scarcity of
wood in the group was a serious evil, and it was found
indispensable
to import that material. Parts of Rancocus
Island were well wooded, there growing among other trees
a quantity of noble yellow pines. Bigelow was sent
across in the Abraham to set up a mill, and to cut lumber.
There being plenty of water-power, the mill was soon got
at work, and a lot of excellent plank, boards, &c., was
shipped in the schooner for the crater. Shingle-makers
were also employed, the cedar abounding, as well as the
pine. The transportation to the coast was the point of
difficulty on Rancocus Island as well as elsewhere; none
of the cattle being yet old enough to be used. Socrates
had three pair of yearling steers, and one of two years old
breaking, but it was too soon to set either at work. With
the last, a little very light labour was done, but it was more
to train the animals, than with any other object.
On Rancocus Island, however, Bigelow had made a very
ingenious canal, that was of vast service in floating logs to
the mill. The dam made a long narrow pond that
penetrated
two or three miles up a gorge in the mountains, and
into this dam the logs were rolled down the declivities,
which were steep enough to carry anything into the water.
When cut into lumber, it was found that the stream below
the mill, would carry small rafts down to the sea.
While all these projects were in the course of operation,
the governor did not forget the high interests connected
with his foreign relations; Waally was to be looked to,
and Ooroony's son to be righted. The council was
unanimously
of opinion that sound policy required such an
exhibition of force on the part of the colony, as should
make a lasting impression on their turbulent neighbours.
An expedition was accordingly fitted out, in which the
Mermaid, the Abraham, and a new pilot-boat built
schooner
of fifty tons burthen, were employed. This new
schooner was nearly ready for launching when the
Rancocus
returned, and was put into the water for the occasion.
She had been laid down in the cove, where Bigelow had
found room for a sufficient yard, and where timber was
nearer at hand, than on the Reef. As Rancocus Island
supplied the most accessible and the best lumber, the
council had determined to make a permanent
establishment
on it, for the double purposes of occupation and
building vessels. As the resources of that island were
developed
,
it was found important on other accounts, also.
Excellent clay for bricks was found, as was lime-stone, in
endless quantities. For the purposes of agriculture, the
place was nearly useless, there not being one thousand
acres of good arable land in the whole island; but the
mountains were perfect mines of treasure in the way of
necessary supplies of the sorts mentioned.
A brick-yard was immediately cleared and formed, and
a lime-kiln constructed. Among the colonists, it was easy
to find men accustomed to work in all these familiar
branches. The American can usually turn his hand to a
dozen different pursuits; and, though he may not
absolutely
reach perfection in either, he is commonly found
useful and reasonably expert in all. Before the governor
sailed on his expedition against Waally, a brick-kiln and a
lime-kiln were nearly built, and a vast quantity of lumber
had been carried over to the Reef. As sandal-wood had
been collecting for the twelve months of her late absence,
the Rancocus had also been filled up, and had taken in a
new cargo for Canton. It was not the intention of the
governor to command his ship this voyage; but he gave
her to Saunders, who was every way competent to the trust.
When all was ready, the Rancocus, the Mermaid, the
Abraham, and the Anne, as the new pilot-boat schooner
was called, sailed for Betto's group; it being a part of the
governor's plan to use the ship, in passing, with a view to
intimidate his enemies. In consequence of the revolution
that had put Waally up again, every one of the Kannakas
who had gone out in the Rancocus on her last voyage,
refused to go home, knowing that they would at once be
impressed into Waally's service; and they all now
cheerfully
shipped anew, for a second voyage to foreign lands.
By this time, these men were very useful; and the governor
had a project for bringing up a number of the lads of the
islands, and of making use of them in the public service.
This scheme was connected with his contemplated success,
and formed no small part of the policy of the day.
The appearance of so formidable a force as was now
brought against Waally, reduced that turbulent chief to
terms without a battle. About twenty of his canoes had
got separated from the rest of the fleet in a squall, while
returning from the unsuccessful attempt on the Reef, and
they were never heard of more; or, if heard of, it was in
uncertain rumours, which gave an account of the arrival
of three or four canoes at some islands a long way
to-leeward
,
with a handful of half-starved warriors on board. It
is supposed that all the rest perished at sea. This disaster
had rendered Waally unpopular among the friends of those
who were lost; and that unpopularity was heightened by
the want of success in the expedition itself. Success is all
in all, with the common mind; and we daily see the vulgar
shouting at the heels of those whom they are ready to
crucify
at the first turn of fortune. In this good land of ours,
popularity adds to its more worthless properties the
substantial
result of power; and it is not surprising that so
many forget their God in the endeavour to court the
people
.
In time, however, all of these persons of mistaken
ambition come to exclaim, with Shakspeare's Wolsey
Had I but served my God with half the zeal
I served my king, he would not in mine age
Have left me naked to mine enemies.
Waally's power, already tottering through the influence
of evil fortune, crumbled entirely before the force
Governor
Woolston now brought against it. Although the latter
had but forty whites with him, they came in ships, and
provided with cannon; and not a chief dreamed of
standing
by the offender, in this his hour of need. Waally had
the tact to comprehend his situation, and the wisdom to
submit to his fortune. He sent a messenger to the
governor
with a palm-branch, offering to restore young Ooroony
to all his father's authority, and to confine himself to his
strictly inherited dominions. Such, in fact, was the basis
of the treaty that was now made, though hostages were
taken for its fulfilment. To each condition Waally
consented
;
and everything was settled to the entire satisfaction
of the whites, and to the honour and credit of young
Ooroony. The result was, in substance, as we shall now
record.
In the first place, one hundred lads were selected and
handed over to the governor, as so many apprentices to the
sea. These young Kannakas were so many hostages for the
good behaviour of their parents; while the parents, always
within reach of the power of the colonists, were so many
hostages for the good behaviour of the Kannakas.
Touching
the last, however, the governor had very few
misgivings
,
since he believed it very possible so to treat, and so
to train them, as to make them fast friends. In placing
them on board the different vessels, therefore, rigid
instructions
were given to their officers to be kind to these
youngsters
;
and each and all were to be taught to read, and
instructed in the Christian religion. The Rev. Mr.
Hornblower
took great interest in this last arrangement, as did
half the females of the colony. Justice and kind treatment,
in fact, produced their usual results in the cases of these
hundred youths; every one of whom got to be, in the end,
far more attached to the Reef, and its customs, than to
their own islands and their original habits. The sea, no
doubt, contributed its share to this process of civilization;
for it is ever found that the man who gets a thorough taste
for that element, is loth to quit it again for
terra firma
.
One hundred able-bodied men were added to the recruits
that the governor obtained in Betto's group. They were
taken as hired labourers, and not as hostages. Beads and
old iron were to be their pay, with fish-hooks, and such
other trifles as had a value in their eyes; and their
engagement
was limited to two months. There was a disposition
among a few of the colonists to make slaves of these men,
and to work their lands by means of a physical force
obtained
in Betto's group; but to this scheme the council
would not lend itself for a moment. The governor well
knew that the usefulness, virtue, and moral condition of
his people, depended on their being employed; and he had
no wish to undermine the permanent prosperity of the
colony, by resorting to an expedient that might do well
enough for a short time, but which would certainly bring
its own punishment in the end.
Still, an accession of physical force, properly directed,
would be of great use in this early age of the colony. The
labourers were accordingly engaged; but this was done by
the government, which not only took the control of the
men, but which also engaged to see them paid the promised
remuneration. Another good was also anticipated from
this arrangement. The two groups must exist as friends
or as enemies. So long as young Ooroony reigned, it was
thought there would be little difficulty in maintaining
amicable
relations; and it was hoped that the intercourse
created
by this arrangement, aided by the trade in
sandal-wood
,
might have the effect to bind the natives to the whites
by the tie of interest.
The vessels lay at Betto's group a fortnight, completing
all the arrangements made; though the Rancocus sailed
on her voyage as soon as the terms of the treaty were
agreed on, and the Anne was sent back to the Reef with
the news that the war had terminated. As for Waally, he
was obliged to place his favourite son in the hands of young
Ooroony, who held the youthful chief as a hostage for his
father's good behaviour.
CHAPTER VIII.
Thou shalt seek the beach of sand
Where the water bounds the elfin land;
Thou shalt watch the oozy brine
Till the sturgeon leaps in the bright moonshine,
Then dart the glistening arch below,
And catch a drop from his silver bow;
The water-sprites will wield their arms,
And dash around, with roar and rave,
And vain are the woodland spirit's charms,
They are the imps that rule the wave.
Yet trust thee in thy single might;
If thy heart be pure, and thy spirit right,
Thou shalt win the warlike fight.
Drake
.
A twelvemonth
passed, after the return of the
expedition
against Betto's group, without the occurrence of any
one very marked event. Within that time, Bridget made
Mark the father of a fine boy, and Anne bore her fourth
child to Heaton. The propagation of the human species,
indeed, flourished marvellously, no less than seventy-eight
children having been born in the course of that single
year. There were a few deaths, only one among the adults,
the result of an accident, the health of the colony having
been excellent. An enumeration, made near the close of
the year, showed a total of three hundred and seventy-nine
souls, including those absent in the Rancocus, and
excluding
the Kannakas.
As for these Kannakas, the results of their employment
quite equalled the governor's expectations. They would
not labour like civilized men, it is true, nor was it easy to
make them use tools; but at lifts, and drags, and heavy
work, they could be, and were, made to do a vast deal.
The first great object of the governor had been to get his
people all comfortably housed, beneath good roofs, and out
of the way of the rains. Fortunately there were no decayed
vegetable substances in the group, to produce fevers; and
so long as the person could be kept dry, there was little
danger to the health.
Four sorts, or classes, of houses were erected, each man
being left to choose for himself, with the understanding
that he was to receive a certain amount, in value, from the
commonwealth, by contribution in labour, or in materials.
All beyond that amount was to be paid for. To equalize
advantages, a tariff was established, as to the value of
labour and materials. These materials consisted of
lumber
,
including shingles, stone, lime and bricks; bricks
burned, as well as those which were unburned, or adobe.
Nails were also delivered from the public store, free of
charge.
Of course, no one at first thought of building very largely.
Small kitchens were all that were got up, at the
commencement
,
and they varied in size, according to the means of
their owners, as much as they differed in materials. Some
built of wood; some of stones; some of regular bricks;
and some of adobe. All did very well, but the stone was
found to be much the preferable material, especially where
the plastering within was furred off from the walls. These
stones came from Rancocus Island, where they were found
in inexhaustible quantities, partaking of the character of
tufa. The largest of them were landed at the Reef, the
loading and unloading being principally done by the
Kannakas
,
while the smallest were delivered at different points
along the channel, according to the wishes of the owners
of the land. More than a hundred dwellings were erected
in the course of the few months immediately succeeding
the arrival of the immigrants. About half were on the
Peak, and the remainder were in the group. It is true,
no one of all these dwellings was large; but each was
comfortable
,
and fully answered the purpose of protection
against the rain. A roof of cedar shingles was tight, as a
matter of course, and what was more, it was lasting. Some
of the buildings were sided with these shingles; though
clap-boards were commonly used for that purpose. The
adobe answered very well when securely roofed, though it
was thought the unburnt brick absorbed more moisture
than the brick which had been burned.
Vol. II.  10
The largest of all the private dwellings thus erected,
was thirty feet square, and the smallest was fifteen. The
last had its cooking apartment under a shed, however,
detached
from the house. Most of the ovens were thus
placed; and in many instances the chimneys stood entirely
without the buildings, even when they were attached to
them. There was but one house of two stories, and that
was John Pennock's, who had sufficient means to construct
such a building. As for the governor, he did not
commence
building at all, until nearly every one else was
through, when he laid the corner-stones of two habitations;
one on the Peak, which was his private property, standing
on his estate; and the other on the Reef, which was strictly
intended to be a Government, or Colony House. The
first was of brick, and the last of stone, and of great
solidity
,
being intended as a sort of fortress. The private
dwelling was only a story and a half high, but large on the
ground for that region, measuring sixty feet square. The
government building was much larger, measuring two
hundred feet in length, by sixty feet in depth. This
spacious
edifice, however, was not altogether intended for a
dwelling for the governor, but was so arranged as to
contain
great quantities of public property in its basement,
and to accommodate the courts, and all the public offices
on the first floor. It had an upper story, but that was left
unfinished and untenanted for years, though fitted with
arrangements for defence. Fortunately, cellars were little
wanted in that climate, for it was not easy to have one in
the group. It is true, that Pennock caused one to be
blown out with gun-powder, under his dwelling, though
every one prophesied that it would soon be full of water.
It proved to be dry, notwithstanding; and a very good
cellar it was, being exceedingly useful against the heats,
though of cold there was none to guard against.
The Colony House stood directly opposite to the
drawbridge
,
being placed there for the purposes of defence, as
well as to have access to the spring. A want of water was
rather an evil on the Reef; not that the sands did not
furnish
an ample supply, and that of the most delicious quality,
but it had to be carried to inconvenient distances. In
general, water was found in sufficient quantities and in
suitable places, among the group; but, at the Reef, there
was certainly this difficulty to contend with. As the
governor
caused his brother, the surveyor-general, to lay out
a town on the Reef, it was early deemed necessary to make
some provision against this evil. A suitable place was
selected, and a cistern was blown out of the rock, into
which all the water that fell on the roof of Colony House
was led. This reservoir, when full, contained many
thousand
gallons; and when once full, it was found that the
rains were sufficient to prevent its being very easily
emptied.
But the greatest improvement that was made on the
Reef, after all, was in the way of soil. As for the crater,
that, by this time, was a mass of verdure, among which a
thousand trees were not only growing, but flourishing.
This was as true of its plain, as of its mounds; and of its
mounds, as of its plain. But the crater was composed of
materials very different from the base of the Reef. The
former was of tufa, so far as it was rock at all; while the
latter was, in the main, pure Iava. Nevertheless,
something
like a soil began to form even on the Reef, purely
by the accessions caused though its use by man. Great
attention was paid to collecting everything that could
contribute
to the formation of earth, in piles; and these piles
were regularly removed to such cavities, or inequalities in
the surface of the rock, as would be most likely to retain
their materials when spread. In this way many green
patches had been formed, and, in a good many instances,
trees had been set out, in spots where it was believed they
could find sufficient nourishment. But, no sooner had the
governor decided to build on the Reef, and to make his
capital there, than he set about embellishing the place
systematically
.
Whenever a suitable place could be found,
in what was intended for Colony House grounds, a space
of some ten acres in the rear of the building, he put in the
drill, and blew out rock. The fragments of stone were
used about the building; and the place soon presented a
ragged, broken surface, of which one might well despair
of making anything. By perseverance, however, and still
more by skill and judgment, the whole area was lowered
more than a foot, and in many places, where nature assisted
the work, it was lowered several feet. It was a disputed
question, indeed, whether stone for the building could not
be obtained here, by blasting, cheaper and easier, than by
transporting it from Rancocus Island. Enough was
procured
in this way not only to construct the building, but
to enclose the grounds with a sufficient wall. When all
was got off that was wanted, boat-loads of mud and sand
were brought by Kannakas, and deposited in the cavity.
This was a great work for such a community, though it
proceeded faster than, at first, one might have supposed.
The materials were very accessible, and the distances
short, which greatly facilitated the labour, though
unloading
was a task of some gravity. The walls of the house
were got up in about six months after the work was
commenced
,
and the building was roofed; but, though the
gardeners were set to work as soon as the stones were out
of the cavities, they had not filled more than two acres at
the end of the period mentioned.
Determined to make an end of this great work at once,
the Abraham was sent over to young Ooroony to ask for
assistance. Glad enough was that chief to grant what was
demanded of him, and he came himself, at the head of five
hundred men, to aid his friend in finishing this task. Even
this strong body of labourers was busy two months longer,
before the governor pronounced the great end accomplished.
Then he dismissed his neighbours with such gifts and pay
as sent away everybody contented. Many persons thought
the experiment of bringing so many savages to the Reef
somewhat hazardous; but no harm ever came of it. On
the contrary, the intercourse had a good effect, by making
the two people better acquainted with each other. The
governor had a great faculty in the management of those
wild beings. He not only kept them in good-humour, but
what was far more difficult, he made them work. They
were converted into a sort of Irish for his colony. It is
true, one civilized man could do more than three of the
Kannakas, but the number of the last was so large that they
accomplished a great deal during their stay.
Nor would the governor have ventured to let such
danverous
neighbours into the group, had there not been still
more imposing mysteries connected with the Peak, into
which they were not initiated. Even young Ooroony was
kept in ignorance of what was to be found on that dreaded
island. He saw vessels going and coming, knew that the
governor often went there, saw strange faces appearing
occasionally
on the Reef, that were understood to belong to
the unknown land, and probably to a people who were
much more powerful than those who were in direct
communication
with the natives.
The governor induced his Kannakas to work by
interesting
them in the explosions of the blasts, merely to enjoy
the pleasure of seeing a cart-load of rock torn from its bed.
One of these men would work at a drill all day, and then
carry off the fragments to be placed in the walls, after he
had had his sport in this operation of blasting. They
seemed never to tire of the fun, and it was greatly
questioned
if half as much labour could have been got out of
them at any other work, as at this.
A good deal of attention was paid to rendering the soil
of the colony garden fertile, as well as deep. In its
shallowest
places it exceeded a foot in depth, and in the deepest,
spots where natural fissures had aided the drill, it required
four or five feet of materials to form the level. These deep
places were all marked, and were reserved for the support
of trees. Not only was sand freely mixed with the mud,
or muck, but sea-weed in large quantities was laid near the
surface, and finally covered with the soil. In this manner
was a foundation made that could not fail to sustain a
garden
luxuriant in its products, aided by the genial heat and
plentiful rains of the climate. Shrubs, flowers, grass, and
ornamental trees, however, were all the governor aimed at
in these public grounds; the plain of the crater furnishing
fruit and vegetables in an abundance, as yet far exceeding
the wants of the whole colony. The great danger, indeed,
that the governor most apprehended, was that the
beneficent
products of the region would render his people
indolent
;
an idle nation becoming, almost infallibly, vicious as
well as ignorant. It was with a view to keep the colony
on the advance, and to maintain a spirit of improvement
that so much attention was so early bestowed on what
might otherwise be regarded as purely intellectual pursuits
10 *
which, by creating new wants, might induce their subjects
to devise the means of supplying them.
The governor judged right; for tastes are commonly
acquired
by imitation, and when thus acquired, they take the
strongest hold of those who cultivate them. The effect
produced by the Colony Garden, or public grounds, was
such as twenty-fold to return the cost and labour bestowed
on it. The sight of such an improvement set both men
and women to work throughout the group, and not a
dwelling
was erected in the town, that the drill did not open the
rock, and mud and sand form a garden. Nor did the
governor
himself confine his horticultural improvements to
the gardens mentioned. Before he sent away his legion of
five hundred, several hundred blasts were made in isolated
spots on the Reef; places where the natural formation
favoured
such a project; and holes were formed that would
receive a boat-load of soil each. In these places trees were
set out, principally cocoa-nuts, and such other plants as
were natural to the situation, due care being taken to see
that each had sufficient nourishment.
The result of all this industry was to produce a great
change in the state of things at the Reef. In addition to
the buildings erected, and to the gardens made and planted,
within the town itself, the whole surface of the island was
more or less altered. Verdure soon made its appearance
in places where, hitherto, nothing but naked rock had been
seen, and trees began to cast their shades over the young
and delicious grasses. As for the town itself, it was
certainly
no great matter; containing about twenty dwellings,
and otherwise being of very modest pretensions. Those
who dwelt there were principally such mechanics as found
it convenient to be at the centre of the settlement, some
half a dozen persons employed about the warehouses of
the merchants, a few officials of the government, and the
families of those who depended mainly on the sea for their
support. Each and all of these heads of families had
drawn their lots, both in the group and on the Peak,
though some had sold their rights the better to get a good
start in their particular occupations. The merchants,
however, established themselves on the Reef, as a matter
of necessity, each causing a warehouse to be constructed
near the water, with tackles and all the usual conveniences
for taking in and delivering goods. Each also had his
dwelling near at hand. As these persons had come well
provided for the Indian trade in particular, having large
stocks of such cheap and coarse articles as took with the
natives, they were already driving a profitable business,
receiving
considerable quantities of sandal-wood in exchange
for their goods.
It is worthy of being mentioned, that the governor and
council early passed a sort of navigation act, the effect of
which was to secure the carrying trade to the colony. The
motive, however, was more to keep the natives within safe
limits, than to monopolize the profits of the seas. By the
provisions of this law, no canoe could pass from Betto's
group to either of the islands of the colony, without
express
permission from the governor. In order to carry on
the trade, the parties met on specified days at Ooroony's
village, and there made their exchanges; vessels being
sent from the Reef to bring away the sandal-wood. With
a view to the final transportation of the last to a market,
Saunders had been instructed to purchase a suitable vessel,
which was to return with the Rancocus, freighted with
such heavy and cheap implements as were most wanted in
the colony, including cows and mares in particular.
Physical
force, in the shape of domestic animals, was greatly
wanted; and it was perhaps the most costly of all the
supplies
introduced into the settlements. Of horned cattle
there were already about five-and-twenty head in the
colony
enough to make sure of the breed; but they were
either cows, steers too young to be yet of much use, and
calves. Nothing was killed, of course; but so much time
must pass before the increase would give the succour
wanted, that the governor went to unusual expense and
trouble to make additions to the herd from abroad.
As for the horses, but three had been brought over, two
of which were mares. The last had foaled twice; and
there were four colts, all doing well, but wanting age to
be useful. All the stock of this character was kept on the
Peak, in order to secure it from invaders; and the old
animals, even to the cows, were lightly worked there, doing
a vast deal that would otherwise remain undone. It was
obviously
advantageous to increase the amount of this
sort of force, that Saunders had strict orders to purchase
the vessel mentioned, and to bring over as many beasts as
he could conveniently and safely stow. With this object
in view, he was directed to call in, on the western side of
Cape Horn, and to make his purchases in South America.
The horned cattle might not be so good, coming from such
a quarter, but the dangers of doubling the Cape would be
avoided.
While making these general and desultory statements
touching the progress of the colony, it may be well to say
a word of Rancocus Island. The establishments
necessary
there, to carry on the mills, lime and brick kilns, and
the stone-quarry, induced the governor to erect a small
work, in which the persons employed in that out-colony
might take refuge, in the event of an invasion. This was
done accordingly; and two pieces of artillery were
regularly
mounted on it. Nor was the duty of fortifying
neglected
elsewhere. As for the Peak, it was not deemed
necessary to do more than improve a little upon nature;
the colony being now too numerous to suppose that it
could not defend the cove against any enemy likely to land
there, should the entrance of that secret haven be detected.
On the Reef, however, it was a very different matter. That
place was as accessible as the other was secure. The
construction
of so many stout stone edifices contributed largely
to the defence of the town; but the governor saw the
necessity
of providing the means of commanding the
approaches
by water. Four distinct passages, each
corresponding
to a cardinal point of the compass, led from the
crater out to sea. As the south passage terminated at the
bridge, it was sufficiently commanded by the Colony House.
But all the others were wider, more easy of approach, and
less under the control of the adjacent islands. But the
Summit had points whence each might be raked by guns
properly planted, and batteries were accordingly
constructed
on these points; the twelve-pounder being used
for their armaments. Each battery had two guns; and
when all was completed, it was the opinion of the governor
that the post was sufficiently well fortified. In order,
however
,
to give additional security, the crater was tabooed to
all the Kannakas; not one of whom was permitted ever to
enter it, or even to go near it.
But defence, and building, and making soil, did not
altogether
occupy the attention of the colonists during these
important twelve months. Both the brothers of the
governor
got married; the oldest, or the attorney-general, to
the oldest sister of John Pennock, and the youngest to a
sister
of the Rev. Mr. Hornblower. It was in this simple
colony
,
as if ever has been, and ever will be in civilized society,
that, in forming matrimonial connections, like looks for
like. There was no person, or family at the Reef which
could be said to belong to the highest social class of
America
,
if, indeed, any one could rank as high as a class
immediately next to the highest; yet, distinctions existed
which were maintained usefully, and without a thought of
doing them away. The notion that money alone makes
those divisions into castes which are everywhere to be
found, and which will probably continue to be found as
long as society itself exists, is a very vulgar and fallacious
notion. It comes from the difficulty of appreciating those
tastes and qualities which, not possessing ourselves, are so
many unknown and mysterious influences. In marrying
Sarah Pennock, John Woolston was slightly conscious of
making a little sacrifice in these particulars, but she was a
very pretty, modest girl, of a suitable age, and the circle to
choose from, it will be remembered, was very limited. In
America that connection might not have taken place; but,
at the crater, it was all well enough, and it turned out to
be a very happy union. Had the sacrifice of habits and
tastes been greater, this might not have been the fact, for
it is certain that our happiness depends more on the
subordinate
qualities and our cherished usages, than on
principles
themselves. It is difficult to suppose that any refined
woman, for instance, can ever thoroughly overcome her
disgust
for a man who habitually blows his nose with his fingers,
or that one bred a gentleman can absolutely overlook, even
in a wife, the want of the thousand and one little lady-like
habits, which render the sex perhaps more attractive than
do their personal charms.
Several other marriages took place, the scarcity of
subjects
making it somewhat hazardous to delay: when
Hobson's
choice is placed before one, deliberation, is of no
great use. It was generally understood that the Rancocus
was to bring out very few immigrants, though permission
had been granted to Capt. Saunders to take letters to
certain
friends of some already settled in the colony, with the
understanding that those friends were to be received,
should they determine to come. That point, however, was
soon to be decided, for just a year and one week after the
Rancocus had sailed from Betto's group, the news reached
the Reef that the good ship was coming into the northern
roads, and preparing to anchor. The governor
immediately
went on board the Anne, taking Betts with him,
and made sail for the point in question, with a view to
bring the vessel through the passage to the Reef. The
governor
and Betts were the only two who, as it was believed,
could carry so large a vessel through; though later
soundings
showed it was only necessary to keep clear of the
points and the shores, in order to bring in a craft of any
draught of water.
When the Anne ran out into the roads, there she found
the Rancocus at anchor, sure enough. On nearing her,
Capt. Saunders appeared on her poop, and in answer to a
hail, gave the welcome answer of all well. Those
comprehensive
words removed a great deal of anxiety from the
mind of the governor; absence being, in one sense, the
parent of uncertainty, and uncertainty of uneasiness.
Everything about the ship, however, looked well, and to
the surprise of those in the Anne, many heads belonging
to others beside the crew were to be seen above the rail.
A sail was in sight, moreover, standing in, and this vessel
Capt. Saunders stated was the brig Henlopen, purchased
on government account, and loaded with stock, and other
property for the colony.
On going on board the Rancocus it was ascertained
that, in all, one hundred and eleven new immigrants had
been brought out! The circle of the affections had been
set at work, and one friend had induced another to enter
into the adventure, until it was found that less than the
number mentioned could not be gotten rid of. That which
could not be cured was to be endured, and the governor's
dissatisfaction was a good deal appeased when he learned
that the new-comers were of excellent materials; being,
without exception, young, healthful, moral, and all
possessed
of more or less substance, in the way of worldly
goods. This accession to the colony brought its
population
up to rather more than five hundred souls, of which
number, however, near a hundred and fifty were children,
or, under the age of fourteen years.
Glad enough were the new-comers to land at a little
settlement
which had been made on the island which lay
abreast of the roads, and where, indeed, there was a very
convenient harbour, did vessels choose to use it. The
roads, however, had excellent anchorage, and were
perfectly
protected against the prevailing winds of that region.
Only once, indeed, since the place was inhabited, had the
wind been known to blow
on
shore at that point; and then
only during a brief squall. In general, the place was
every way favourable for the arrival and departure of
shipping
,
the trades making a leading breeze both in going
and comingas, indeed, they did all the way to and from
the Reef. A long-headed emigrant, of the name of
Dunks, had foreseen the probable, future, importance of
this outer harbour, and had made such an arrangement
with the council, as to obtain leave for himself and three
or four of his connections to exchange the land they had
drawn, against an equal quantity in this part of the group.
The arrangement was made, and this little, out-lying
colony
had now been established an entire season. As the
spot was a good deal exposed to an invasion, a stone
dwelling
had been erected, that was capable of accommodating
the whole party, and pickets were placed around it in
such a way as to prove an ample defence against any
attempt
to carry the work by assault. The governor had
lent them a field-piece, and it was thought the whole
disposition
was favourable to the security of the colony,
since no less than eleven combatants could be mustered
here to repel invasion.
The immigrants, as usual, found everything charming,
when their feet touched terra firma. The crops
did
look well,
and the island being covered with mud, the sand had done
wonders for the vegetation. It is true that trees were
wanting, though the pickets, or palisades, being of willow,
had all sprouted, and promised soon to enclose the
dwelling
in a grove. Some fifty acres had been tilled, more or
less thoroughly, and timothy was already growing that was
breast-high. Clover looked well, too, as did everything
else; the guano having lost none of its virtue since the
late arrivals.
The governor sent back the Anne, with instructions to
prepare room for the immigrants in the government
dwelling
,
which, luckily, was large enough to receive them all.
He waited with the Rancocus, however, for the Henlopen
to come in and anchor. He then went on board this brig,
and took a look at the stock. Saunders, a discreet,
sensible
man, so well understood the importance of adding to
the physical force of the colony, in the way of brutes, that
he had even strained the point to bring as many mares and
cows as he could stow. He had put on board twenty-five
of the last, and twenty of the first; all purchased at
Valparaiso
.
The weather had been so mild, that no injury had
happened to the beasts, but the length of the passage had
so far exhausted the supplies that not a mouthful of food
had the poor animals tasted for the twenty-four hours before
they got in. The water, too, was scarce, and anything but
sweet. For a month everything had been on short
allowance
,
and the suffering creatures must have been enchanted
to smell the land. Smell it they certainly did; for such a
lowing, and neighing, and fretting did they keep up, when
the governor got alongside of the brig, that he could not
endure the sight of their misery, but determined at once to
relieve it.
The brig was anchored within two hundred yards of a
fine sandy beach, on which there were several runs of
delicious
water, and which communicated directly with a
meadow of grass, as high as a man's breast. A bargain
was soon made with Dunks; and the two crews, that of the
Rancocus, as well as that of the brig, were set to work
without delay to hoist out every creature having a hoof,
that was on board the Henlopen. As slings were all ready,
little delay was necessary, but a mare soon rose through
the hatchway, was swung over the vessel's side, and was
lowered into the water. A very simple contrivance
released
the creature from the slings, and off it swam, making
the best of its way towards the land. In three minutes the
poor thing was on the beach, though actually staggering
from weakness, and from long use to the motion of the
vessel. The water was its first aim. Dunks was there,
however, to prevent it from drinking too much, when it
made its way up to the grass, which it began to eat
ravenously
.
All the rest went through the same process, and
in a couple of hours the poor things were relieved from
their misery, and the brig, which smelled like a stable, was
well quit of them. Brooms and water were set to work
immediately, but it was a month before the Henlopen lost
the peculiar odour of the cattle.
Nor were the human beings much less rejoiced to get
ashore than the brutes. Dunks gave them all a hearty
welcome, and though he had little fruit to offer, he had
plenty of vegetables, for which they were quite as thankful.
Melons, however, he could and did give them, and the
human part of the cargo had an ample feast on a sort of
food to which they had now so long been strangers. The
horses and cows were left on Dunks's Island, where they
stayed until word was sent to the governor that they had
eaten down all his grass, and would soon be on allowance
again, unless taken away. Means, however, were soon
found to relieve him of the stock, though his meadows, or
pastures rather, having been seldom cut in that climate,
were much improved by the visit paid them. As for the
animals, they were parcelled out among the different farms,
thus giving a little milk, and a little additional force to
each neighbourhood. Fowls and pigs had been distributed
some time previously, so that not a man in the group was
without his breeding sow, and his brood of young chickens.
These were species of stock that increased so rapidly, that
a little care alone was wanting to make eggs and pork
plenty. Corn, or maize, grew just for the planting; though
it was all the better, certainly, for a little care.
After sufficient time had been allowed to make the
necessary
preparations, the vessels sailed with the immigrants
for the Reef. There was many a glad meeting between
friends and relatives. Those who had just arrived had a
great deal to tell those who had preceded then by eighteen
months, and those who now considered themselves old
settlers
,
entertained the new ones with the wonders of their
novel situations.
Vol. II.  11
CHAPTER IX.
Welter upon the waters, mighty one
And stretch thee in the ocean's trough of brine;
Turn thy wet scales up to the wind and sun,
And toss the billow from thy flashing fin;
Heave thy deep breathing to the ocean's din,
And bound upon its ridges in thy pride,
Or dive down to its lowest depths, and in
The caverns where its unknown monsters hide
Measure thy length beneath the gulf-stream's tide.
Brainard's
Sea-Serpent
.
The
colony had now reached a point when its policy
must have an eye to its future destinies. If it were
intended
to push it, like a new settlement, a very different
course ought to be pursued from the one hitherto adopted.
But the governor and council entertained more moderate
views. They understood their real position better. It was
true that the Peak, in one sense, or in that which related
to soil and products, was now in a condition to receive
immigrants as fast as they could come; but the Peak had its
limits, and it could hold but a very circumscribed number.
As to the group, land had to be formed for the reception
of the husbandman, little more than the elements of soil
existing over so much of its surface. Then, in the way of
trade, there could not be any very great inducement for
adventurers to come, since the sandal-wood was the only
article possessed which would command a price in a
foreign
market. This sandal-wood, moreover, did not
belong
to the colony, but to a people who might, at any
moment, become hostile, and who already began to
complain
that the article was getting to be very scarce.
Under
all the circumstances, therefore, it was not deemed
desirable to add to the population of the place faster than
would now be done by natural means.
The cargoes of the two vessels just arrived were divided
between the state and the governor, by a very just process.
The governor had one-half the proceeds for his own
private
use, as owner of the Rancocus, without which vessel
nothing could have been done; while the state received
the other moiety, in virtue of the labour of its citizens as
well as in that of its right to impose duties on imports and
exports. Of the portion which went to the state, certain
parts were equally divided between the colonists, for
immediate
use, while other parts of the cargo were placed in
store, and held as a stock, to be drawn upon as occasion
might arise.
The voyage, like most adventures in sandal-wood, teas,
&c., in that day, had been exceedingly advantageous, and
produced a most beneficent influence on the fortunes and
comforts of the settlement. A well-selected cargo of the
coarse, low-priced articles most needed in such a colony,
could easily have been purchased with far less than the
proceeds
of the cargo of tea that had been obtained at
Canton
,
in exchange for the sandal-wood carried out; and
Saunders, accordingly, had filled the holds of both vessels
with such articles, besides bringing home with him a
considerable
amount in specie, half of which went into the
public coffers, and half into the private purse of governor
Woolston. Money had been in circulation in the colony
for the last twelve months; though a good deal of caution
was used in suffering it to pass from hand to hand. The
disposition was to hoard; but this fresh arrival of specie
gave a certain degree of confidence, and the silver
circulated
a great deal more freely after it was known that so
considerable an amount had been brought in.
It would scarcely be in our power to enumerate the
articles that were received by these arrivals; they
included
everything in common use among civilized men,
from a grind-stone to a cart. Groceries, too, had been
brought in reasonable quantities, including teas, sugars,
&c.; though these articles were not so much considered
necessaries
in America fifty years ago as they are to-day.
The groceries of the state as well as many other articles,
were put into the hands of the merchants, who either
purchased
them out and out, to dispose of at retail, or who
took them on commission with the same object. From
this time, therefore, regular shops existed, there being
three on the Reef and one on the Peak, where nearly
everything in use could be bought, and that, too, at prices
that were far from being exorbitant. The absence of
import
duties had a great influence on the cost of things, the
state getting its receipts in kind, directly through the
labour of its citizens, instead of looking to a
custom-house
in quest of its share for the general prosperity.
At that time very little was written about the great
fallacy
of the present day, Free Trade; which is an illusion
about which men now talk, and dispute, and almost fight,
while no living mortal can tell what it really is. It is wise
for us in America, who never had anything but free trade,
according to modern doctrines, to look a little closely into
the sophisms that are getting to be so much in vogue;
and which, whenever they come from our illustrious
ancestors
in Great Britain, have some such effect on the
imaginations
of a portion of our people, as purling rills and
wooded cascades are known to possess over those of
certain
young ladies of fifteen.
Free trade, in its true signification, or in the only
signification
which is not a fallacy, can only mean a commerce
that is
totally unfettered by duties, restrictions,
prohibitions
,
and charges of all sorts
. Except among savages,
the world never yet saw such a state of things, and
probably
never will. Even free trade ports have exactions that,
in a degree, counteract their pretended principle of liberty;
and no free port exists, that is anything more, in a strict
interpretation of its uses, than a sort of bonded
ware-house
.
So long as your goods remain there, on deposit
and unappropriated, they are not taxed; but the instant
they are taken to the
consumer
, the customary impositions
must be paid.
Freer
tradethat is, a trade which is less encumbered
than some admitted state of things which previously
existed
is easily enough comprehended; but, instead of
conveying to the mind any general theory, it merely shows
that a lack of wisdom may have prevailed in the
management
of some particular interest; which lack of wisdom is
now being tardily repaired. Prohibitions, whether direct,
or in the form of impositions that the trade will not bear,
may be removed without leaving trade
free
. This or that
article may be thrown open to the general competition,
without import duty or tax of any sort, and yet the great
bulk of the commerce of a country be so fettered as to put
an effectual check upon anything like liberal intercourse.
Suppose, for instance, that Virginia were an independent
country. Its exports would be tobacco, flour, and corn;
the tobacco crop probably more than equalling in value
those portions of the other crops which are sent out of the
country. England is suffering for food, and she takes off
everything like imposts on the eatables, while she taxes
tobacco
to the amount of many hundred per cent. Can that
be called free trade?
There is another point of view in which we could wish
to protest against the shouts and fallacies of the hour.
Trade, perhaps the most corrupt and corrupting influence
of life  or, if second to anything in evil, second only to
politics  is proclaimed to be the great means of
humanizing
,
enlightening, liberalizing, and improving the human
race! Now, against this monstrous mistake in morals, we
would fain raise our feeble voices in sober remonstrance.
That the intercourse which is a consequence of commerce
may, in certain ways, liberalize a man's views, we are
willing to admit; though, at the same time, we shall insist
that there are better modes of attaining the same ends.
But it strikes us as profane to ascribe to this frail and
mercenary
influence a power which there is every reason to
believe the Almighty has bestowed on the Christian church,
and on that alone; a church which is opposed to most of
the practices of trade, which rebukes them in nearly every
line of its precepts, and which, carried out in its purity,
can alone give the world that liberty and happiness which
a grasping spirit of cupidity is so ready to impute to the
desire to accumulate gold!
Fortunately, there was little occasion to dispute about
the theories of commerce at the Reef. The little trade
that did exist was truly unfettered; but no one supposed
that any man was nearer to God on that account, except
as he was farther removed from temptations to do wrong.
Still, the governing principle was sound; not by canting
about the beneficent and holy influences of commerce, but
by leaving to each man his individuality, or restraining it
11 *
only on those points which the public good demanded.
Instead of monopolizing the trade of the colony, which his
superior wealth and official power would have rendered
very easy, governor Woolston acted in the most liberal
spirit to all around him. With the exception of the Anne,
which was built by the colony, the council had decided, in
some measure contrary to his wishes, though in strict
accordance
with what was right, that all the vessels were the
private property of Mark. After this decision, the governor
formally conveyed the Mermaid and the Abraham to the
state; the former to be retained principally as a cruiser and
a packet, while the last was in daily use as a means of
conveying
articles and passengers, from one island to the other.
The Neshamony was presented, out and out, to Betts, who
turned many a penny with her, by keeping her running
through the different passages, with freight, &c.; going
from plantation to plantation, as these good people were in
the practice of calling their farms. Indeed, Bob did little
else, until the governor, seeing his propensity to stick by
the water, and ascertaining that the intercourse would
justify such an investment, determined to build him a
sloop, in order that he might use her as a sort of packet
and market-boat, united. A vessel of about forty-five tons
was laid down accordingly, and put into the water at the
end of six months, that was just the sort of craft suited to
Bob's wishes and wants. In the mean time, the honest
fellow had resigned his seat in the council, feeling that he
was out of his place in such a body, among men of more
or less education, and of habits so much superior and
more refined than his own. Mark did not oppose this step
in his friend, but rather encouraged it; being persuaded
nothing was gained by forcing upon a man duties he was
hardly fitted to discharge. Self-made men, he well knew,
were sometimes very useful; but he also knew that they
must be first
made
.
The name of this new sloop was the Martha, being thus
called in compliment to her owner's sober-minded,
industrious
and careful wife. She (the sloop, and not Mrs.
Betts) was nearly all cabin, having lockers forward and
aft, and was fitted with benches in her wings, steamboat
fashion. Her canvas was of light duck, there being very
little heavy weather in that climate; so that assisted by a
boy and a Kannaka, honest Bob could do anything he
wished with his craft. He often went to the Peak and
Rancocus Island in her, always doing something useful;
and he even made several trips in her, within the first few
months he had her running, as far as Betto's group. On
these last voyages, he carried over Kannakas as passengers,
as well as various small articles, such as fish-hooks, old
iron, hatchets even, and now and then a little tobacco.
These he exchanged for cocoa-nuts, which were yet scarce
in the colony, on account of the number of mouths to
consume them; baskets, Indian cloth, paddles which the
islanders made very beautifully and with a great deal of
care; bread-fruit, and other plants that abounded more at
Betto's group than at the Reef, or even on the Peak.
But the greatest voyage Betts made that season was
when he took a freight of melons. This was a fruit which
now abounded in the colony; so much so as to be fed even
to the hogs, while the natives knew nothing of it beyond
the art of eating it. They were extraordinarily fond of
melons, and Bob actually filled the cabin of the Martha
with articles obtained in exchange for his cargo. Among
other things obtained on this occasion, was a sufficiency
of sandal-wood to purchase for the owner of the sloop as
many groceries as he could consume in his family for twelve
months; though groceries were high, as may well be
supposed
,
in a place like the Reef. Betts always admitted
that the first great turn in his fortune was the money made
on this voyage, in which he embarked without the least
apprehension of Waally, and his never-ceasing wiles and
intrigues. Indeed, most of his sales were made to that
subtle and active chief, who dealt very fairly by him.
All this time the Rancocus was laid up for want of
something to freight her with. At one time the governor
thought of sending her to pick up a cargo where she could;
but a suggestion by a seaman of the name of Walker set
him on a different track, and put on foot an adventure
which soon attracted the attention of most of the sea-faring
portion of the community.
It had been observed by the crew of the Rancocus, not
only in her original run through those seas, but in her two
subsequent passages from America, that the spermaceti
whale abounded in all that part of the ocean which lay to
windward of the group. Now Walker had once been
second officer of a Nantucket craft, and was regularly
brought up to the business of taking whales. Among the
colonists were half a dozen others who had done more or
less at the same business; and, at the suggestion of Walker,
who had gone out in the Rancocus as her first officer,
captain Saunders laid in a provision of such articles as
were necessary to set up the business. These consisted
of cordage, harpoons, spades, lances, and casks. Then
no small part of the lower hold of the Henlopen was stowed
with shook casks; iron for hoops, &c., being also
provided
.
As the sandal-wood was now obtained in only small
quantities, all idea of sending the ship to Canton again,
that year, was necessarily abandoned. At first this seemed
to be a great loss; but when the governor came to reflect
coolly on the subject, not only he, but the council
generally
,
came to the conclusion that Providence was dealing
more mercifully with them, by turning the people into this
new channel of commerce, than to leave them to pursue
their original track. Sandal-wood had a purely adventitious
value, though it brought, particularly in that age, a most
enormous profit; one so large, indeed, as to have a direct
and quick tendency to demoralize those embarked in the
trade. The whaling business, on the other hand, while it
made large returns, demanded industry, courage,
perseverance
,
and a fair amount of capital. Of vessels, the
colonists had all they wanted; the forethought of Saunders
and the suggestions of Walker furnished the particular
means; and of provisions there was now a superabundance
in the group.
It was exceedingly fortunate that such an occupation
offered to interest and keep alive the spirit of the colonists.
Man must have something to do; some main object to live
for; or he is apt to degenerate in his ambition, and to fall
off in his progress. No sooner was it announced that
whales were to be taken, however, than even the women
became alive to the results of the enterprise. This feeling
was kept up by the governor's letting it be officially known
that each colonist should have one share, or lay, as it
was termed, in the expected cargo which share, or lay,
was to be paid for in provisions. Those actually engaged
in the business had as many lays as it was thought they
could earn; the colony in its collected capacity had a
certain
number more, in return for articles received from the
public stores; and the governor, as owner of the vessels
employed, received one-fifth of the whole cargo, or cargoes.
This last was a very small return for the amount of capital
employed; and it was so understood by those who reaped
the advantages of the owner's liberality.
The Rancocus was not fitted out as a whaler, but was
reserved as a ware-house to receive the oil, to store it until
a cargo was collected, and then was to be used as a means
to convey it to America. For this purpose she was stripped,
had her rigging thoroughly overhauled, was cleaned out
and smoked for rats, and otherwise was prepared for
service
.
While in this state, she lay alongside of the natural
quay, near and opposite to some extensive sheds which had
been erected, as a protection against the heats of the
climate
.
The Henlopen, a compact clump of a brig, that was
roomy on deck, and had stout masts and good rigging, was
fitted out for the whaler; though the Anne was sent to
cruise in company. Five whale-boats, with the necessary
crews, were employed; two remaining with the Anne, and
three in the brig. The Kannakas were found to be
indefatigable
at the oar, and a good number of them were used
on this occasion. About twenty of the largest boys
belonging
to the colony were also sent out, in order to
accustom
them to the sea. These boys were between the ages
of eight and sixteen, and were made useful in a variety of
ways.
Great was the interest awakened in the colony when the
Henlopen and the Anne sailed on this adventure. Many
of the women, the wives, daughters, sisters, or sweethearts
of the whalers, would gladly have gone along; and so
intense
did the feeling become, that the governor determined
to make a festival of the occasion, and to offer to take out
himself, in the Mermaid, as many of both sexes as might
choose to make a trip of a few days at sea, and be
witnesses
of the success of their friends in this new
undertaking
.
Betts also took a party in the Martha. The
Abraham, too, was in company; while the Neshamony was
sent to leeward, to keep a look-out in that quarter, lest the
natives should take it into their heads to visit the group,
while so many of its fighting-men, fully a hundred
altogether
,
were absent. It is true, those who stayed at home
were fully able to beat off Waally and his followers; but
the governor thought it prudent to have a look-out. Such
was the difference produced by habit. When the whole
force of the colony consisted of less than twenty men, it
was thought sufficient to protect itself, could it be brought
to act together; whereas, now, when ten times twenty were
left at home, unusual caution was deemed necessary,
because
the colony was weakened by this expedition of so
many of its members. But everything is comparative with
man.
When all was ready, the whaling expedition sailed; the
governor leading on board the Mermaid, which had no less
than forty females in herBridget and Anne being among
them. The vessels went out by the southern channel,
passing through the strait at the bridge in order to do so.
This course was taken, as it would be easier to turn to
windward in the open water between the south cape and
the Peak, than to do it in the narrow passages between the
islands of the group. The Mermaid led off handsomely,
sparing the Henlopen her courses and royals. Even the
Abraham could spare the last vessel her foresail, the new
purchase turning out to be anything but a traveller. The
women wondered how so slow a vessel could ever catch a
whale!
The direction steered by the fleet carried it close under
the weather side of the Peak, the summit of which was
crowded by the population, to see so unusual and pleasing
a sight. The Martha led, carrying rather more sail, in
proportion to her size, than the Mermaid. It happened, by
one of those vagaries of fortune which so often thwart the
best calculations, that a spout was seen to windward of the
cliffs, at a moment when the sloop was about a league
nearer to it than any other vessel. Now, every vessel in
the fleet had its whale-boat and whale-boat's crew; though
the men of all but those who belonged to the Henlopen
were altogether inexperienced. It is true, they had learned
the theory of the art of taking a whale; but they were
utterly wanting in the practice. Betts was not the man
to have the game in view, however, and not make an effort
to overcome it. His boat was manned in an instant, and
away he went, with Socrates in the bows, to fasten to a
huge creature that was rolling on the water in a species of
sluggish enjoyment of its instincts. It often happens that
very young soldiers, more especially when an
esprit de
corps
has been awakened in them, achieve things from
which older troops would retire, under the consciousness
of their hazards. So did it prove with the Martha's boat's
crew on this occasion. Betts steered, and he put them
directly on the whale; Socrates, who looked fairly green
under the influence of alarm and eagerness to attack, both
increased by the total novelty of his situation, making his
dart of the harpoon when the bows of the fragile craft were
literally over the huge body of the animal. All the energy
of the negro was thrown into his blow, for he felt as if it
were life or death with him; and the whale spouted blood
immediately. It is deemed a great exploit with whalers,
though it is not of very rare occurrence, to inflict a
death-wound
with the harpoon; that implement being intended
to make fast with to the fish, which is subsequently slain
with what is termed a lance. But Socrates actually killed
the first whale he ever struck, with the harpoon; and from
that moment he became an important personage in the
fisheries of those seas. That blow was a sort of Palo Alto
affair to him, and was the forerunner of many similar
successes
.
Indeed, it soon got to be said, that with Bob
Betts to put the boat on, and old Soc to strike, a whale
commonly has a hard time on't. It is true, that a good
many boats were stove, and two Kannakas were drowned,
that very summer, in consequence of these tactics; but
the whales were killed, and Betts and the black escaped
with whole skins.
On this, the first occasion, the whale made the water
foam, half-filled the boat, and would have dragged it under
but for the vigour of the negro's arm, and the home
character
of the blow, which caused the fish to turn up and
breathe his last, before he had time to run any great
distance
.
The governor arrived on the spot, just as Bob
had got a hawser to the whale and was ready to fill away
for the South Cape channel again. The vessels passed
each other cheering, and the governor admonished his
friend not to carry the carcass too near the dwellings, lest it
should render them uninhabitable. But Betts had his
anchorage
already in his eye, and away he went, with the
wind on his quarter, towing his prize at the rate of four or
five knots. It may be said, here, that the Martha went
into the passage, and that the whale was floated into shallow
water, where sinking was out of the question, and Bob and
his Kannakas, about twenty in number, went to work to peel
off the blubber in a very efficient, though not in a very
scientific, or artistical manner. They got the creature
stripped of its jacket of fat that very night, and next
morning
the Martha appeared with a set of kettles, in which the
blubber was tried out. Casks were also brought in the
sloop, and, when the work was done, it was found that that
single whale yielded one hundred and eleven barrels of oil,
of which thirty-three barrels were head-matter! This was
a capital commencement for the new trade, and Betts
conveyed
the whole of his prize to the Reef, where the oil was
started into the ground-tier of the Rancocus, the casks of
which were newly repaired, and ready stowed to receive it.
A week later, as the governor in the Mermaid, cruising
in company with the Henlopen and Abraham, was looking
out for whales about a hundred miles to windward of the
Peak, having met with no success, he was again joined by
Betts in the Martha. Everything was reported right at the
Reef. The Neshamony had come in for provisions and
gone out again, and the Rancocus would stand up without
watching, with her hundred and eleven barrels of oil in
her lower hold. The governor expressed his sense of
Betts' services, and reminding him of his old faculty of
seeing farther and truer than most on board, he asked him
to go up into the brig's cross-trees and take a look for
whales. The keen-eyed fellow had not been aloft ten
minutes, before the cry of spoutsspouts! was ringing
through the vessel. The proper signal was made to the
Henlopen and Abraham, when everybody made sail in the
necessary direction. By sunset a great number of whales
were fallen in with, and as Capt. Walker gave it as his
opinion they were feeding in that place, no attempt was
made on them until morning. The next day, however,
with the return of light, six boats were in the water, and
pulling off towards the game.
On this occasion, Walker led on, as became his rank
and experience. In less than an hour he was fast to a very
large whale, a brother of that taken by Betts; and the
females had the exciting spectacle, of a boat towed by an
enormous fish, at a rate of no less than twenty knots in an
hour. It is the practice among whalers for the vessel to
keep working to windward, while the game is taking, in
order to be in the most favourable position to close with
the boats, after the whale is killed. So long, however, as
the creature has life in it, it would be folly to aim at any
other object than getting to windward, for the fish may be
here at one moment, and a league off in a few minutes
more. Sometimes, the alarmed animal goes fairly out of
sight of the vessel, running in a straight line some fifteen
or twenty miles, when the alternatives are to run the
chances of missing the ship altogether, or to cut from the
whale. By doing the last not only is a harpoon lost, but
often several hundred fathoms of line; and it not
unfrequently
happens that whales are killed with harpoons in
them, left by former assailants, and dragging after them a
hundred, or two, fathoms of line.
It may be well, here, to explain to the uninitiated reader,
that the harpoon is a barbed spear, with a small, but stout
cord, or whale line fastened to it. The boat approaches
the fish bow foremost, but is made sharp at both ends that
it may back off, if necessary; the whale being often
dangerous to approach, and ordinarily starting, when struck,
in a way to render his immediate neighbourhood somewhat
ticklish. The fish usually goes down when harpooned,
and the line must be permitted to run-out, or he would
drag the boat after him. But a whale must breathe as
well as a man, and the faster he runs the sooner he must
come up for a fresh stock of air. Now, the proper use of
the harpoon and the line is merely to fasten to the fish;
though it does sometimes happen that the creature is killed
Vol. II.  12
by the former. As soon as the whale re-appears on the
surface, and becomes stationary, or even moderate his
speed a little, the men begin to haul in line, gradually
closing with their intended victim. It often happens that
the whale starts afresh, when line must be permitted to run
out anew; this process of hauling in and letting run
being often renewed several times at the taking of a single
fish. When the boat can be hauled near enough, the
officer at its head darts his lance into the whale, aiming at
a vital part. If the creature spouts blood, it is well;
but if not hit in the vitals, away it goes, and the whole
business
of letting run, towing, and hauling in has
to be gone over again.
On the present occasion, Walker's harpooner, or
boat-steerer
,
as he is called, had made a good heave, and
was well fast to his fish. The animal made a great circuit,
running completely round the Mermaid, at a distance
which enabled those on board her to see all that was
passing
.
When nearest to the brig, and the water was curling
off the bow of the boat in combs two feet higher than her
gunwale, under the impulse given by the frantic career of
the whale, Bridget pressed closer to her husband's side,
and, for the first time in her life, mentally thanked Heaven
that he was the governor, since that was an office which
did not require him to go forth and kill whales. At that
very moment, Mark was burning with the desire to have
a hand in the sport, though he certainly had some doubts
whether such an occupation would suitably accord with the
dignity of his office.
Walker got alongside of his whale, within half a mile
of the two brigs, and to-leeward of both. In consequence
of this favourable circumstance, the Henlopen soon had its
prize hooked on, and her people at work stripping off the
blubber. This is done by hooking the lower block of a
powerful purchase in a portion of the substance, and then
cutting a strip of convenient size, and heaving on the fall
at the windlass. The strip is cut by implements called
spades, and the blubber is torn from the carcass by the
strain, after the sides of the blanket-piece, as the strip
is termed, are separated from the other portions of the
animal
by the cutting process. The blanket-pieces are
often raised as high as the lower mast-heads, or as far as
the purchase will admit of its being carried, when a
transverse
cut is made, and the whole of the fragment is lowered
on deck. This blanket-piece is then cut into pieces
and put into the try-works, a large boiler erected on deck,
in order to be tryed-out, when the oil is cooled, and
started below into casks. In this instance, the oil was
taken on board the Abraham as fast as it was tryed-out
on board the Henlopen, the weather admitting of the
transfer.
But that single whale was from being the only fruits
of Betts' discovery. The honest old Delaware seaman took
two more whales himself, Socrates making fast, and he
killing the creatures. The boats of the Henlopen also took
two more, and that of the Abraham, one. Betts in the
Martha, and the governor in the Mermaid towed four of
these whales into the southern channel, and into what now
got the name of the Whaling Bight. This was the spot
where Betts had tryed out the first fish taken, and it proved
to be every way suitable for its business. The Bight
formed a perfectly safe harbour, and there was not only a
sandy shoal on which the whales could be floated and kept
from sinking, a misfortune that sometimes occurs, but it
had a natural quay quite near, where the Rancocus,
herself
,
could lie. There was fresh water in abundance, and
an island of sufficient size to hold the largest whaling
establishment
that ever existed. This island was incontinently
named Blubber Island. The greatest disadvantage was the
total absence of soil, and consequently of all sorts of
herbage
;
but its surface was as smooth as that of an artificial
quay, admitting of the rolling of casks with perfect ease.
The governor no sooner ascertained the facilities of the
place, which was far enough from the ordinary passage to
and from the Peak to remove the nuisances, than he
determined
to make it his whaling haven.
The Abraham was sent across to Rancocus Island for a
load of lumber, and extensive sheds were erected, in time
to receive the Henlopen, when she came in with a thousand
barrels of oil on board, and towing in three whales that she
had actually taken in the passage between Cape South and
the Peak. By that time, the Rancocus had been moved,
being stiff enough to be brought from the Reef to Blubber
Island, under some of her lower sails. This moving of
vessels among the islands of the group was a very easy
matter, so long as they were not to be carried to windward;
and, a further acquaintance with the channels, had let the
mariners into the secret of turning up, against the trades
and within the islands, by keeping in such reaches as
enabled them to go as near the wind as was necessary,
while they were not compelled to go nearer than a craft
could lie.
Such was the commencement of a trade that was
destined
to be of the last importance to our colonists. The
oil that was brought in, from this first cruise, a cruise that
lasted less than two months, and including that taken by
all the boats, amounted to two thousand barrels, quite
filling
the lower hold of the Rancocus, and furnishing her
with more than half of a full cargo. At the prices which
then ruled in the markets of Europe and America, three
thousand five hundred barrels of spermaceti, with a due
proportion of head matter, was known to be worth near
an hundred thousand dollars; and might be set down as
large a return for labour, as men could obtain under the
most advantageous circumstances.
CHAPTER X.
The forest reels beneath the stroke
Of sturdy woodman's axe;
The earth receives the white man's yoke,
And pays her willing tax
Of fruits, and flowers, and golden harvest fields,
And all that nature to blithe labour yields.
Paulding
.
Notwithstanding
the great success which attended the
beginning of the whaling, it was six months before the
Rancocus was loaded, and ready to sail for Hamburgh
with her cargo. This time the ship went east, at once,
instead of sailing to the westward, as she had previously
donetaking with her a crew composed partly of colonists
and partly of Kannakas. Six boys, however, went in the
ship, the children of reputable settlers; all of whom the
governor intended should be officers, hereafter, on board
of colony vessels. To prevent difficulties on the score of
national character, on leaving America the last time,
Saunders had cleared for the islands of the Pacific and a
market; meaning to cover his vessel, let her go where she
might, by the latter reservation. This question of
nationality
offered a good deal of embarrassment in the long run,
and the council foresaw future embarrassments as
connected
with the subject; but, every one of the colonists
being of American birth, and America being then neutral,
and all the American-built vessels having American papers,
it was thought most prudent to let things take their natural
course, under the existing arrangement, until something
occurred to render a more decided policy advisable.
As soon as the Rancocus got off, the Henlopen went
out again, to cruise about two hundred leagues to
windward
;
while the inshore fishery was carried on by Betts,
in the Martha, with great spirit and most extraordinary
success. So alive did the people get to be to the profit
and sport of this sort of business, that boats were
constructed
,
and crews formed all over the colony, there being
often as many as a dozen different parties out, taking
whales near the coasts. The
furor
existed on the Peak,
as well as in the low lands, and Bridget and Anne could
not but marvel that men would quit the delicious coolness,
the beautiful groves, and all the fruits and bountiful
products
of that most delightful plain, to go out on the ocean,
in narrow quarters, and under a hot sun, to risk their lives
in chase of the whale! This did the colonists,
nevertheless
,
until the governor himself began to feel the necessity
of striking a whale, if he would maintain his proper place
in the public opinion.
As respects the governor, and the other high
functionaries
of the colony, some indulgence was entertained; it
being the popular notion that men who lived so much
within doors, and whose hands got to be so soft, were not
exactly the sort of persons who would be most useful at
12 *
the oar. Heaton, and the merchants, Pennock, and the
two younger Woolstons, with the clergyman, were easily
excused in the popular mind; but the governor was known
to be a prime seaman, and a silent expectation appeared to
prevail, that some day he would be seen in the bow of a
boat, lancing a whale. Before the first season was over,
this expectation was fully realized; Governor Woolston
heading no less than four of what were called the colony
boats, or boats that belonged to the state, and fished as
much for honour as profit, taking a fine whale on each
occasion. These exploits of the governor's capped the
climax, in the way of giving a tone to the public mind, on
the subject of taking whales. No man could any longer
doubt of its being honourable, as well as useful, and even
the boys petitioned to be allowed to go out. The
Kannakas
,
more or less of whom were employed in each vessel,
rose greatly in the public estimation, and no
young
man
could expect to escape animadversion, unless he had been
present at least once at the taking of a whale. Those who
had struck or lanced a fish were now held in a
proportionate
degree of repute. It was, in fact, in this group
that the custom originally obtained, which prohibited a
young man from standing at the head of the dance who
had not struck his fish; and not at Nantucket, as has been
erroneously supposed.
In a community where such a spirit was awakened, it is
not surprising that great success attended the fisheries.
The Henlopen did well, bringing in eight hundred barrels;
but she found six hundred more in waiting for her, that
had been taken by the in-shore fishermen; some using the
Abraham, some the Martha, some the Anne, and others
again nothing but the boats, in which they pursued their
game. In the latter cases, however, when a fish was
taken, one of the larger vessels was usually employed to
take the creature into the Bight. In this way was the oil
obtained, which went to make up a cargo for the
Henlopen
.
The governor had his doubts about sending this
brig on so distant a voyage, the vessel being so slow; but
there was no choice, since she must go, or the cargo must
remain a long time where it was. The brig was
accordingly
filled up, taking in seventeen hundred barrels; and
she sailed for Hamburgh, under the command of a young
man named Thomas. Walker remained behind,
preferring
to superintend the whaling affairs at home.
So high did the fever run, by this time, that it was
determined
to build a couple of vessels, each to measure about
a hundred and eighty tons, with the sole object of using
them to take the whale. Six months after laying their
keels, these little brigs were launched; and lucky it was
that the governor had ordered copper for a ship to be
brought out, since it now came handy for using on these
two craft. But, the whaling business had not been suffered
to lag while the Jonas and the Dragon were on the stocks;
the Anne, and the Martha, and the single boats, being out
near half the time. Five hundred barrels were taken in
this way; and Betts, in particular, had made so much
money, or, what was the same thing, had got so much oil,
that he came one morning to his friend the governor, when
the following interesting dialogue took place between them,
in the audience-chamber of the Colony House. It may as
well be said here, that the accommodations for the chief
magistrate had been materially enlarged, and that he now
dwelt in a suite of apartments that would have been deemed
respectable even in Philadelphia. Bridget had a taste for
furniture, and the wood of Rancocus Island admitted of
many articles being made that were really beautiful, and
which might have adorned a palace. Fine mats had been
brought from China, such as are, and long have been, in
common use in America; neat and quaint chairs and
settees
had also been in the governor's invoices, to say nothing
of large quantities of fine and massive earthenware. In a
word, the governor was getting to be rich, and like all
wealthy men, he had a disposition to possess, in a
proportionate
degree, the comforts and elegancies of civilized life.
But to come to our dialogue
Walk in, Captain Bettswalk in, sir, and do me the
favour to take a chair, said the governor, motioning to
his old friend to be seated. You are always welcome,
here; for I do not forget old times, I can assure you, my
friend.
Thankee, governor; thankee, with all my heart. I
do
find everything changed, now-a-days, if the truth must
be said, but yourself. To me,
you
be always, Mr. Mark,
and Mr. Woolston, and we seem to sail along in company,
much as we did the time you first went out a foremast-lad,
and I teached you the difference between a flat-knot and a
granny.
No, no, Bob, everything is not so much changed as
you pretendI am not changed, in the first place.
I confess it
you
be the same, governor, blow high,
or blow low.
Then Martha is not changed, or nothing worth
mentioning
.
A little more matronly, perhaps, and not quite
as much of a girl as when you first made her acquaintance;
but Martha, nevertheless. And, as for her heart, I 'll
answer
for it, that is just the colour it was at sixteen.
Why, yes, governor; 'tis much as you say. Marthy
is now the mother of four children, and that confarms a
woman's appearance, depend on 't. But, Marthy is
Marthy
;
and, for that matter, Miss Bridget is Miss Bridget,
as much as one pea is like another. Madam Woolston
does full credit to the climate, governor, and looks more
like eighteen than ever.
My wife enjoys excellent health, Betts; and grateful
am I God that it is so. But I think all our women have
a fresh and sea-air sort of look, a cheerful freshness about
them, that I ascribe to the salt and the sea-breezes. Then
we have mountain air, in addition, on the Peak.
Ay, ay, sirI dare say you 've got it right, as you do
most matters. Well, governor, I don't know which counts
up the fastest in the colony, children or whales?
Both flourish, answered Mark, smiling, as our
reports
show. Mr. Secretary tells me that there were, on the
first of the last month, three hundred and eighteen children
in the colony under the age of ten years; of whom no less
than one hundred and ninety-seven are born herepure
Craterinos, including your children and mine, Betts.
It 's a fine beginning, governora most capital start;
and, though the young 'uns can't do much at taking a
whale, or securing the ile, just now, they'll come on in
their turns, and be useful when we 're in dock as hulks,
sir.
Talking of oil, you must be getting rich, Captain
Betts. I hear you got in another hundred-barrel gentleman
last week!
Times is altered with me, governor; and times is
altered with you, too, sir, since you and I rafted loam and
sea-weed, to raise a few cucumbers, and squashes, and
melons.
Then
, we should have been as happy as princes
to have had a good roof over our heads.
I trust we are both thankful, where thanks are due, for
all this, Betts?
Why, yes, sir, I endivour so to be; though men is
desperate
apt to believe they desarve all they get but the ill
luck. I and Marthy try to think of what is all in all to us,
and I believe Marthy does make out pretty well, in that
partic'lar, accordin' to Friends' ways; though I am often
jammed in religion, and all for want of taking to it early,
as I sometimes think, sir.
There is no doubt, Betts, that men grow in Christian
character, as well as in evil; and the most natural growth,
in all things, is that of the young. A great deal is to be
undone and unlearned, if we put off the important hour to
a late period in life.
Well, as to unl'arnin', I suppose a fellow that had as
little edication as myself will have an easy time of it,
answered
Betts, with perfect simplicity and good faith; for
most of my schoolin' was drowned in salt water by the time
I was twelve.
I am glad of one thing, put in the governor, half in
a congratulating way, and half inquiringly; and that is,
that the Rev. Mr. Hornblower takes so well with the
people
.
Everybody appears to be satisfied with his
ministrations
;
and I do not see that any one is the worse for them,
although he is an Episcopalian.
Betts twisted about on his chair, and seemed at first
unwilling
to answer; but his natural frankness, and his long
habits of intimacy and confidence with Mark Woolston,
both as man and boy, forbade his attempting anything
seriously in the way of concealment.
Well, governor, they
do
say that `many men, many
minds,' he replied, after a brief pause; and I suppose
it 's as true about religion, as in a judgment of ships, or in
a ch'ice of a wife. If all men took to the same woman, or
all seamen shipped for the same craft, a troublesome
household
,
and a crowded and onhealthy vessel, would be the
upshot on't.
We have a choice given us by Providence, both as to
ships and as to wives, Captain Betts; but no choice is
allowed any of us in what relates to religion. In that, we
are to mind the sailor's maxim, `to obey orders if we break
owners.'
Little fear of `breaking owners,' I fancy, governor.
But, the difficulty is to know what orders is. Now, Friends
doesn't hold, at all, to dressing and undressing in church
time; and I think, myself, books is out of place in praying
to God.
And is there much said among the people, Captain
Betts, about the parson's gown and surplice, and about his
reading
his prayers, instead of writing them out, and
getting
them by heart?
There was a little malice in the governor's question, for
he was too much behind the curtain to be the dupe of any
pretending claims to sudden inspirations, and well knew
that every sect had its liturgy, though only half-a-dozen
have the honesty to print them. The answer of his friend
was, as usual, frank, and to the point.
I cannot say but there is, Mr. Mark. As for the
clothes, women will talk about
them
, as you well know,
sir; it being their natur' to be dressing themselves out, so
much. Then as to praying from the book, quite half of
our people think it is not any better than no praying at all.
A little worse, perhaps, if truth was spoken.
I am sorry to hear this, Betts. From the manner in
which they attend the services, I was in hopes that
prejudices
were abating, and that everybody was satisfied.
I don't think, governor, that there is any great danger
of a mutiny; though, many men, many minds, as I said
before. But, my business here is forgotten all this time;
and I know it is n't with your honour now as it used to be
with us both, when we had nothing to think of but the
means of getting away from this place, into some other
that we fancied might be better. I wish you joy, sir, in
having got the two new brigs into the water.
Thank you, Captain Betts. Does your present visit
relate to either of those brigs?
Why, to come to the p'int, it does, sir. I 've taken
a fancy to the Dragon, and should like to buy her.
Buy her! Have you any notion what such a vessel
will cost, Betts?
Not a great way from eight thousand dollars, I should
think, governor, now that the copper is on. Some things
is charged high, in this part of the world, about a wessel,
and other some is n't. Take away the copper, and I should
think a good deal less would buy either.
And have you eight thousand dollars at command, my
friend, with which to purchase the brig?
If ile is money, yes; if ile is n't money, no. I 've got
three hundred barrels on hand, one hundred of which is
head-matter.
I rejoice to hear this, Captain Betts, and the brig you
shall have. I thought to have sold both to the merchants,
for I did not suppose any one else, here, could purchase
them; but I would greatly prefer to see one of them in the
hands of an old friend. You shall have the Dragon, Betts,
since you like her.
Done and done between gentlemen, is enough, sir;
not that I set myself up for a gentleman, governor, but I 've
lived too long and too much in your respected society not
to have l'arn'd some of the ways. The brig 's mine, if ile
will pay for her. And now, sir, having completed the
trade, I
should
like to know if your judgment and mine be
the same. I say the Dragon will beat the Jonas half a
knot, the best day the Jonas ever seed.
I do not know but you are right, Bob. In looking at
the two craft, last evening, I gave the preference to the
Dragon, though I kept my opinion to myself, lest I might
mortify those who built the Jonas.
Well, sir, I 'm better pleased to hear this, than to be
able to pay for the brig! It is something to a plain body
like myself, to find his judgment upheld by them that know
all about a matter.
In this friendly and perfectly confidential way did Mark
Woolston still act with his old and long-tried friend,
Robert
Betts. The Dragon was cheap at the money
mentioned
,
and the governor took all of the old seaman's `ile'
at the very top of the market. This purchase at once
elevated
Betts in the colony, to a rank but a little below that
of the `gentlemen,' if his modesty disposed him to decline
being classed absolutely with them. What was more, it
put him in the way of almost coining money. The brig
he purchased turned out to be as fast as he expected, and
what was more, the character of a lucky vessel, which she
got the very first cruise, never left her, and gave her
commander
and owner, at all times, a choice of hands.
The governor sold the Jonas to the merchants, and took
the Martha off Betts' hands, causing this latter craft to
run regularly, and at stated hours, from point to point
among the islands, in the character of a packet. Twice a
week she passed from the Reef to the Cove at the Peak,
and once a fortnight she went to Rancocus Island. In
addition to her other duties, this sloop now carried the
mail.
A post-office law was passed by the council, and was
approved of by the governor. In that day, and in a
community
so simple and practical, new-fangled theories
concerning
human rights were not allowed to interfere with
regulations that were obviously necessary to the comfort
and convenience of the public.
Fortunately, there was yet no newspaper, a species of
luxury, which, like the gallows, comes in only as society
advances to the corrupt condition; or which, if it happen
to precede it a little, is very certain soon to conduct it
there. If every institution became no more than what it
was designed to be, by those who originally framed it, the
state of man on earth would be very different from what it
is. The unchecked means of publicity, out of all question,
are indispensable to the circulation of truths; and it is
equally certain that the unrestrained means of publicity
are equally favourable to the circulation of lies. If we
cannot get along safely without the possession of one of
these advantages, neither can we get along very safely
while existing under the daily, hourly, increasing influence
of the othercall it what you will. If truth is all-important,
in one sense, falsehood is all-important too, in a contrary
sense.
Had there been a newspaper at the Crater, under the
control of some philosopher, who had neither native talent,
nor its substitute education, but who had been struck out
of a printer's devil by the rap of a composing-stick, as
Minerva is reported to have been struck, full-grown, out
of Jupiter's head by the hammer of Vulcan, it is probable
that the wiseacre might have discovered that it was an
inexcusable interference with the rights of the colonists,
to enact that no one should carry letters for hire, but those
connected with the regular post-office. But, no such
person
existing, the public mind was left to the enjoyment of
its common-sense ignorance, which remained satisfied with
the fact that, though it might be possible to get a letter
carried from the Reef to the Cove, between which places
the communications were constant and regular, for half the
money charged by the office, yet it was not possible to get
letters carried between some of the other points in the
colony for twenty times the regulated postage. It is probable,
therefore, that the people of the Crater and the Peak felt,
that in supporting a general system, which embraced the
good of all, they did more towards extending civilization,
than if they killed the hen, at once, in order to come at
the depository of the golden eggs, in the shortest way.
In the middle ages, he who wished to send a missive,
was compelled, more than half the time, to be at the
expense
of a special messenger. The butchers, and a class
of traders that corresponds, in part, to the modern English
traveller, took charge of letters, on the glorious Free Trade
principle; and sometimes public establishments hired
messengers
to go back and forth, for their own purposes.
Then, the governments, perceiving the utility of such
arrangements
,
imperfect as they were, had a sort of
post-offices
for their use, which have reached down to our own
times, in the shape of government messengers. There can
be little doubt that the man who found he could get a letter
safely and promptly conveyed five hundred miles for a
crown, after having been obliged previously to pay twenty
for the same service, felt that he was the obliged party,
and never fancied for a moment, that, in virtue of his
patronage
, he was entitled to give himself airs, and to
stand upon his natural right to have a post-office of his
Vol. II.  13
own, at the reduced price. But, indulgence creates
wantonness
,
and the very men who receive the highest favours
from the post-offices of this country, in which a letter is
carried five-and-twenty hundred miles for ten cents,
penetrating
,
through some fourteen or fifteen thousand offices,
into every cranny of a region large as half Europe, kicks
and grows restive because he has not the liberty of doing
a few favoured portions of the vast enterprise for himself;
while he imposes on the public the office of doing that
which is laborious and unprofitable! Such is man; such
did he become when he fell from his first estate; and such
is he likely to continue to be until some far better panacea
shall be discovered for his selfishness and cupidity, than
what is called `self-government.'
But the Craterinos were thankful when they found that
the Martha was set to running regularly, from place to
place, carrying passengers and the mails. The two
businesses
were blended together for the sake of economy, and
at the end of a twelvemonth it was found that the colony
had nothing extra to pay. On the whole, the enterprise
may be said to have succeeded; and as practice usually
improves all such matters, in a few months it was
ascertained
that another very important step had been taken on
the high-road of civilization. Certainly, the colonists could
not be called a letter-writing people, considered as a whole,
but the facilities offered a temptation to improve, and, in
time, the character of the entire community received a
beneficial impression from the introduction of the mails.
It was not long after the two brigs were sold, and just
as the Martha came into government possession, that all
the principal functionaries made a tour of the whole
settlements
,
using the sloop for that purpose. One of the
objects was to obtain statistical facts; though personal
observation
,
with a view to future laws, was the principal
motive. The governor, secretary, attorney-general, and
most of the council were along; and pleasure and business
being thus united, their wives were also of the party.
There being no necessity for remaining in the Martha at
night, that vessel was found amply sufficient for all other
purposes, though the progress occupied fully a fortnight.
As a brief relation of its details will give the reader a full
idea of the present state of the country, as the colonists
now began to call their territories, we propose to
accompany
the travellers, day by day, and to give some short
account
of what they saw, and of what they did. The
Martha sailed from the cove about eight in the morning,
having on board seventeen passengers, in addition to two
or three who were going over to Rancocus Island on their
regular business. The sloop did not sail, however, directly
for the last-named island, but made towards the volcano,
which had of late ceased to be as active as formerly, and
into the condition of which it was now deemed important
to make some inquiries. The Martha was a very fast
vessel
,
and was soon quietly anchored in a small bay, on the
leeward side of the island, where landing was not only
practicable but easy. For the first time since its existence
the crater was ascended. All the gentlemen went up,
and Heaton took its measurement by means of
instruments
.
The accumulation of materials, principally ashes
and scori, though lava had begun to appear in one or two
small streams, had been very great since the governor's
first visit to the spot. The island now measured about two
miles in diameter, and being nearly round, might be said
to be somewhere near six in circumference. The crater
itself was fully half a mile in diameter, and, at that
moment
,
was quite a thousand feet in height above the sea.
In the centre of this vast valley, were three smaller craters
or chimneys, which served as outlets to the fires beneath.
A plain had formed within the crater, some four hundred
feet below its summit, and it already began to assume that
sulphur-tinged and unearthly hue, that is so common in
and about active volcanoes. Occasionally, a deep roaring
would be succeeded by a hissing sound, not unlike that
produced by a sudden escape of steam from a boiler, and
then a report would follow, accompanied by smoke and
stones; some of the latter of which were projected several
hundred yards into the air, and fell on the plain of the
crater. But these explosions were not one-tenth as frequent
as formerly.
The result of all the observations was to create an
impression
that this outlet to the fires beneath was
approaching
a period when it would become inactive, and when,
indeed, some other outlet for the pent forces might be
made. After passing half-a-day on and around the
volcano
,
even Bridget and Anne mustered courage and
strength to ascend it, supported by the willing arms of
their husbands. The females were rewarded for their
trouble, though both declared that they should ever feel a
most profound respect for the place after this near view of
its terrors as well as of its beauties.
On quitting the volcano, the Martha proceeded directly
to leeward, reaching Rancocus Island about sunset. Here
the sloop anchored in the customary haven, and everybody
but her crew landed. The fort was still kept up at this
place, on account of the small number of the persons who
dwelt there, though little apprehension now existed of a
visit from the natives; with the exception of the Kannakas,
who went back and forth constantly on board the different
craft in which they were employed, not a native had been
near either island of the colony since the public visit of
young Ooroony, on the occasion of bringing over labourers
to help to form the grounds of Colony House. The number
and force of the different vessels would seem to have
permanently
settled the question of ascendency in those seas,
and no one any longer believed it was a point to be
controverted
.
The population on Rancocus Island did not amount to
more than fifty souls, and these included women and
children. Of the latter, however, there were not yet
many; though five or six were born annually, and scarcely
one died. The men kept the mill going, cutting lumber
of all sorts; and they made both bricks and lime, in
sufficient
quantities to supply the wants of the two other
islands. At first, it had been found necessary to keep a
greater force there, but, long before the moment of which
we are writing, the people had all got into their regular
dwellings, and the materials now required for building
were merely such as were used in additions, or new
constructions
.
The last, however, kept the men quite
actively
employed; but, as they got well paid for their work,
everybody seemed contented. The Martha never arrived
without bringing over quantities of fruits, as well as
vegetables
,
the Rancocusers, lumber-men like, paying but little
attention to gardening or husbandry. The island had its
productions, and there was available land enough, perhaps,
to support a few thousand people, but, after the group and
the Peak, the place seemed so little tempting to the
farmers
,
that no one yet thought of using it for the ordinary
means of supporting life. The visitors, as the party
called themselves, had an inquiry made into the state of
the animals that had been turned loose, on the pastures and
mountain-sides of the island, to seek their own living.
The hogs, as usual, had increased largely; it was
supposed
there might be near two hundred of these animals,
near half of which, however, were still grunters. The
labourers occasionally killed one, but the number grew so
fast that it was foreseen it would be necessary to have an
annual hunt, in order to keep it down. The goats did
particularily well, though they remained so much on the
highest peaks as to be seldom approached by any of the
men. The cow had also increased her progeny, there
being now no less than four younger animals, all of whom
yielded milk to the people. The poultry flourished here,
as it did in all that region, the great abundance of fruit,
worms, insects, &c. rendering it unnecessary to feed them,
though Indian-corn was almost to be had for the asking,
throughout all the islands. This grain was rarely
harvested
,
except as it was wanted, and the hogs that were
fattened were usually turned in upon it in the fields.
It may be well to say, that practice and experience had
taught the colonists something in the way of fattening their
pork. The animals were kept in the group until they were
about eighteen months old, when they were regularly
transported
to the cove, in large droves, and made to ascend the
steps, passing the last two months of their lives amid the
delightful groves of the Peak. Here they had acorns in
abundance, though their principal food was Indian corn,
being regularly attended by Kannakas who had been trained
to the business. At killing-time, each man either came
himself, or sent some one to claim his hogs; all of which
were slaughtered on the Peak, and carried away in the
form of pork. The effect of this change was to make
much finer meat, by giving the animals a cooler atmosphere
and purer food.
13*
From Rancocus Island the Martha sailed for the group,
which was visited and inspected in all its settlements by the
governor and council. The policy adopted by the
government
of the colony was very much unlike that resorted to
in America, in connection with the extension of the
settlements
.
Here a vast extent of surface is loosely overrun,
rendering the progress of civilization rapid, but very
imperfect
.
Were the people of the United States confined to
one-half the territory they now occupy, there can be little
question that they would be happier, more powerful, more
civilized, and less rude in manners and feelings; although
it may be high treason to insinuate that they are not all,
men, women and children, already at the
ne plus ultra
of
each of those attainments. But there is a just medium in
the density of human population, as well as in other things;
and that has not yet been reached, perhaps, even in the
most thickly peopled of any one of the Old Thirteen.
Now, Mark Woolston had seen enough of the fruits of a
concentrated physical force, in Europe, to comprehend their
value; and he early set his face against the purely
skimming
process. He was resolved that the settlements should
not extend faster than was necessary, and that as much of
civilization should go with them as was attainable. In
consequence of this policy, the country soon obtained a
polished aspect, as far as the settlements reached. There
were four or five distinct points that formed exceptions to
this rule, it having been considered convenient to make
establishments there, principally on account of the whalers.
One, and the largest of these isolated settlements, was in
the Whaling Bight, quite near to Blubber Island, where a
village had sprung up, containing the houses and shops
of coopers, rope-makers, boat-builders, carpenters,
blacksmiths
,
&c.; men employed in making casks, whaling
gear, and boats. There also were the dwellings of three
or four masters and mates of vessels, as well as of sundry
boat-steerers. In the whole, there might have been fifty
habitations at this particular point; of which about
two-thirds
were in a straggling village, while the remainder
composed so many farm-houses. Everything at this place
denoted activity and a prosperous business; the merchants
taking the oil as fast as it was ready, and returning for it,
hoops, iron in bars, hemp, and such other articles as were
wanted for the trade.
By this time, the Rancocus had returned, and had
discharged
her inward-bound cargo at the Reef, bringing
excellent returns for the oil sent to Hamburgh. She now
lay in Whaling Bight, being about to load anew with oil
that had been taken during her absence. Saunders was as
busy as a bee; and Mrs. Saunders, who had come across
from her own residence on the Peak, in order to remain as
long as possible with her husband, was as happy as the day
was long; seeming never to tire of exhibiting her presents
to the other women of the Bight.
At the Reef itself, an exceedingly well-built little town
was springing up. Since the removal of the whaling
operations
to the Bight, all nuisances were abated, and the
streets, quays, and public walks were as neat as could be
desired. The trees had grown wonderfully, and the
gardens
appeared as verdant and fresh as if they had a
hundred
feet of loam beneath them, instead of resting on solid
lava, as was the fact. These gardens had increased in
numbers and extent, so that the whole town was embedded
in verdure and young trees. That spot, on which the sun
had once beaten so fiercely as to render it often too hot to
be supported by the naked foot, was now verdant, cool,
and refreshing, equally to the eye and to the feelings. The
streets were narrow, as is desirable in warm climates
thus creating shade, as well as increasing the draughts of
air through them; it being in the rear that the houses
obtained
space for ventilation as well as for vegetation. The
whole number of dwellings on the Reef now amounted to
sixty-four; while the warehouses, public buildings, ships,
offices, and other constructions, brought the number of the
roofs up to one hundred. These buildings, Colony House
and the warehouses excepted, were not very large
certainly
;
but they were of respectable dimensions, and neat
and well put together. Colony House was large, as has
been mentioned; and though plain, certain ornaments had
been completed, which contributed much to its
appearance
.
Every building, without exception, had some sort
of verandah to it; and as most of these additions were
now embowered in shrubs or vines, they formed delightful
places of retreat during the heat of the day.
By a very simple process, water was pumped up from the
largest spring by means of wind-sails, and conveyed in
wooden logs to every building in the place. The logs
were laid through the gardens, for the double purpose of
getting soil to cover them, and to put them out of the way.
Without the town, a regular system had been adopted, by
which to continue to increase the soil. The rock was
blown out, as stone was wanted; leaving, however, a quay
around the margin of the island. As soon as low enough,
the cavities became the receptacles of everything that could
contribute to form soil; and one day in each month was
set apart for a bee; during which little was done but to
transport earth from Loam Island, which was far from
being exhausted yet, or even levelled, and scattering it on
those hollow spots. In this manner, a considerable extent
of surface, nearest to the town, had already been covered,
and seeded, and planted, so that it was now possible to walk
from the town to the crater, a distance of a quarter of a
mile, and be the whole time amid flowering shrubs, young
trees, and rich grasses!
As for the crater itself, it was now quite a gem in the
way of vegetation. Its cocoa-nut trees bore profusely; and
its figs, oranges, limes, shaddocks, &c. &c., were not only
abundant, but rich and large. The Summit was in spots
covered with delicious groves, and the openings were of as
dark a verdure, the year round, as if the place lay twenty
degrees farther from the equator than was actually the
case. Here Kitty, followed by a flock of descendants, was
permitted still to rove at large, the governor deeming her
rights in the place equal to his own. The plain of the
crater was mostly under tillage, being used as a common
garden for all who dwelt in the town. Each person was
taxed so many days, in work, or in money, agreeably to a
village ordinance, and by such means was the spot tilled;
in return, each person, according to a scale that was
regulated
by the amount of the contribution, was allowed to
come or send daily, and dig and carry away a stated
quantity
of fruits and vegetables. All this was strictly
regulated
by a town law, and the gardener had charge of the
execution of the ordinance; but the governor had privately
intimated to him that there was no necessity for his being
very particular, so long as the people were so few, and the
products so abundant. The entire population of the Reef
proper amounted, at this visitation, to just three hundred
and twenty-six persons, of whom near a hundred were
under twelve years of age. This, however, was exclusively
of Kannakas, but included the absent seamen, whose
families
dwelt there permanently.
The settlement at Dunks' Cove has been mentioned, and
nothing need be said of it, beyond the fact that its
agriculture
had improved and been extended, its trees had
grown, and its population increased. There was another
similar settlement at East Coveor Bay would be the
better
namewhich was at the place where Mark Woolston
had found his way out to sea, by passing through a narrow
and half-concealed inlet. This entrance to the group was
now much used by the whalers, who fell in with a great
many fish in the offing, and who found it very convenient
to tow them into this large basin, and cut them up. Thence
the blubber was sent down in lighters to Whaling Bight, to
be tryed out. This arrangement saved a tow of some
five-and-twenty
miles, and often prevented a loss of the fish, as
sometimes occurred in the outside passage, by having it
blown on an iron-bound coast. In consequence of these
uses of the place, a settlement had grown up near it, and
it already began to look like a spot to be civilized. As
yet, however, it was the least advanced of all the
settlements
in the group.
At the West Bay, there was a sort of naval station and
look-out port, to watch the people of the neighbouring
islands
.
The improvements did not amount to much,
however
,
being limited to one farm, a small battery that
commanded
the roads, and a fortified house, which was also a
tavern.
The agricultural, or strictly rural population of the
group, were seated along the different channels nearest to
the Reef. Some attention had been paid, in the choice, to
the condition of the soil; but, on the whole, few unoccupied
spots could now be found within a league of the Reef, and
on any of the principal passages that communicated with
the different islands. There were foot-paths, which might
be used by horses, leading from farm to farm, along the
margins of the channels; but the channels themselves were
the ordinary means of communicating between neighbours.
Boats of all sorts abounded, and were constantly passing
and repassing. Here, as elsewhere, the vegetation was
luxuriant and marvellous. Trees were to be seen around
the houses, that elsewhere might have required three times
the number of years that these had existed, to attain the
same height.
The visitation terminated at the Peak. This place, so
aptly likened to the garden of Eden, and frequently so
called, could receive very little addition to its picturesque
beauties from the hand of man. Parts of it were
cultivated
,
it is true; enough to supply its population (rather
more than three hundred souls) with food; but much the
greater portion of its surface was in pasture. The
buildings
were principally of stones quarried out of the cliffs,
and were cool as well as solid edifices. They were low,
however, and of no great size on the ground. At the
governor's
farm, his private property, there was a dwelling of
some pretension; low, like all the rest, but of considerable
extent. Here Bridget now passed much of her time; for
here it was thought best to keep the children. So cool and
salubrious was the air on the Peak, that two schools were
formed here; and a large portion of the children of the
colony, of a suitable age, were kept in them constantly.
The governor encouraged this plan, not only on account
of the health of the children, but because great care was
taken to teach nothing but what the children ought to
learn. The art of reading may be made an instrument of
evil, as well as of good; and if a people imbibe false
principles
if
they are taught, for instance, that this or that
religious sect should be tolerated, or the reverse, because it
was most or least in conformity with certain political
institutions
,
thus rendering an institution of God's subservient
to the institutions of men, instead of making the last
subservient
to the firstwhy, the less they know of letters, the
better. Everything false was carefully avoided, and, with
no great pretensions in the way of acquisitions, the schools
of the Peak were made to be useful, and at least innocent.
One thing the governor strictly enjoined; and that was, to
teach these young creatures that they were fallible beings,
carefully avoiding the modern fallacy of supposing that an
infallible whole could be formed of fallible parts.
Such is an outline of the condition of the colony at the
period which we have now reached. Everything appeared
to be going on well. The Henlopen arrived, discharged,
loaded, and went out again, carrying with her the last
barrel
of oil in the Bight. The whalers had a jubilee, for
their adventures made large returns; and the business was
carried on with renewed spirit. In a word, the colony had
reached a point where every interest was said to be
presperous
a
state of things with communities, as with
individuals
,
when they are, perhaps, in the greatest danger of
meeting with reverses, by means of their own abuses.
CHAPTER XI.
Cruel of heart, and strong of arm,
Proud in his sport, and keen for spoil,
He little reck'd of good or harm,
Fierce both in mirth and toil;
Yet like a dog could fawn, if need there were;
Speak mildly when he would, or look in fear.
Dana
The Buccaneer
.
After
the visitation, the governor passed a week at the
Peak, with Bridget and his children. It was the habit of
the wife to divide her time between the two dwellings;
though Mark was so necessary to her as a companion,
intellectually
,
and she was so necessary to Mark, for the
same reason, that they were never very long separated.
Bridget was all heart, and she had the sweetest temper
imaginable; two qualities that endeared her to her
husband
,
far more than her beauty. Her wishes were centred
in her little family, though her kindness and benevolence
could extend themselves to all around her. Anne she loved
as a sister and as a friend; but it would not have been
impossible for Bridget to be happy, had her fortune been
cast on the Reef, with no one else but Mark and her two
little ones.
The Peak, proper, had got to be a sort of public
promenade
for all who dwelt near it. Here the governor, in
particular
,
was much accustomed to walk, early in the day,
before the sun got to be too warm, and to look out upon
the ocean as he pondered on his several duties. The spot
had always been pleasant, on account of the beauty and
extent of the view; but a new interest was given to it since
the commencement of the whaling operations in the
neighbourhood
.
Often had Bridget and Anne gone there to see
a whale taken; it being no uncommon thing for one of the
boys to come shouting down from the Peak, with the cry
of a fisha fish! It was by no means a rare occurrence
for the shore-boats to take whales immediately beneath the
cliffs, and the vessels could frequently be seen to windward,
working up to their game. All this movement gave life
and variety to the scene, and contributed largely to the
spot's becoming a favourite place of resort. The very
morning of the day that he intended to cross over to the
Reef, on his return from the progress, the governor and
his wife ascended to the Peak just as the sun was rising.
The morning was perfectly lovely; and never had the
hearts of our married couple expanded more in love to their
fellows, or been more profoundly filled with gratitude to
God for all his goodness to them, than at that moment.
Young Mark held by his mother's hand, while the father
led his little daughter. This was the way they were
accustomed
to divide themselves in their daily excursions, it
probably
appearing to each parent that the child thus led was
a miniature image of the other. On that morning, the
governor and Bridget were talking of the bounties that
Providence
had bestowed on them, and of the numberless
delights
of their situation. Abundance reigned on every side;
in addition to the productions of the island, in themselves
so ample and generous, commerce had brought its
acquisitions
,
and, as yet, trade occupied the place a wise
discrimination
would give it. All such interests are excellent
as
incidents
in the great scheme of human happiness; but
woe betide the people among whom they get to be
principals
!
As the man who lives only to accumulate, is
certain
to have all his nobler and better feelings blunted by
the grasping of cupidity, and to lose sight of the great
objects
of his existence, so do whole communities degenerate
into masses of corruption, venality, and cupidity, when
they set up the idol of commerce to worship in lieu of the
ever-living God. So far from denoting a healthful
prosperity
,
as is too apt to be supposed, no worse signs of the
condition of a people can be given, than when all other
interests
are made to yield to those of the mere
money-getting
sort. Among our colonists, as yet, commerce
occupied
its proper place; it was only an incident in their state
of society, and it was so regarded. Men did not search
for every means of increasing it, whether its fruits were
wanted or not, or live in a constant fever about its results.
The articles brought in were all necessary to the comfort
and civilization of the settlements, and those taken away
were obtained by means of a healthful industry.
As they ascended the height, following an easy path that
led to the Summit, the governor and his wife conversed
about the late visitation, and of what each had seen that
was striking and worthy of comment. Mark had a
council
to consult, in matters of state, but most did he love to
compare opinions with the sweet matronly young creature
at his side. Bridget was so true in all her feelings, so just
in her inferences, and so kindly disposed, that a better
counsellor could not have been found at the elbow of one
intrusted with power.
I am more uneasy on the subject of religion than on
any other, observed the governor, as he helped his little
companion up a difficult part of the ascent. While out,
I took great pains to sound the people on the subject, and
I found a much greater variety of opinions, or rather of
feelings, among them than I could have believed possible,
after the quiet time we have hitherto had.
After all, religion is, and ought to be, more a matter
of feeling, than of reason, Mark.
That is true, in one sense, certainly; but, it should be
feeling subject to prudence and discretion.
Everything should be subject to those two qualities,
though so very few are. I have all along known that the
ministrations
of Mr. Hornblower were only tolerated by a good
Vol. II.  14
number of our people. You, as an Episcopalian, have not
been so much in the way of observing this; for others have
been guarded before
you;
but, my family is known not to
have been of that sect, and I have been treated more
frankly.
And you have not let me know this important fact,
Bridget! said the governor, a little reproachfully.
Why should I have added to your other cares, by
heaping this on your shoulder, dear Mark? The thing
could not easily be prevented; though I may as well tell
you, now, what cannot much longer be kept a secretthe
Henlopen will bring a Methodist and a Presbyterian
clergyman
in her, this voyage, if any be found willing to
emigrate
;
and I have heard, lately, that Friends expect a
preacher.
The law against the admission of an immigrant,
without
the consent of the governor and council, is very clear
and precise, answered the husband, looking grave.
That may be true, my love, but it would hardly do to
tell the people they are not to worship God in the manner
that may best satisfy their own consciences.
It is extraordinary that, as there is but one God, and
one Saviour, there should be more than one mode of
worshipping
them!
Not at all extraordinary, my dear Mark, when you
come to consider the great diversity of opinion which exists
among men, in other matters. But, Mr. Hornblower has a
fault, which is a very great fault, in one situated as he is,
without a competitor in the field. He lays too much stress
on his particular mission; talking too much, and preaching
too much of his apostolic authority, as a divine.
Men should never blink the truth, Bridget; and least
of all, in a matter as grave as religion.
Quite right, Mark, when it is necessary to say
anything
on the subject, at all. But, after all, the apostolic
succession is but a
means
, and if the end be attainable
without dwelling on these means, it seems to me to be
better not to conflict with the prejudices of those we wish
to influence. Remember, that there are not fifty real
Episcopalians in all this colony, where there is only one
clergyman, and he of that sect.
Very true; but, Mr. Hornblower naturally wishes to
make them all churchmen.
It really seems to me, that he ought to be content with
making them all Christians.
Perhaps he thinks the two identicalnecessary to
each other, added the governor, smiling on his charming
young wife, who, in her own person, had quietly consented
to the priestly control of her husband's clergyman, though
but half converted to the peculiar distinctions of his sect,
herself.
He should remember, more especially in his situation,
that others may not be of the same way of thinking. Very
few persons, I believe, inquire into the reasons of what they
have been taught on the subject of religion, but take things
as they find them.
And here they find an Episcopalian, and they ought to
receive him confidingly.
That might do with children, but most of our people
came here with their opinions formed. I wish Mr.
Hornblower
were less set in his opinions, for I am content to be
an Episcopalian, with you, my dear husband; certain, if the
authority be not absolutely necessary, it can, at least, do
no harm.
This ended the conversation at that time, for just then
the party reached the Peak. Little, however, did the
governor
,
or his pretty wife, imagine how much the future
was connected with the interest of which they had just
been speaking, or dream of the form in which the serpent
of old was about to visit this Eden of modern times. But
occurrences of another character almost immediately
attracted
their attention, and absorbed all the care and energy
of the colony for some time. Scarcely was the party on
the Peak, when the keen, lively eyes of the younger
Bridget
caught sight of a strange sail; and, presently, another
and another came into view. In a word, no less than three
vessels were in sight, the first that had ever been seen in
those seas, with the exception of the regular and
well-known
craft of the colony. These strangers were a ship
and two brigs; evidently vessels of some size, particularly
the first; and they were consorts, keeping in company,
and sailing in a sort of line, which would seem to denote
more of order and concert than it was usual to find among
merchantmen. They were all on a wind, standing to the
southward and eastward, and were now, when first seen,
fairly within the strait between the Peak and the group,
unquestionably in full sight of both, and distant from each
some five or six leagues. With the wind as it was, nothing
would have been easier for them all, than to fetch far
enough to windward to pass directly beneath the western
cliffs, and, consequently, directly in front of the cove.
Luckily, there were several lads on the Peak, early as
was the hour, who had ascended in quest of the berries of
certain plants that flourished there. The governor
instantly
despatched one of these lads, with a note to
Heaton
,
written in pencil, in which he desired that functionary
to send a messenger down to the cove, to prevent any of
the fishermen from going out; it being the practice of
many of the boys to fish in the shade of the cliffs, to
leeward
,
ere the sun rose high enough to make the heat
oppressive
.
Hitherto, the existence of the cove, as it was
believed, remained unknown even to the Kannakas, and a
stringent order existed, that no boat should ever enter it
so long as craft was in sight, which might have any of
those men on board it. Indeed, the whole Peak was just
as much a place of mystery, to all but the colonists, as it
was the day when Waally and his followers were driven
away by their superstitious dread.
Having taken this precaution, and kept the other lads to
send down with any farther message he might deem
necessary
,
the governor now gave all his attention to the
strangers
.
A couple of glasses were always kept on the Peak,
and the best of these was soon in his hand, and levelled at
the ship. Bridget stood at her husband's side, eager to
hear his opinion, but waiting with woman's patience for
the moment it might be given with safety. At length that
instant came, and the half-terrified wife questioned the
husband
on the subject of his discoveries.
What is it, Mark? said Bridget, almost afraid of the
answer she was so desirous of obtaining. Is it the
Rancocus
?
If the Rancocus, love, be certain she would not be
coming hither. The ship is of some size, and appears to
be armed; though I cannot make out her nation.
It is not surprising that she should be armed, Mark.
You know that the papers Captain Saunders brought us
were filled with accounts of battles fought in Europe.
It is very true that the whole world is in arms, though
that does not explain the singular appearance of these
three vessels, in this remote corner of the earth. It is
possible they may be discovery ships, for wars do not
always
put a stop to such enterprises. They appear to be
steering for the Peak, which is some proof that they do
not know of the existence of the settlements in the group.
There they might anchor; but here, they cannot without
entering the cove, of which they can know nothing.
If discovery vessels, would they not naturally come
first to the Peak, as the most striking object?
In that you are probably right, Bridget, though I think
the commodore would be apt to divide his force, having
three ships, and send one, at least, towards the group, even
if he came hither with the others. No nation but
England
,
however, would be likely to have vessels of that
character
out, in such a war, and these do not look like
English
craft, at all. Besides, we should have heard something
of such an expedition, by means of the papers, were there
one out. It would be bad enough to be visited by
explorers
;
yet, I fear these are worse than explorers.
Bridget very well understood her husband's
apprehensions
on the subject of exploring parties. As yet, the
colony had got on very well, without having the question
of nationality called into the account; but it had now
become
so far important, as, in a small way, to be a nursery
for seamen; and there was much reason to fear that the
ruthless policy of the strong would, in the event of a
discovery
,
make it share the usual fortunes of the weak. It
was on account of this dread of foreign interference, that
so much pains had been taken to conceal the history and
state of the little community, the strongest inducements
being placed before all the seamen who went to Europe, to
be discreet and silent. As for the Kannakas, they did not
know enough to be very dangerous, and could not, at all,
give any accurate idea of the position of the islands, had
14 *
they been better acquainted than they were with their
relation
to other communities, and desirous of betraying
them.
The governor now sent another note down to Heaton,
with a request that orders might be forwarded along the
cliffs, for every one to keep out of sight; as well as
directions
that care should be taken not to let any smoke even
be seen to rise from the plain. This message was speedily
followed by another, directing that all the men should be
assembled, and the usual preparations made for defence.
He also asked if it were not possible to send a whale-boat
out, by keeping immediately under the cliffs, and going
well to windward, in such a manner as to get a
communication
across to the Reef, in order to put the people
on their guard in that quarter. One or two whale-boats
were always in the cove, and there were several crews of
capital oarsmen among the people of the Peak. If such a
boat could be prepared, it was to be held in readiness, as
the governor himself might deem it expedient to cross the
strait.
All this time the strange vessels were not idle, but drew
nearer to the Peak, at a swift rate of sailing. It was not
usual for mere merchantmen to be as weatherly, or to
make as much way through the water, as did all these
craft. On account of the great elevation at which the
governor stood, they appeared small, but he was too much
accustomed to his situation not to know how to make
the necessary allowances. After examining her well,
when she was within a league of the cliffs, he came to the
opinion that the ship was a vessel of about six hundred
tons, and that she was both armed and strongly manned.
So far as he could judge, by the bird's-eye view he got, he
fancied she was even frigate-built, and had a regular
gun-deck
.
In that age such craft were very common, sloops
of war having that construction quite as often as that of
the more modern deep-waisted vessel. As for the brigs,
they were much smaller than their consort, being of less
than two hundred tons each, apparently, but also armed
and strongly manned. The armaments were now easily to
be seen, as indeed were the crews, each and all the vessels
showing a great many men aloft, to shorten sail as they
drew nearer to the island.
One thing gave the governor great satisfaction. The
strangers headed well up, as if disposed to pass to
windward
of the cliffs, from which he inferred that none on
board them knew anything of the existence or position of
the cove. So much care had been taken, indeed, to
conceal
this spot from even the Kannakas, that no great
apprehension
existed of its being known to any beyond the
circle
of the regular colonists. As the ship drew still nearer,
and came more under the cliffs, the governor was enabled
to get a better view of her construction, and of the nature
of her armament. That she was frigate-built was now
certain, and the strength of her crew became still more
evident, as the men were employed in shortening and
making sail almost immediately under his eye.
Great care was taken that no one should be visible on
the Peak. Of the whole island, that was the only spot
where there was much danger of a man's being seen from
the ocean; for the fringe of wood had been religiously
preserved all around the cliffs. But, with the exception of
the single tree already mentioned, the Peak was entirely
naked; and, in that clear atmosphere, the form of a man
might readily be distinguished even at a much greater
elevation. But the glasses were levelled at the strangers
from covers long before prepared for that purpose, and no
fear was entertained of the look-outs, who had their
instructions
,
and well understood the importance of caution.
At length, the vessels got so near, as to allow of the
glasses being pointed directly down upon the upper deck
of the ship, in particular. The strangers had a little
difficulty
in weathering the northern extremity of the island,
and they came much closer to the cliffs than they
otherwise
would, in order to do so. While endeavouring to
ascertain the country of the ship, by examining her people,
the governor fancied he saw some natives on board her.
At first, he supposed there might be Kannakas, or
Mowrees
,
among the crew; but, a better look assured him that
the Indians present were not acting in the character of
sailors at all. They appeared to be chiefs, and chiefs in
their war-dresses. This fact induced a still closer
examination
,
until the governor believed that he could trace the
person of Waally among them. The distance itself was
not such as to render it difficult to recognize a form, or a
face, when assisted by the glass; but the inverted position
of all on board the ship did make a view less certain than
might otherwise have been the case. Still the governor
grew, at each instant, more and more assured that Waally
was there, as indeed he believed his son to be, also. By
this time, one of the men who knew the chief had come
up to the Peak, with a message from Heaton, and he was
of the same opinion as the governor, after taking a good
look through the best glass. Bridget, too, had seen the
formidable Waally, and
she
gave it as her opinion that he
was certainly on board the ship. This was considered as a
most important discovery. If Waally were there, it was
for no purpose that was friendly to the colonists. The
grudge he owed the last, was enduring and deadly.
Nothing
but the strong arm of power could suppress its
outbreakings
,
or had kept him in subjection, for the last five
years. Of late, the intercourse between the two groups
had not been great; and it was now several months since
any craft had been across to Ooroony's islands, from the
Reef. There had been sufficient time, consequently, for
great events to have been planned and executed, and, yet,
that the colonists should know nothing of them.
But, it was impossible to penetrate further into this
singular mystery, so long as the strangers kept off the land.
This they did of course, the three vessels passing to
windward
of the Peak, in a line ahead, going to the southward,
and standing along the cliffs, on an easy bowline. The
governor now sent a whale-boat out of the cove, under her
sails, with orders to stand directly across to the Reef,
carrying the tidings, and bearing a letter of instructions to
Pennock and such members of the council as might be
present. The letter was short, but it rather assumed the
probability of hostilities, while it admitted that there was a
doubt of the issue. A good look-out was to be kept, at all
events, and the forces of the colony were to be assembled.
The governor promised to cross himself, as soon as the
strangers quitted the neighbourhood of the Peak.
In the mean time, Heaton mounted a horse, and kept
company with the squadron as it circled the island. From
time to time, he sent messages to the governor, in order to
let him know the movements of the strangers. While this
was going on, the men were all called in from their
several
occupations, and the prescribed arrangements were
made for defence. As a circuit of the island required
several hours, there was time for everything; and the
whale-boat was fairly out of sight from even the Peak,
when Heaton despatched a messenger to say that the
squadren had reached the southern extremity of the island,
and was standing off south-east, evidently steering towards
the volcano.
Doubts now began to be felt whether the colonists would
see anything more of the strangers. It was natural that
navigators should examine unknown islands, cursorily at
least; but it did not follow that, if trade was their object,
they should delay their voyage in order to push their
investigations
beyond a very moderate limit. Had it not been
for the undoubted presence of savages in the ship, and the
strong probability that Waally was one of them, the
governor
would now have had hopes that he had seen the
last of his visitors. Nevertheless, there was the chance
that these vessels would run down to Rancocus Island,
where not only might a landing be easily effected, but
where the mills, the brick-yards, and indeed the principal
cluster of houses, were all plainly to be seen from the offing.
No sooner was it certain, therefore, that the strangers had
stood away to the southward and eastward, than another
boat was sent across to let the millers, brickmakers,
stone-quarriers
,
and lumbermen know that they might receive
guests who would require much discretion in their
reception
.
The great policy of secrecy was obviously in serious
danger of being defeated. How the existence of the
colony
was to be concealed, should the vessels remain any
time in the group, it was not easy to see; and that
advantage
the governor and Heaton, both of whom attached the
highest importance to it, were now nearly ready to
abandon
in despair. Still, neither thought of yielding even
this policy until the last moment, and circumstances
rendered
it indispensable; for so much reflection had been
bestowed on that, as well as on every other interest of the
colony, that it was not easy to unsettle any part of their
plansin the opinion of its rulers, at least.
A sharp look-out for the squadron was kept, not only
from the Peak, but from the southern end of the cliffs, all
that day, The vessels were seen until they were quite
near to the volcano, when their sudden disappearance was
ascribed to the circumstance of their shortening sail.
Perhaps
they anchored. This could only be conjecture,
however
,
as no boat could be trusted out to watch them, near
by. Although there was no anchorage near the Peak, it
was possible for a vessel to anchor anywhere in the
vicinity
of the volcano. The island of Vulcan's Peak appears
to have been projected upwards, out of the depths of the
ocean, in one solid, perpendicular wall, leaving no shallow
water near it; but, as respects the other islands, the coast
shoaled gradually in most places; though the eastern edge
of the group was an exception to the rule. Still, vessels
could anchor in any or all the coves and roadsteads of the
group; and
there
the holding ground was unusually good,
being commonly mud and sand, and these without rocks.
The remainder of the day, and the whole of the
succeeding
night, were passed with much anxiety, by the governor
and his friends. Time was given to receive an answer to
the messages sent across to the Reef, but nothing was seen
of the strangers, when day returned. The boat that came
in from the Reef, reported that the coast was clear to the
northward. It also brought a letter, stating that notices
had been sent to all the different settlements, and that the
Anne had sailed to windward, to call in all the fishermen,
and to go off to the nearest whaling-ground, in order to
communicate the state of things in the colony to Captain
Betts and his companions, who were out. The Dragon
and the Jonas, when last heard from, were cruising only
about a hundred miles to windward of the group, and it
was thought important, on various accounts, that they
should be at once apprised of the arrival of the strangers.
The governor was perfectly satisfied with the report of
what had been done, and this so much the more because
it superseded the necessity of his quitting the Peak, just at
the moment. The elevation of the mountain was of so
much use as a look-out, that it was every way desirable to
profit by it, until the time for observing was passed, and
that for action had succeeded, in its stead. Of course,
some trusty person was kept constantly on the Peak,
looking
out for the strangers, though the day passed without
one of them being seen. Early next morning, however, a
whale-boat arrived from Rancocus, with four stout oarsmen
in it. They had left the station, after dark, and had been
pulling up against the trades most of the intervening time.
The news they brought was not only alarming, but it
occasioned
a great deal of surprise.
It seemed that the three strange vessels appeared off the
point, at Rancocus Island, early on the morning of the
preceding day. It was supposed that they had run across
from the volcano in the darkness, after having been lost
sight of from the Peak. Much prudence was observed by
the colonists, as soon as light let them into the secret of
their having such unknown neighbours. Bigelow
happening
to be there, and being now a man of a good deal of
consideration with his fellow-citizens, he assumed the
direction
of matters. All the women and children ascended
into the mountains, where secret places had long been
provided
for such an emergency, by clearing out and
rendering
two or three caves habitable, and where food and water
were at hand. Thither most of the light articles of value
were also transported. Luckily, Bigelow had caused all
the saws at the mill, to be taken down and secreted. A
saw was an article not to be replaced, short of a voyage to
Europe, even; for in that day saws were not manufactured
in America; nor, indeed, was scarcely anything else.
When he had given his directions, Bigelow went alone
to the point, to meet the strangers, who had anchored their
vessels, and had landed in considerable force. On
approaching
the place, he found about a hundred men ashore, all
well armed, and seemingly governed by a sort of military
authority. On presenting himself before this party,
Bigelow
was seized, and taken to its leader, who was a
sea-faring
man, by his appearance, of a fierce aspect and most
severe disposition. This man could speak no English.
Bigelow tried him in Spanish, but could get no answer out
of him in that tongue either; though he suspected that
what he said was understood. At length, one was brought
forward who
could
speak English, and that so well as to
leave little doubt in Bigelow's mind about the stranger's
being either an Englishman or an American.
Communications
between the parties were commenced through this
interpreter.
Bigelow was closely questioned touching the number of
people in the different islands, the number of vessels they
possessed, the present situation and employments of those
vessels, the nature of their cargoes, the places where the
property transported in the vessels was kept, and, in short,
everything that bore directly on the wealth and movable
possessions of the people. From the nature of these
questions
as well as from the appearance of the strangers,
Bigelow
had, at once, taken up the notion that they were
pirates. In the eastern seas, piracies were often
committed
on a large scale, and there was nothing violent in this
supposition. The agitated state of the world, moreover,
rendered piracies much more likely to go unpunished then
than would be the case to-day, and it was well known that
several vessels often cruised together, when engaged in
these lawless pursuits, in those distant quarters of the
world. Then the men were evidently of different races,
though Bigelow was of opinion that most of them came
from the East Indies, the coasts, or the islands. The
officers
were mostly Europeans by birth, or the descendants
of Europeans; but two-thirds of the people whom he saw
were persons of eastern extraction; some appeared to be
Lascars, and others what sailors call Chinamen.
Bigelow was very guarded in his answers; so much so,
indeed, as to give great dissatisfaction to his interrogators.
About the Peak he assumed an air of great mystery, and
said none but birds could get on it; thunder was
sometimes
heard coming out of its cliffs, but man could not get
up to see what the place contained. This account was
received with marked interest, and to Bigelow's surprise,
it did not appear to awaken the distrust he had secretly
apprehended it might. On the contrary, he was asked to
repeat his account, and all who heard it, though a good
deal embellished this time, appeared disposed to believe
what he said. Encouraged by this success, the poor
fellow
undertook to mystify a little concerning the Reef; but
here he soon found himself met with plump denials. In
order to convince him that deception would be of no use,
he was now taken a short distance and confronted with
Waally!
Bigelow no sooner saw the dark countenance of the
chief than he knew he was in bad hands. From that
moment
,
he abandoned all attempts at concealment, the
condition
of the Peak excepted, and had recourse to an
opposite
policy. He now exaggerated everything; the number
and force of the vessels, giving a long list of names that
were accurate enough, though the fact was concealed that
they mostly belonged to boats; and swelling the force of
the colony to something more than two thousand fighting
men. The piratical commander, who went by the name
of `the admiral' among his followers, was a good deal startled
by this information, appealing to Waally to know whether
it might be relied on for truth. Waally could not say
yes or no to this question. He had heard that the
colonists
were much more numerous than they were formerly;
but how many fighting men they could now muster was
more than he could say. He knew that they were
enormously
rich, and among other articles of value, possessed
materials sufficient for fitting out as many ships as they
pleased. It was this last information that had brought the
strangers to the group; for they were greatly in want of
naval stores of almost all sorts.
The admiral did not deem it necessary to push his
inquiries
any further at that moment; apparently, he did not
expect to find much at Rancocus Island, Waally having,
most probably, let him into the secret of its uses. The
houses and mills were visited and plundered; a few hogs
and one steer were shot; but luckily, most of the animals
had been driven into a retired valley. The saw-mill was
set on fire in pure wantonness, and it was burned to the
ground. A new grist-mill escaped, merely because its
position was not known. A great deal of injury was
inflicted
on the settlement merely for the love of mischief,
and a brick-kiln was actually blown up in order to enjoy
the fun of seeing the bricks scattered in the air. In short,
the place was almost destroyed in one sense, though no
Vol. II.  15
attempt was made to injure Bigelow. On the contrary, he
was scarcely watched, and it was no sooner dark than he
collected a crew, got into his own whale-boat, and came to
windward to report what was going on to the governor.
CHAPTER XII.
All gone! 'tis ours the goodly land
Look roundthe heritage behold;
Go forthupon the mountains stand;
Then, if ye can, be cold.
Sprague
.
Little
doubt remained in the mind of the governor,
after he had heard and weighed the whole of Bigelow's
story, that he had to deal with one of those piratical
squadrons
that formerly infested the eastern seas, a sort of
successor
of the old buccaneers. The men engaged in such
pursuits, were usually of different nations, and they were
always of the most desperate and ruthless characters. The
fact that Waally was with this party, indicated pretty plainly
the manner in which they had heard of the colony, and, out
of all question, that truculent chief had made his own
bargain
to come in for a share of the profits.
It was highly probable that the original object of these
freebooters had been to plunder the pearl-fishing vessels,
and, hearing at their haunts, of Betto's group, they had
found their way across to it, where, meeting with Waally,
they had been incited to their present enterprise.
Little apprehension was felt for the Peak. A vessel
might hover about it a month, and never find the cove;
and should the pirates even make the discovery, such were
the natural advantages of the islanders, that the chances
were as twenty to one, they would drive off their assailants.
Under all the circumstances, therefore, and on the most
mature reflection, the governor determined to cross over to
the Reef, and assume the charge of the defence of that
most important position. Should the Reef fall into the
hands of the enemy, it might require years to repair the
loss; or, what would be still more afflicting, the freebooters
might hold the place, and use it as a general rendezvous,
in their nefarious pursuits. Accordingly, after taking a
most tender leave of his wife and children, Governor
Woolston
left the cove, in the course of the forenoon, crossing
in a whale-boat rigged with a sail. Bridget wished greatly
to accompany her husband, but to this the latter would, on
no account, consent; for he expected serious service, and
thought it highly probable that most of the females would
have to be sent over to the Peak, for security. Finding
that her request could not be granted, and feeling fully the
propriety of her husband's decision, Mrs. Woolston so far
commanded her feelings as to set a good example to other
wives, as became her station.
When about mid-channel, the whale-boat made a sail
coming down before the wind, and apparently steering for
South Cape, as well as herself. This turned out to be the
Anne, which had gone to windward to give the alarm to
the fishermen, and was now on her return. She had
warned so many boats as to be certain they would spread
the notice, and she had spoken the Dragon, which had gone
in quest of the Jonas and the Abraham, both of which
were a few leagues to windward. Capt. Betts, however,
had come on board the Anne, and now joined his old
friend, the governor, when about four leagues from the
cape. Glad enough was Mark Woolston to meet with the
Anne, and to find so good an assistant on board her. That
schooner, which was regularly pilot-boat built, was the
fastest craft about the islands, and it was a great matter to
put head-quarters on board her. The Martha came next,
and the whale-boat was sent in to find that sloop, which
was up at the Reef, and to order her out immediately to
join the governor. Pennock was the highest in authority,
in the group, after the governor, and a letter was sent to
him, apprising him of all that was known, and exhorting
him to vigilance and activity; pointing out, somewhat in
detail, the different steps he was to take, in order that no
time might be lost. This done, the governor stood in
towards
Whaling Bight, in order to ascertain the state of
things at that point.
The alarm had been given all over the group, and when
the Anne reached her place of destination, it was
ascertained
that the men had been assembled under arms, and
every precaution taken. But Whaling Bight was the great
place of resort of the Kannakas, and there were no less
than forty of those men there at that moment, engaged in
trying out oil, or in fitting craft for the fisheries. No one
could say which side these fellows would take, should it
appear that their proper chiefs were engaged with the
strangers; though, otherwise, the colonists counted on
their assistance with a good deal of confidence. On all
ordinary occasions, a reasonably fair understanding existed
between the colonists and the Kannakas. It is true, that
the former were a little too fond of getting as much work
as possible, for rather small compensations, out of these
semi-savages; but, as articles of small intrinsic value still
went a great way in these bargains, no serious difficulty
had yet arisen out of the different transactions. Some
persons thought that the Kannakas had risen in their
demands
,
and put less value on a scrap of old iron, than had
been their original way of thinking, now that so many of
their countrymen had been back and forth a few times,
between the group and other parts of the world; a
circumstance
that was very naturally to be expected. But
the governor knew mankind too well not to understand
that all unequal associations lead to discontent. Men may
get to be so far accustomed to inferior stations, and to
their duties and feelings, as to consider their condition the
result of natural laws; but the least taste of liberty begets
a jealousy and distrust that commonly raises a barrier
between
the master and servant, that has a never-dying
tendency
to keep them more or less alienated in feeling.
When the colonists began to cast about them, and to reflect
on the chances of their being sustained by these hirelings
in the coming strife, very few of them could be sufficiently
assured that the very men who had now eaten of their
bread and salt, in some instances, for years, were to be
relied on in a crisis. Indeed, the number of these
Kannakas
was a cause of serious embarrassment with the
governor
,
when he came to reflect on his strength, and on the
means of employing it.
Fully two hundred of the savages, or semi-savages, were
at that moment either scattered about among the
farm-houses
,
or working at the different places where shipping
lay, or were out whaling to windward. Now, the whole
force of the colony, confining it to fighting-men, and
including
those who were absent, was just three hundred
and sixty-three. Of these, three hundred might, possibly,
on an emergency, be brought to act on any given point,
leaving the remainder in garrisons. But a straggling body
of a hundred and fifty of these Kannakas, left in the
settlements
,
or on the Reef, or about the crater, while the
troops were gone to meet the enemy, presented no very
pleasing picture to the mind of the governor. He saw the
necessity of collecting these men together, and of
employing
them actively in the service of the colony, as the most
effectual mode of preventing their getting within the
control
of Waally. This duty was confided to Bigelow, who
was sent to the Reef without delay, taking with him all
the Kannakas at Whaling Bight, with orders to put them
on board the shipping at the Reef  schooners, sloops,
lighters, &c., of which there were now, ordinarily, some
eight or ten to be found thereand to carry them all to
windward; using the inner channels of the group. Here
was a twenty-four hours' job, and one that would not only
keep everybody quite busy, but which might have the effect
to save all the property in the event of a visit to the Reef
by the pirates. Bigelow was to call every Kannaka he
saw to his assistance, in the hope of thus getting most of
them out of harm's way.
Notwithstanding this procedure, which denoted a wise
distrust of these Indian allies, the governor manifested a
certain degree of confidence towards a portion of them,
that was probably just as discreet in another way. A part
of the crew of every vessel, with the exception of those that
went to the Peak, was composed of Kannakas; and no less
than ten of them were habitually employed in the Anne,
which carried two whale-boats for emergencies. None of
these men were sent away, or were in any manner taken
from their customary employments. So much confidence
had the governor in his own authority, and in his power to
influence these particular individuals, that he did not
hesitate
15 *
about keeping them near himself, and, in a measure, of
entrusting the safety of his person to their care. It is true,
that the Kannakas of both the Anne and the Martha were
a sort of confidential seamen, having now been employed
in the colony several years, and got a taste for the habits
of the settlers.
When all his arrangements were made, the governor
came out of Whaling Bight in the Anne, meeting Betts in
the Martha off South Cape. Both vessels then stood down
along the shores of the group, keeping a bright look-out in
the direction of Rancocus Island, or towards the southward
and westward. Two or three smaller crafts were in
company
,
each under the direction of some one on whom
reliance
could be placed. The old Neshamony had the honour
of being thus employed, among others. The south-western
angle of the group formed a long, low point, or cape of
rock, making a very tolerable roadstead on its
north-western
side, or to leeward. This cape was known among the
colonists by the name of Rancocus
Needle
, from the
circumstance
that it pointed with mathematical precision to
the island in question. Thus, it was a practice with the
coasters to run for the extremity of this cape, and then to
stand away on a due south-west course, certain of seeing
the mountains for which they were steering in the next few
hours. Among those who plied to and fro in this manner,
were many who had no very accurate notions of navigation;
and, to them, this simple process was found to be quite
useful.
Off Rancocus Needle, the governor had appointed a
rendezvous for the whole of his little fleet. In collecting
these vessels, six in all, including four boats, his object had
not been resistance  for the armaments of the whole
amounted to but six swivels, together with a few muskets
but vigilance. He was confident that Waally would lead
his new friends up towards the Western Roads, the point
where he had made all his own attacks, and where he was
most acquainted; and the position under the Needle was
the best station for observing the approach of the strangers,
coming as they must, if they came at all, from the
south-west
.
The Anne was the first craft to arrive off the point of
the Needle, and she found the coast clear. As yet, no
signs of invaders were to be seen; and the Martha being
within a very convenient distance to the eastward, a
signal
was made to Captain Betts to stand over towards the
Peak, and have a search in that quarter. Should the
strangers
take it into their heads to beat up under the cliffs
again, and thence stretch across to the group, it would
bring them in with the land to windward of the observing
squadron, and give them an advantage the governor was
very far from wishing them to obtain. The rest of the
craft came down to the place of rendezvous, and kept
standing off and on, under short sail, close in with the
rocks, so as to keep in the smoothest of the water. Such
was the state of things when the sun went down in the
ocean.
All night the little fleet of the colonists remained in the
same uncertainty as to the movements of their suspicious
visitors. About twelve the Martha came round the Needle,
and reported the coast clear to the southward. She had
been quite to the cove, and had communicated with the
shore. Nothing had been seen of the ship and her
consorts
since the governor left, nor had any further tidings
been brought up from to leeward, since the arrival of
Bigelow
.
On receiving this information, the governor ordered
his command to run off, in diverging lines, for seven
leagues each, and then to wait for day. This was
accordingly
done; the Anne and Martha, as a matter of course,
outstripping the others. At the usual hour day re-appeared,
when the look-out aloft, on board the Anne, reported the
Martha about two leagues to the northward, the
Neshamony
about as far to the southward, though a league
farther
to windward. The other craft were known to be to
the northward of the Martha, but could not be seen. As
for the Neshamony, she was coming down with a flowing
sheet, to speak the governor.
The sun had fairly risen, when the Neshamony came down
on the Anne's weather-quarter, both craft then standing to
the northward. The Neshamony had seen nothing. The
governor now directed her commander to stand directly
down towards Rancocus Island. If she saw nothing, she
was to go in and land, in order to get the news from the
people ashore. Unless the information obtained in this
way was of a nature that demanded a different course, she
was to beat up to the volcano, reconnoitre there, their
stand across to the cove, and go in; whence she was to
sail for the Reef, unless she could hear of the governor at
some other point, when she was to make the best of her
way to
him
.
The Anne now made sail towards the Martha, which
sloop was standing to the northward, rather edging from
the group, under short canvass. No land was in sight,
though its haze could be discovered all along the eastern
board, where the group was known to lie; but neither the
Peak, nor the Volcano, nor Rancocus heights could now
be seen from the vessels. About ten the governor spoke
Captain Betts, to ask the news. The Martha had seen
nothing; and, shortly after, the three boats to the
northward
joined, and made the same report. Nothing had been
seen of the strangers, who seemed, most unaccountably, to
be suddenly lost!
This uncertainty rendered all the more reflecting
portion
of the colonists exceedingly uneasy. Should the
pirates get into the group by either of its weather channels,
they would not only find all the property and vessels that
had been taken in that direction, at their mercy, but they
would assail the settlements in their weakest parts, render
succour more difficult, and put themselves in a position
whence it would be easiest to approach or to avoid their
foes. Any one understanding the place, its facilities for
attacking, or its defences, would naturally endeavour to
enter the group as well to windward as possible; but
Waally had never attempted anything of the sort; and, as
he knew little of the inner passages, it was not probable
he had thought of suggesting a course different from his
own to his new friends. The very circumstance that he
had always approached by the same route, was against it;
for, if his sagacity had not pointed out a preferable course
for himself, it was not to be expected it would do it for
others. Still, it was not unreasonable to suppose that
practised
seamen might see the advantages which the savage
had overlooked, and a very serious apprehension arose in
the minds of the governor and Betts, in particular, touching
this point. All that could be done, however, was to
despatch
two of the boats, with orders to enter the group by
the northern road, and proceed as far as the Reef. The
third boat was left to cruise off the Needle, in order to
communicate with anything that should go to that place of
rendezvous with a report, and, at the same time, to keep a
look-out for the pirates. With the person in charge of this
boat, was left the course to be steered by those who were
to search for the governor, as they arrived off the Needle,
from time to time.
The Anne and Martha bore up, in company, as soon as
these arrangements were completed, it being the plan now
to go and look for the strangers. Once in view, the
governor
determined not to lose sight of the pirates, again,
but to remain so near them, as to make sure of knowing
what they were about. In such cases, a close look-out
should always be kept on the enemy, since an advantage
in time is gained by so doing, as well as a great deal of
uncertainty and indecision avoided.
For seven hours the Anne and Martha stood towards
Rancocus Island, running off about two leagues from each
other, thereby `spreading a clew,' as sailors call it, that
would command the view of a good bit of water. The
tops of the mountains were soon seen, and by the end of
the time mentioned, most of the lower land became visible.
Nevertheless, the strangers did not come in sight. Greatly
at a loss how to proceed, the governor now sent the Martha
down for information, with orders for her to beat up to the
Needle, as soon as she could, the Anne intending to
rendezvous
there, next morning, agreeably to previous
arrangements
.
As the Martha went off before the wind, the
Anne hauled up sharp towards the Peak, under the
impression
that something might have been seen of the
strangers from the high land there. About four in the
morning the Anne went into the cove, and the governor
ascended to the plain to have an interview with Heaton.
He found everything tranquil in that quarter. Nothing
had been seen of the strange squadron, since it went out
of sight, under the volcano; nor had even the Neshamony
come in. The governor's arrival was soon known, early as
it was, and he had visits from half the women on the island,
to inquire after their absent husbands. Each wife was told
all the governor knew, and this short intercourse relieved
the minds of a great many.
At eight, the Anne sailed again, and at ten she had the
Needle in sight, with three boats off it, on the look-out.
Here, then, were tidings at last; but, the impatience of the
governor was restrained, in order to make out the character
of a sail that had been seen coming down through the
straits, under a cloud of canvas. In a short time, this
vessel
was made out to be the Abraham, and the Anne hauled
up to get her news. The two schooners spoke each other
about twelve o'clock, but the Abraham had no intelligence
to impart. She had been sent, or rather carried by
Bigelow
,
out by the eastern passage, and had stood along the
whole of the weather-side of the group, to give notice to
the whalers where to go; and she had notified the two
brigs to go in to-windward, and to remain in Weather Bay,
where all the rest of the dull crafts had been taken for
safety; and then had come to-leeward to look for the
governor
.
As the Abraham was barely a respectable sailer,
it was not deemed prudent to take her too near the strangers;
but, she might see how matters were situated to the
eastward
.
By keeping on the weather-coast, and so near the
land as not to be cut off from it, she would be of particular
service; since no enemy could approach in that quarter,
without being seen; and Bigelow's familiarity with the
channels would enable him, not only to save his schooner
by running in, but would put it in his power to give notice
throughout the whole group, of the position and apparent
intentions of the strangers. The Abraham, accordingly,
hauled by the wind, to beat back to her station, while the
Anne kept off for the Needle.
At the rendezvous, the governor found most of his craft
waiting for him. The Neshamony was still behind; but
all the rest had executed their orders, and were standing
off and on, near the cape, ready to report. Nothing had
been seen of the strangers! It was certain they had not
approached the group, for two of the boats had just come
out of it, having left the colonists busy with the
preparations
for defence, but totally undisturbed in other respects.
This information gave the governor increased uneasiness.
His hope of hearing from the pirates, in time to be ready
to meet them, now depended on his reports from to
leeward
.
The Neshamony ought soon to be in; nor could it
be long before the Martha would return. The great source
of apprehension now came from a suspicion that some of
the Kannakas might be acting as pirates, along with Waally.
For Waally himself no great distrust was felt, since he
had never been allowed to see much of the channels of
the group; but it was very different with the sea-going
Kannakas
,
who had been employed by the colonists. Some of
these men were familiar with all the windings and turnings
of the channels, knew how much water could be taken
through a passage, and, though not absolutely safe pilots,
perhaps, were men who might enable skilful seamen to
handle their vessels with tolerable security within the
islands. Should it turn out that one or two of these
fellows
had undertaken to carry the strangers up to
windward
,
and to take them into one of the passages in that
quarter of the group, they might be down upon the
different
fortified points before they were expected, and sweep
all before them. It is true, this danger had been in a
measure
foreseen, and persons had been sent to look out for it;
but it never had appeared so formidable to the governor, as
now that he found himself completely at fault where to
look for his enemy. At length, a prospect of fresh reports
appeared. The Neshamony was seen in the southern
board, standing across from the Peak; and about the same
time, the Martha was made out in the south-western,
beating
up from Rancocus Island direct. As the first had
been ordered to land, and had also been round by the
volcano
,
the Anne hauled up for her, the governor being
impatient
to get her tidings first. In half an hour, the two
vessels were alongside of each other. But the Neshamony
had very little that was new to tell! The pirates had
remained
on the island but a short time after Bigelow and
his companions got away, doing all the damage they could,
however, in that brief space. When they left, it was night,
and nothing very certain could be told of their movements.
When last seen, however, they were on a wind, and
heading
to the southward, a little westerly; which looked like
beating up towards the volcano, the trades now blowing
due south-east. But the Neshamony had been quite round
the volcano, without obtaining a sight of the strangers.
Thence she proceeded to the Peak, where she arrived
only a few hours after the governor had sailed, going into
the cove and finding all quiet. Of course, the Martha
could have no more to say than this, if as much; and the
governor was once more left to the pain of deep suspense.
As was expected, when Betts joined, he had nothing at all
to tell. He had been ashore at Rancocus Point, heard the
complaints of the people touching their losses, but had
obtained no other tidings of the wrong-doers. Unwilling
to lose time, he staid but an hour, and had been beating
back to the rendezvous the rest of the period of his
absence
.
Was it possible that the strangers had gone back
to Betto's group, satisfied with the trifling injuries they
had inflicted? This could hardly be; yet it was not easy
to say where else they had been. After a consultation, it
was decided that the Martha should stand over in that
direction
,
in the hope that she might pick up some
intelligence
,
by meeting with fishing canoes that often came
out to a large cluster of rocks, that lay several leagues to
windward of the territories of Ooroony and Waally.
Captain
Betts had taken his leave of the governor, and had
actually got on board his own vessel, in order to make sail,
when a signal was seen flying on board one of the boats
that was kept cruising well out in the straits, intimating
that strange vessels were seen to windward. This induced
the governor to recall the Martha, and the whole of the
look-out vessels stood off into the straits.
In less than an hour, all doubts were removed. There
were the strangers, sure enough, and what was more, there
was the Abraham ahead of them, pushing for Cape South
passage, might and main; for the strangers were on her
heels, going four feet to her three. It appeared,
afterwards
,
that the pirates, on quitting Rancocus Island, had
stood off to the southward, until they reached to windward
of the volcano, passing however a good bit to leeward of
the island, on their first stretch, when, finding the Peak
just dipping, they tacked to the northward and westward,
and stood off towards the ordinary whaling-ground of the
colony, over which they swept in the expectation of
capturing
the brigs. The pirates had no occasion for oil,
which they probably would have destroyed in pure
wantonness
,
but they were much in want of naval stores,
cordage
in particular, and the whaling gear of the two brigs
would have been very acceptable to them. While running
in for the group, after an unsuccessful search, they made
the Abraham, and gave chase. That schooner steered for
the straits, in the hope of finding the governor; but was so
hard pressed by her pursuers, as to be glad to edge in for
Cape South roads, intending to enter the group, and run
for the Reef, if she could do no better.
Luckily, the discovery of the look-out boat prevented
the execution of the Abraham's project, which would have
led the pirates directly up to the capital. But, no sooner
did the governor see how things were situated, than he
boldly luffed up towards the strangers, intending to divert
them from the chase of the Abraham; or, at least, to
separate
them, in chase of himself. In this design he was
handsomely seconded by Betts, in the Martha, who hauled
his wind in the wake of the Anne, and carried everything
that would draw, in order to keep his station. This
decision
and show of spirit had its effect. The two brigs,
which were most to the southward, altered their course,
and edged away for the Anne and Martha, leaving the ship
to follow the Abraham alone. The governor was greatly
rejoiced at this, for he had a notion a vessel as large as the
strange ship would hesitate about entering the narrow
waters, on account of her draught; she being much larger
than any craft that had ever been in before, as the
Kannakas
must know, and would not fail to report to the pirates.
The governor supposed this ship to be a vessel of between
six and seven hundred tons measurement. Her armament
appeared to be twelve guns of a side, below, and some
eight or ten guns on her quarter-deck and forecastle.
This was a formidable craft in those days, making what
was called in the English service, an eight-and-twenty gun
frigate, a class of cruisers that were then found to be very
useful. It is true, that the first class modern sloop-of-war
would blow one of those little frigates out of water, being
several hundred tons larger, with armaments, crews and
spars in proportion; but an eight-and-twenty gun frigate
Vol. II.  16
offered a very formidable force to a community like that
of the crater, and no one knew it better than the governor.
The three strangers all sailed like witches. It was well
for the Abraham that she had a port so close under her
lee, or the ship would have had her, beyond the smallest
doubt. As it was she caught it, as she rounded the cape,
as close in as she could go, the frigate letting slip at her
the whole of her starboard broadside, which cut away the
schooner's gaff, jib-stay, and main-topmast, besides killing
a Kannaka, who was in the main-cross-trees at the time.
This last occurrence turned out to be fortunate, in the
main, however, since it induced all the Kannakas to
believe
that the strangers were their enemies, in particular;
else why kill one of their number, when there were just
as many colonists as Kannakas to shoot at!
As the governor expected, the ship did not venture to
follow the Abraham in. That particular passage, in fact,
was utterly unknown to Waally, and those with him, and
he could not give such an account of it as would
encourage
the admiral to stand on. Determined not to lose
time unnecessarily, the latter hauled short off shore, and
made sail in chase of the Anne and Martha, which, by
this time, were about mid-channel, heading across to the
Peak. It was not the wish of the governor, however, to
lead the strangers any nearer to the cove than was
necessary
,
and, no sooner did he see the Abraham well within
the islands, her sails concealed by the trees, of which
there was now a little forest on this part of the coast, and
the ship drawing well off the land in hot pursuit of
himself
,
than he kept away in the direction of Rancocus
Island
,
bringing the wind on his larboard quarter. The
strangers followed, and in half an hour they were all so
far to leeward of Cape South, as to remove any
apprehension
of their going in there very soon.
Thus far, the plan of the governor had succeeded to
admiration. He had his enemies in plain sight, within a
league of him, and in chase of his two fastest craft. The
best sailing of the Anne and Martha was on a wind, and,
as a matter of course, they could do better, comparatively,
in smooth water, than larger craft. No sooner, therefore,
had he got his pursuers far enough off the land, and far
enough to leeward, than the governor wore, or jibed would
be the better word, running off northwest, with the wind
on his starboard quarter. This gave the strangers a little
the advantage, in one sense, though they lost it in another.
It brought them on his weather-beam; pretty well forward
of it, too; but the Needle was directly ahead of the
schooner and sloop, and the governor foresaw that his
pursuers would have to keep off to double that, which he
was reasonably certain of reaching first.
Everything turned out as the governor anticipated. The
pirates had near a league of water more to pass over,
before
they could double the Needle, than the Anne and the
Martha had; and, though those two crafts were obliged to
haul up close to the rocks, under a distant fire from all
three of their pursuers, no harm was done, and they were
soon covered by the land, and were close-hauled in smooth
water, to leeward of the group. Twenty minutes later,
the strangers came round the cape, also, bearing up sharp,
and following their chase. This was placing the enemy
just where the colonists could have wished. They were
now to-leeward of every point in the settlements, looking
up towards the roads, which opened on the western
passage
,
or that best known to Waally, and which he would
be most likely to enter, should he attempt to pilot the
strangers in. This was getting the invaders precisely
where the governor wished them to be, if they were to
attack him at all. They could not reach the Reef in less
than twenty-four hours, with their knowledge of the
channel
;
would have to approach it in face of the heaviest and
strongest batteries, those provided for Waally; and, if
successful
in reaching the inner harbour, would enter it under
the fire of the long twelves mounted on the crater, which
was, rightly enough, deemed to be the citadel of the entire
colony, unless, indeed, the Peak might better deserve that
name.
CHAPTER XIII.
It scares the sea-birds from their nests;
They dart and wheel with deafening screams;
Now darkand now their wings and breasts
Flash back amid disastrous gleams.
O, sin! what hast thou done on this fair earth?
The world, O man! is wailing o'er thy birth.
Dana
.
It
was the policy of the colonists to lead their pursuers
directly up to the Western Roads. On the small island,
under which vessels were accustomed to anchor, was a
dwelling or two, and a battery of two gunsnine-pounders.
These guns were to command the anchorage. The island
lay directly in front of the mouth of the passage, making a
very beautiful harbour within it; though the water was so
smooth in the roads, and the last were so much the most
convenient for getting under-way in, that this more
sheltered
haven was very little used. On the present occasion,
however, all the colony craft beat up past the island, and
anchored inside of it. The crews were then landed, and
they repaired to the battery, which they found ready for
service in consequence of orders previously sent.
Here, then, was the point where hostilities would be
likely to commence, should hostilities commence at all.
One of the boats was sent across to the nearest island
inland
,
where a messenger was landed, with directions to
carry a letter to Pennock, at the Reef. This messenger
was compelled to walk about six miles, the whole distance
in a grove of young palms and bread-fruit trees; great
pains having been taken to cultivate both of these plants
throughout the group, in spots favourable to their growth.
After getting through the grove, the path came out on a
plantation, where a horse was kept for this especial object;
and here the man mounted and galloped off to the Reef,
soon finding himself amid a line of some of the most
flourishing
plantations in the colony. Fortunately, however, as
things then threatened, these plantations were not on the
main channel, but stood along the margin of a passage
which was deep enough to receive any craft that floated,
but which was a
cul-de-sac
, that could be entered only from
the eastward. Along the margin of the ship-channel, there
was not yet soil of the right quality for cultivation, though
it was slowly forming, as the sands that lay thick on the
adjacent rocks received other substances by exposure to
the atmosphere.
The Anne and her consorts had been anchored about an
hour, when the strangers hove-to in the roads, distant about
half a mile from the battery. Here they all hoisted white
flags, as if desirous of having a parley. The governor did
not well know how to act. He could not tell whether or
not it would do to trust such men; and he as little liked to
place Betts, or any other confidential friend, in their power,
as he did to place himself there. Nevertheless, prudence
required that some notice should be taken of the flag of
truce; and he determined to go off a short distance from
the shore in one of his own boats, and hoist a white flag,
which would be as much as to say that he was waiting
there to receive any communication that the strangers might
chose to send him.
It was not long after the governor's boat had reached her
station, which was fairly within the short range of the two
guns in the battery, ere a boat shoved off from the ship,
showing the white flag, too. In a few minutes, the two
boats were within the lengths of each other's oars, riding
peacefully side by side.
On board the stranger's boat, in addition to the six men
who were at the oars, were three persons in the
stern-sheets
.
One of these men, as was afterwards ascertained,
was the admiral himself; a second was an interpreter, who
spoke English with a foreign accent, but otherwise
perfectly
well; and the third was no other than Waally! The
governor thought a fierce satisfaction was gleaming in the
countenance of the savage when they met, though the
latter
said nothing. The interpreter opened the
communications
.
Is any one in that boat, demanded this person, who
is empowered to speak for the authorities ashore?
16*
There is, answered the governor, who did not deem
it wise, nevertheless, exactly to proclaim his rank. I
have full powers, being directly authorized by the
chief-magistrate
of this colony.
To what nation does your colony belong?
This was an awkward question, and one that had not
been at all anticipated, and which the governor was not
fully prepared to answer.
Before interrogatories are thus put, it might be as well
for me to know by what authority I am questioned at all,
returned Mr. Woolston. What are the vessels which
have anchored in our waters, and under what flag do they
sail?
A man-of-war never answers a hail, unless it comes
from another man-of-war, answered the interpreter,
smiling.
Do you, then, claim to be vessels of war?
If compelled to use our
force
, you will find us so.
We have not come here to answer questions, however, but
to ask them. Does your colony claim to belong to any
particular nation, or not?
We are all natives of the United States of America,
and our vessels sail under her flag.
The United States of America! repeated the
interpreter
,
with an ill-concealed expression of contempt.
There is good picking among the vessels of that nation,
as the great European belligerents well know; and while
so many are profiting by it,
we
may as well come in for our
share.
It may be necessary to remind a portion of our readers,
that this dialogue occurred more than forty years ago, and
long before the republic sent out its fleets and armies to
conquer adjacent states; when, indeed, it had scarce a
fleet and army to protect its own coasts and frontiers from
insults and depredations. It is said that when the late
Emperor of Austria, the good and kind-hearted Francis II.,
was shown the ruins of the little castle of Habsburg,
which is still to be seen crowning a low height, in the
canton of Aarraw, Switzerland, he observed, I now see
that we have not
always
been a great family. The
governor
cared very little for the fling at his native land, but
he did not relish the sneer, as it indicated the treatment
likely to be bestowed on his adopted country. Still, the
case was not to be remedied except by the use of the means
already provided, should his visitors see fit to resort to
force.
A desultory conversation now ensued, in which the
strangers pretty plainly let their designs be seen. In the
first place they demanded a surrender of all the craft
belonging
to the colony, big and little, together with all the
naval stores. This condition complied with, the strangers
intimated that it was possible their conquests would not be
pushed much further. Of provisions, they stood in need
of pork, and they understood that the colony had hogs
without number. If they would bring down to the island
a hundred fat hogs, with barrels and salt, within
twenty-four
hours, it was probable, however, no further demand
for provisions would be made. They had obtained fifty
barrels of very excellent flour at Rancocus Island, and
could not conveniently stow more than that number, in
addition to the demanded hundred barrels of pork. The
admiral also required that hostages should be sent on board
his ship, and that he should be provided with proper pilots,
in order that he, and a party of suitable size, might take
the Anne and the Martha, and go up to the town, which
he understood lay some twenty or thirty miles within the
group. Failing of an acquiescence in these terms, war,
and war of the most ruthless character, was to be
immediately
proclaimed. All attempts to obtain an
announcement
of any national character, on the part of the strangers,
was evaded; though, from the appearance of everything
he saw, the governor could not now have the smallest
doubt that he had to do with pirates.
After getting all out of the strangers that he could, and
it was but little at the best, the governor quietly, but
steadily
refused to accede to any one of the demands, and put
the issue on the appeal to force. The strangers were
obviously
disappointed at this answer, for the thoughtful,
simple manner of Mark Woolston had misled them, and
they had actually flattered themselves with obtaining all
they wanted without a struggle. At first, the anger of the
admiral threatened some treacherous violence on the spot,
but the crews of the two boats were so nearly equal, that
prudence, if not good faith, admonished him of the
necessity
of respecting the truce. The parties separated,
however
,
with denunciations, nay maledictions, on the part of
the strangers, the colonists remaining quiet in demeanor,
but firm.
The time taken for the two boats to return to their
respective
points of departure was but short; and scarcely
was that of the stranger arrived alongside of its vessel, ere
the ship fired a gun. This was the signal of war, the shot
of that first gun falling directly in the battery, where it
took off the hand of a Kannaka, besides doing some other
damage. This was not a very favourable omen, but the
governor encouraged his people, and to work both sides
went, trying who could do the other the most harm. The
cannonading was lively and well sustained, though it was
not like one of the present time, when shot are hollow, and
a gun is chambered and, not unfrequently, has a muzzle
almost as large as the open end of a flour-barrel, and a
breech as big as a hogshead. At the commencement of
this century a long twelve-pounder was considered a smart
piece, and was thought very capable of doing a good deal
of mischief. The main battery of the ship was composed
of guns of that description, while one of the brigs carried
eight nines, and the other fourteen sixes. As the ship
mounted altogether thirty, if not thirty-two, guns, this left
the governor to contend with batteries that had in them at
least twenty-six pieces, as opposed to his own two. A
couple of lively guns, nevertheless, well-served and properly
mounted, behind good earthen banks, are quite equal to
several times their number on board ship.
Notwithstanding
the success of the first shot of the pirates, this truth
soon became sufficiently apparent, and the vessels found
themselves getting the worst of it. The governor,
himself
,
or Captain Betts pointed every gun that was fired in
the battery, and they seldom failed to make their marks on
the hulls of the enemy. On the other hand, the shot of the
shipping was either buried in the mounds of the battery,
or passed over its low parapets. Not a man was hurt
ashore, at the end of an hour's struggle, with the
exception
of the Kannaka first wounded, while seven of the
pirates were actually killed, and near twenty wounded.
Had the combat continued in the manner in which it
was commenced, the result would have been a speedy and
signal triumph in favour of the colony. But, by this time,
the pirate admiral became convinced that he had gone the
wrong way to work, and that he must have recourse to
some management, in order to prevail against such
stubborn
foes. Neither of the vessels was anchored, but all
kept under way, manuvring about in front of the battery,
but one brig hauled out of the line to the northward, and
making a stretch or two clear of the line of fire, she came
down on the north end of the battery, in a position to rake
it. Now, this battery had been constructed for plain,
straightforward cannonading in front, with no embrasures
to command the roads on either flank. Curtains of earth
had been thrown up on the flanks, to protect the men, it
is true, but this passive sort of resistance could do very
little good in a protracted contest. While this particular
brig was gaining that favourable position, the ship and the
other brig fell off to leeward, and were soon at so long a
shot, as to be out of harm's way. This was throwing the
battery entirely out of the combat, as to anything
aggressive
,
and compelled a prompt decision on the part of the
colonists. No sooner did the nearest brig open her fire,
and that within short canister range, than the ship and her
consort hauled in again on the southern flank of the
battery
,
the smallest vessel leading, and feeling her way with
the lead. Perceiving the utter uselessness of remaining,
and the great danger he ran of being cut off, the governor
now commenced a retreat to his boats. This movement
was not without danger, one colonist being killed in
effecting
it, and two more of the Kannakas wounded. It
succeeded
,
notwithstanding, and the whole party got off to
the Anne and Martha.
This retreat, of course, left the island and the battery
at the mercy of the pirates. The latter landed, set fire to
the buildings, blew up the magazine, dismounted the guns,
and did all the other damage to the place that could be
accomplished in the course of a short visit. They then
went on board their vessels, again, and began to beat up
into the Western Passage, following the colonists who
preceded
them, keeping just out of gun-shot.
The Western Passage was somewhat crooked, and
different
reaches were of very frequent occurrence. This
sometimes aided a vessel in ascending, or going to
windward
,
and sometimes offered obstacles. As there were
many other passages, so many false channels, some of
which were
culs-de-sacs
, it was quite possible for one
ignorant
of the true direction to miss his way; and this
circumstance
suggested to the governor an expedient which
was highly approved of by his friend and counsellor,
captain
Betts, when it was laid before that plain, but
experienced
,
seaman. There was one false passage, about a
league within the group, which led off to the northward,
and far from all the settlements, that offered several
inducements
to enter it. In the first place, it had more of
the appearance of a main channel, at its point of junction,
than the main channel itself, and might easily be mistaken
for it; then, it turned right into the wind's eye, after
beating
up it for a league; and at the end of a long reach that
ran due-south-east, it narrowed so much as to render it
questionable whether the Anne and Martha could pass
between
the rocks, into a wide bay beyond. This bay was
the true
cul-de-sac
, having no other outlet or inlet than the
narrow pass just mentioned; though it was very large, was
dotted with islands, and reached quite to the vicinity of
Loam Island, or within a mile, or two, of the Reef.
The main question was whether the schooner and the
sloop could pass through the opening which communicated
between the reach and the bay. If not, they must
inevitably
fall into the hands of the pirates, should they enter
the false channel, and be followed in. Then, even
admitting
that the Anne and Martha got through the narrow
passage, should the pirates follow them in their boats,
there would be very little probability of their escaping;
though they might elude their pursuers for a time among
the islands. Captain Betts was of opinion that the two
vessels
could
get through, and was strongly in favour of
endeavouring to lead the enemy off the true course to the
Reef, by entangling them in this
cul-de-sac
. If nothing
but delay was gained, delay would be something. It was
always an advantage to the assailed to have time to recover
from their first alarm, and to complete their arrangements.
The governor listened to his friend's arguments with
favour
,
but he sent the Neshamony on direct to the Reef,
with a letter to Pennock, acquainting that functionary
with the state of things, the intended plan, and a request
that a twelve-pounder, that was mounted on a travelling
carriage, might be put on board the boat, and sent to a
landing, whence it might easily be dragged by hand to the
narrow passage so often mentioned. This done, he took
the way into the false channel himself.
The governor, as a matter of course, kept at a safe
distance
ahead of the pirates in the Anne and the Martha.
This he was enabled to do quite easily, since fore-and-aft
vessels make much quicker tacks than those that are
square-rigged. As respects water, there was enough of
that almost everywhere; it being rather a peculiarity of the
group, that nearly every one of its passages had good
channels
and bold shores. There was one shoal, however, and
that of some extent, in the long reach of the false channel
named; and when the governor resolved to venture in
there, it was not without the hope of leading the pirate
ship on it. The water on this shoal was about sixteen
feet deep, and there was scarce a hope of either of the
brigs fetching up on it; but, could the ship be enticed
there, and did she only strike with good way on her, and
on a falling tide, her berth might be made very
uncomfortable
.
Although this hope appeared faintly in the
background
of the governor's project, his principal expectation
was that of being able to decoy the strangers into a
cul-de-sac
,
and to embarrass them with delays and losses. As
soon as the Neshamony was out of sight, the Anne and
Martha, therefore, accompanied by the other boats, stood
into the false channel, and went off to the northward
merrily
,
with a leading wind. When the enemy reached the
point, they did not hesitate to follow, actually setting
studding
sails in their eagerness not to be left too far behind.
It is probable, that Waally was of but little service to his
allies just then, for, after all, the knowledge of that chief
was limited to a very imperfect acquaintance with such
channels as would admit of the passage of even canoes.
The distances were by no means trifling in these crooked
passages. By the true channel, it was rather more than
seven and twenty miles from the western roads to the
Reef; but, it was fully ten more by this false channel,
even deducting the half league where there was no passage
at all, or the bottom of the
bag
. Now, it required time to
beat up such a distance, and the sun was setting when the
governor reached the shoal already mentioned, about which
he kept working for some time, in the hope of enticing the
ship on it in the dark. But the pirates were too wary to
be misled, an this fashion. The light no sooner left them
than they took in all their canvas and anchored. It is
probable
,
that they believed themselves on their certain way
to the Reef, and felt indisposed to risk anything by
adventuring
in the obscurity. Both parties, consequently,
prepared to pass the night at their anchors. The Anne
and Martha were now within less than a mile of the
all-important
passage, through which they were to make their
escape, if they escaped at all. The opportunity of
ascertaining
the fact was not to be neglected, and it was no
sooner so dark as to veil his movements than the governor
went on board the Martha, which was a vessel of more
beam than the Anne, and beat her up to the rocks, in
order to make a trial of its capacity. It was just possible
to take the sloop through in several places; but, in one
spot, the rocks came too near together to admit of her
being hauled between them. The circumstances would
not allow of delay, and to work everybody went, with such
implements as offered, to pick away the rock and to open
a passage. By midnight, this was done; and the Martha
was carried through into the bay beyond. Here she stood
off a short distance and anchored. The governor went
back to his own craft and moved her about a mile, being
apprehensive of a boat attack in the darkness, should he
remain where he was. This precaution was timely, for,
in the morning, after day had dawned, no less than seven
boats were seen pulling down to the pirates, which had, no
doubt, been looking for the schooner and the sloop in vain.
The governor got great credit for this piece of
management
;
more even than might have been expected, the
vulgar
usually bestowing their applause on acts of a glittering
character, rather than on those which denote calculation
and forethought.
As the day advanced the pirates re-commenced their
operations. The delay, however, had given the colonists
a great advantage. There had been time to communicate
with the Reef, and to receive the gun sent for. It had
greatly encouraged the people up at the town, to hear that
their enemies were in the false channel; and they
redoubled
their efforts, as one multiplies his blows on a
retreating
enemy. Pennock sent the governor most
encouraging
reports, and gave him to understand that he had
ordered nearly all the men in from the out-posts, leaving
just enough to have a look-out, and to keep the Kannakas
in order. As it was now understood that the attack must
be on the capital, there was every reason for taking this
course.
All the vessels were soon under way again. The pirates
missed the Martha, which they rightly enough supposed
had gone ahead. They were evidently a good deal puzzled
about the channel, but supposed it must be somewhere to
windward. In the mean time, the governor kept the Anne
manuvring around the shoal, in the hope of luring the ship
on it. Nor was he without rational hopes of success, for
the brigs separated, one going close to each side of the
sound, to look for the outlet, while the ship kept beating
up directly in its centre, making a sinuous course towards
the schooner, which was always near the shallow water.
At length the governor was fully rewarded for his temerity;
the admiral had made a stretch that carried him laterally
past the lee side of the shoal, and when he went about, he
looked directly for the Anne, which was standing back
and forth near its weather margin. Here the governor
held on, until he had the satisfaction of seeing the ship
just verging on the weather side of the shoal, when he up
helm, and stood off to leeward, as if intending to pass out
of the
cul-de-sac
by the way he had entered, giving his
pursuers the slip. This bold manuvre took the pirate
admiral by surprise, and being in the vessel that was much
the nearest to the Anne, he up helm, and was plumped on
the shoal with strong way on him, in less than five minutes!
The instant the governor saw this, he hauled his wind and
Vol. II.  17
beat back again, passing the broadside of the ship with
perfect impunity, her people being too much occupied with
their own situation, to think of their guns, or of molesting
him.
The strange ship had run aground within half a mile of
the spot where the twelve-pounder was planted, and that
gun now opened on her with great effect. She lay
quartering
to this new enemy, and the range was no sooner
obtained, than every shot hulled her. The governor now
landed, and went to work seriously, first ordering the Anne
carried through the pass, to place her beyond the reach of
the brigs. A forge happened to be in the Anne, to make
some repairs to her iron work, and this forge, a small one
it was true, was taken ashore, and an attempt was made to
heat some shot in it. The shot had been put into the forge
an hour or two before, but a fair trial was not made until
the whole apparatus was landed. For the next hour the
efforts of both sides were unremitted. One of the brigs
went to the assistance of the admiral, while the other
endeavoured
to silence the gun, which was too securely
placed, however, to mind her broadsides. One shot hulling
her, soon drove her to leeward; after which, all the
attention
of the pirates was bestowed on their ship.
The admiral, beyond all doubt, was very awkwardly
placed. He had the whole width of the shoal to leeward
of him, could only get off by working directly in the face
of the fire, and had gone on with seven knots way on his
ship. The bottom was a soft mud; and the colonists knew
that nothing but anchors laid to windward, with a heavy
strain and a good deal of lightening, would ever take that
vessel out of her soft berth. Of this fact the pirates
themselves
soon began to be convinced, for they were seen
pumping out their water. As for the brigs, they were by
no means well handled. Instead of closing with the
battery
,
and silencing the gun, as they might have done, they
kept aloof, and even rendered less assistance to the ship
than was in their power. In point of fact, they were in
confusion, and manifested that want of order and
submission
to authority, as well as self-devotion, that would have
been shown among men in an honest service: guilt
paralyzed
their efforts, rendering them timid and distrustful.
After near two hours of cannonading, during which the
colonists had done the pirates a good deal of damage, and
the pirates literally had not injured the colonists at all, the
governor was ready with his hot shot, which he had brought
to something more than a red heat. The gun was loaded
with great care, and fired, after having been deliberately
pointed by the governor himself. The ship was hulled,
and a trifling explosion followed on board. That shot
materially added to the confusion among the pirates, and
it was immediately followed by another, which struck, also.
It was now so apparent that confusion prevailed among
the pirates, that the governor would not take the time
necessary to put in the other hot shot, but he loaded and
fired as fast as he could, in the ordinary way.
In less than a quarter of an hour after the first hot shot
was fired, smoke poured out of the admiral's main-deck
ports; and, two minutes later, it was succeeded by flames.
From that moment the result of the conflict was no
longer doubtful. The pirates, among whom great
confusion
prevailed, even previously to this disaster, now lost all
subordination, and it was soon seen that each man worked
for himself, striving to save as much as he could of his
ill-gotten
plunder. The governor understood the state of the
enemy, and, though prudence could scarcely justify his
course, he determined to press him to the utmost. The
Anne and Martha were both brought back through the
pass, and the twelve-pounder was taken on board the
former, there being room to fight it between her masts.
As soon as this was done, the two craft bore down on the
brigs, which were, by this time, a league to leeward of the
burning ship, their commanders having carried them there
to avoid the effects of the expected explosion. The admiral
and his crew saved themselves in the boats, abandoning
nearly all their property, and losing a good many men.
Indeed, when the last boat left the ship, there were several
of her people below, so far overcome by liquor, as to be
totally helpless. These men were abandoned too, as were
all the wounded, including Waally, who had lost an arm
by the fire of the battery.
Neither did the governor like the idea of passing very
near the ship, which had now been burning fully an hour.
In going to leeward, he gave her a berth, and it was well
he did, for she blew up while the Anne and Martha, as it
was, were considerably within a quarter of a mile of her.
The colonists ever afterwards considered an incident
connected
with this explosion, as a sort of Providential
manifestation
of the favour of Heaven. The Martha was nearest
to the ship, at the instant of her final disaster, and very
many fragments were thrown around her; a few even on
her decks. Among the last was a human body, which was
cast a great distance in the air, and fell, like a heavy clod,
across the gunwale of the sloop. This proved to be the
body of Waally, one of the arms having been cut away by
a shot, three hours before! Thus perished a constant and
most wily enemy of the colony, and who had, more than
once, brought it to the verge of destruction, by his cupidity
and artifices.
From this moment, the pirates thought little of anything
but of effecting their retreat, and of getting out into open
water again. The governor saw this, and pressed them
hard. The twelve-pounder opened on the nearest brig, as
soon as her shot would tell; and even the Martha's swivel
was heard, like the bark of a cur that joins in the clamour
when a strange dog is set upon by the pack of a village.
The colonists on shore flew into the settlements, to let it
be known that the enemy was retreating, when every
dwelling
poured out its inmates in pursuit. Even the females
now appeared in arms; there being no such incentive to
patriotism, on occasions of the kind, as the cry that the
battle has been won. Those whom it might have been
hard to get within the sound of a gun, a few hours before,
now became valiant, and pressed into the van, which bore
a very different aspect, before a retreating foe, from that
which it presented on their advance.
In losing Waally, the strangers lost the only person
among them who had any pretension to be thought a pilot.
He knew very little of the channels to the Reef, at the
best, though he had been there thrice; but, now he was
gone, no one left among them knew anything about them
at all. Under all the circumstances, therefore, it is not
surprising that the admiral should think more of extricating
his two brigs from the narrow waters, than of pursuing his
original plan of conquest. It was not difficult to find his
way back by the road he had come; and that road he
travelled
as fast as a leading breeze would carry him along it.
But retreat, as it now appeared, was not the only difficulty
with which this freebooter had to contend. It happened
that no kind feeling existed between the admiral and the
officers of the largest of the brigs. So far had their
animosity
extended, that the admiral had deemed it expedient
to take a large sum of money, which had fallen to the
share of the vessel in question, out of that brig, and keep
it on board the ship, as a guaranty that they would not run
away with their craft. This proceeding had not
strengthened
the bond between the parties; and nothing had kept
down the strife but the expectation of the large amount of
plunder that was to be obtained from the colony. That
hope was now disappointed; and, the whole time the two
vessels were retiring before the Anne and the Martha,
preparations were making on board one of the brigs to
reclaim this ill-gotten treasure, and on board the other to
retain it. By a species of freemasonry peculiar to their
pursuits, the respective crews were aware of each other's
designs; and when they issued nearly abreast out of the
passage, into the inner bay of the Western Roads, one
passed to the southward of the island, and the other to the
northward; the Anne and Martha keeping close in their
wakes.
As the two vessels cleared the island and got into open
water, the struggle commenced in earnest; the disaffected
brig firing into the admiral. The broadside was returned,
and the two vessels gradually neared each other, until the
canopies of smoke which accompanied their respective
movements became one. The combat now raged, and with
a savage warmth, for hours; both brigs running off the land
under short canvas. At length the firing ceased, and the
smoke so far cleared away as to enable the governor to
take a look at the damages done. In this respect, there
was little to choose; each vessel having suffered, and
seemingly
each about as much as the other. After consuming
an hour or two in repairing damages, the combat was
renewed
;
when the two colony craft, seeing no prospects of
its soon terminating, and being now several leagues to
leeward
17 *
of the group, hauled up for the roads again. The
brigs continued their fight, always running off before the
wind, and went out of sight, canopied by smoke, long after
the reports of their guns had become inaudible. This was
the last the governor ever saw or heard of these dangerous
enemies.
CHAPTER XIV.
Vox populi, vox dei
.
Venerable Axiom
.
After
this unlooked-for termination of what the
colonists
called the `Pirate-War,' the colony enjoyed a long
period of peace and prosperity. The whaling business
was carried on with great success, and many connected
with it actually got rich. Among these was the governor,
who, in addition to his other means, soon found himself in
possession of more money than he could profitably dispose
of in that young colony. By his orders, no less than one
hundred thousand dollars were invested in his name, in
the United States six per cents, his friends in America
being empowered to draw the dividends, and, after using
a due proportion in the way of commissions, to re-invest
the remainder to his credit.
Nature did quite as much as art, in bringing on the
colony; the bounty of God, as the industry of man. It is
our duty, however, to allow that the colonists did not so
regard the matter. A great change came over their
feelings
,
after the success of the `Pirate-War,' inducing them
to take a more exalted view of themselves and their
condition
than had been their wont. The ancient humility
seemed suddenly to disappear; and in its place a
vainglorious
estimate of themselves and of their prowess arose
among the people. The word people, too, was in
everybody's mouth, as if the colonists themselves had
made those lovely islands, endowed them with fertility,
and rendered them what they were now fast becoming
scenes of the most exquisite rural beauty, as well as
granaries
of abundance. By this time, the palm-tree covered
more or less of every island; and the orange, lime,
shaddock
and other similar plants, filled the air with the
fragrance
of their flowers, or rendered it bright with the
golden hues of their fruits. In short, everything adapted
to the climate was flourishing in the plantations, and plenty
reigned even in the humblest dwelling.
This was a perilous condition for the healthful humility
of human beings. Two dangers beset them; both
coloured
and magnified by a common tendency. One was
that of dropping into luxurious idlenessthe certain
precursor
,
in such a climate, of sensual indulgences; and the
other was that of waxing fat, and kicking. The
tendency
common to both, was to place self before God, and
not only to believe that they merited all they received, but
that they actually created a good share of it.
Of luxurious idleness, it was perhaps too soon to dread
its worst fruits. The men and women retained too many
of their early habits and impressions to drop easily into
such a chasm; on the contrary, they rather looked forward
to producing results greater than any which had yet
attended
their exertions. An exaggerated view of self,
however
,
and an almost total forgetfulness of God, took the
place of the colonial humility with which they had
commenced
their career in this new region. These feelings
were greatly heightened by three agents, that men
ordinarily
suppose might have a very different effectreligion,
law, and the press.
When the Rancocus returned, a few months after the
repulse of the pirates, she had on board of her some fifty
emigrants; the council still finding itself obliged to admit
the friends of families already settled in the colony, on due
application. Unhappily, among these emigrants were a
printer, a lawyer, and no less than four persons who might
be termed divines. Of the last, one was a presbyterian,
one a methodist,the third was a baptist, and the fourth a
quaker. Not long after the arrival of this importation, its
consequences became visible. The sectaries commenced
with a thousand professions of brotherly love, and a great
parade of Christian charity; indeed they pretended that
they had emigrated in order to enjoy a higher degree of
religious liberty than was now to be found in America,
where men were divided into sects, thinking more of their
distinguishing tenets than of the Being whom they
professed
to serve. Forgetting the reasons which brought
them from home, or quite possibly carrying out the
impulses
which led them to resist their former neighbours,
these men set to work, immediately, to collect followers,
and believers after their own peculiar notions. Parson
Hornblower, who had hitherto occupied the ground by
himself, but who was always a good deal inclined to what
are termed distinctive opinions, buckled on his armour,
and took the field in earnest. In order that the sheep of
one flock should not be mistaken for the sheep of another,
great care was taken to mark each and all with the brand
of sect. One clipped an ear, another smeared the wool
(or drew it over the eyes) and a third, as was the case
with Friend Stephen Dighton, the quaker, put on an entire
covering, so that his sheep might be known by their
outward
symbols, far as they could be seen. In a word, on
those remote and sweet islands, which, basking in the sun
and cooled by the trades, seemed designed by providence
to sing hymns daily and hourly to their maker's praise, the
subtleties of sectarian faith smothered that humble
submission
to the divine law by trusting solely to the
mediation
,
substituting in its place immaterial observances and
theories which were much more strenuously urged than
clearly understood. The devil, in the form of a
professor
,
once again entered Eden; and the Peak, with so
much to raise the soul above the grosser strife of men, was
soon ringing with discussions on free grace,
immersion
,
spiritual baptism, and the apostolical
succession
.
The birds sang as sweetly as ever, and their
morning and evening songs hymned the praises of their
creator as of old; but, not so was it with the morning and
evening devotions of men. These last began to pray
at
each other, and if Mr. Hornblower was an exception, it
was because his admirable liturgy did not furnish him
with the means of making these forays into the enemy's
camp.
Nor did the accession of law and intelligence help the
matter much. Shortly after the lawyer made his
appearance
,
men began to discover that they were wronged by
their neighbours, in a hundred ways which they had never
before discovered. Law, which had hitherto been used for
the purposes of justice, and of justice only, now began to
be used for those of speculation and revenge. A virtue
was found in it that had never before been suspected of
existing
in the colony; it being discovered that men could make
not only very comfortable livings, but, in some cases, get
rich, by the law; not by its practice, but by its practices.
Now came into existence an entire new class of
philanthropists
;
men who were ever ready to lend their money
to such of the needy as possessed property, taking
judgment
bonds, mortgages, and other innocent securities,
which were received because the lender always
acted on a
principle
of not lending without them, or had taken a
vow, or made their wives promises; the end of all being
a transfer of title, by which the friendly assistant
commonly
relieved his dupe of the future care of all his
property
.
The governor soon observed that one of these
philanthropists
rarely extended his saving hand, that the
borrower
did not come out as naked as the ear of the corn
that has been through the sheller, or nothing but cob; and
that, too, in a sort of patent-right time. Then there were
the labourers of the press to add to the influence of those
of religion and the law. The press took up the cause of
human rights, endeavouring to transfer the power of the
state from the public departments to its own printing-office;
and aiming at establishing all the equality that can flourish
when one man has a monopoly of the means of making
his facts to suit himself, leaving his neighbours to get along
under such circumstances as they can. But the private
advantage secured to himself by this advocate of the
rights of all, was the smallest part of the injury he did,
though his own interests were never lost sight of, and
coloured
all he did; the people were soon convinced that
they had hitherto been living under an unheard-of tyranny,
and were invoked weekly to arouse in their might, and be
true to themselves and their posterity. In the first place,
not a tenth of them had ever been consulted on the
subject
of the institutions at all, but had been compelled to
take them as they found them. Nor had the present
incumbents
of office been placed in power by a vote of a
majority, the original colonists having saved those who
came later to the island all trouble in the premises. In
these facts was an unceasing theme of declamation and
complaint to be found. It was surprising how little the
people really knew of the oppression under which they
laboured, until this stranger came amongst them to
enlighten
their understandings. Nor was it less wonderful
how many sources of wrong he exposed, that no one had
ever dreamed of having an existence. Although there was
not a tax of any sort laid in the colony, not a shilling ever
collected in the way of import duties, he boldly pronounced
the citizens of the islands to be the most overburthened
people in christendom! The taxation of England was
nothing
to it, and he did not hesitate to proclaim a general
bankruptcy as the consequence, unless some of his own
expedients were resorted to, in order to arrest the evil.
Our limits will not admit of a description of the process by
which this person demonstrated that a people who literally
contributed nothing at all, were overtaxed; but any one who
has paid attention to the opposing sides of a discussion on
such a subject, can readily imagine how easily such an
apparent
contradiction can be reconciled, and the proposition
demonstrated.
In the age of which we are writing, a majority of
mankind
fancied that a statement made in print was far more
likely to be true than one made orally. Then he who stood
up in his proper person and uttered his facts on the
responsibility
of his personal character, was far less likely to gain
credit than the anonymous scribbler, who recorded his lie
on paper, though he made his record behind a screen, and
half the time as much without personal identity as he
would be found to be without personal character, were he
actually seen and recognised. In our time, the press has
pretty effectually cured all observant persons at least of
giving faith to a statement merely because it is in print,
and has become so far alive to its own great inferiority as
publicly to talk of conventions to purify itself, and
otherwise
to do something to regain its credit; but such was
not the fact, even in America, forty years since. The
theory of an unrestrained press has fully developed itself
within the last quarter of a century, so that even the
elderly ladies, who once said with marvellous unction, It
must be true, for it 's in print, are now very apt to say,
Oh! it 's only a newspaper
account!
The foulest pool
has been furnished by a beneficent Providence with the
means of cleansing its own waters.
But the Crater Truth-Teller could utter its lies, as a
privileged publication, at the period of this narrative.
Types still had a sanctity; and it is surprising how much
they deceived, and how many were their dupes. The
journal
did not even take the ordinary pains to mystify its
readers, and to conceal its own cupidity, as are practised
in communities more advanced in civilization. We dare
say that journals
are
to be found in London and Paris, that
take just as great liberties with the fact as the Crater
Truth-Teller
;
but they treat their readers with a little more
outward
respect, however much they may mislead them with
falsehoods. Your London and Paris publics are not to be
dealt with as if composed of credulous old women, but
require
something like a plausible mystification to throw dust
in their eyes. They have a remarkable proneness to believe
that which they wish, it is true; but, beyond that weakness,
some limits are placed to their faith, and appearances must
be a good deal consulted.
But at the crater no such precaution seemed to be
necessary
.
It is true that the editor did use the pronoun
we, in speaking of himself; but he took all other
occasions
to assert his individuality, and to use his journal
diligently
in its behalf. Thus, whenever he got into the law,
his columns were devoted to publicly maintaining his own
side of the question, although such a course was not only
opposed to every man's sense of propriety, but was directly
flying into the teeth of the laws of the land; but little did
he care for that. He was a public servant, and of course
all he did was right. To be sure, other public servants
were in the same category, all they did being wrong; but
he had the means of telling his own story, and a large
number of gaping dunces were ever ready to believe him.
His manner of filling his larder is particularly worthy of
being mentioned. Quite as often as once a week, his
journal
had some such elegant article as this, viz:  Our
esteemed friend, Peter Snooks  perhaps it was Peter
Snooks,
Esquire
has just brought us a fair specimen of
his cocoa-nuts, which we do not hesitate in recommending
to the housekeepers of the crater, as among the choicest
of the group. Of course, 'Squire Snooks was grateful for
this puff, and often brought
more
cocoa-nuts. The same
great supervision was extended to the bananas, the
bread-fruit
,
the cucumbers, the melons, and even the squashes,
and always with the same results to the editorial larder.
Once, however, this worthy did get himself in a quandary
with his use of the imperial pronoun. A mate of one of
the vessels inflicted personal chastisement on him, for some
impertinent comments he saw fit to make on the honest
tar's vessel; and, this being matter of intense interest to
the public mind, he went into a detail of all the evolutions
of the combat. Other men may pull each other's noses,
and inflict kicks and blows, without the world's caring a
straw about it; but the editorial interest is too intense to
be overlooked in this manner. A bulletin of the battle
was published; the editor speaking of himself always in
the plural, out of excess of modesty, and to avoid
egotism
(!) in three columns which were all about himself,
using such expressions as these:
We
now struck
our
antagonist a blow with
our
fist, and followed this up with
a kick of
our
foot, and otherwise
we
made an assault on
him that he will have reason to remember to his dying day.
Now, these expressions, for a time, set all the old women
in the colony against the editor, until he went into an
elaborate
explanation, showing that his modesty was so
painfully
sensitive that he could not say
I
on any account,
though he occupied three more columns of his paper in
explaining the state of
our
feelings. But, at first, the cry
went forth that the battle had been of
two
against
one;
and
that
even the simple-minded colonists set down as
somewhat cowardly. So much for talking about
we
in the
bulletin of a single combat!
The political effects produced by this paper, however,
were much the most material part of its results.
Whenever
it offended and disgusted its readers by its dishonesty,
selfishness, vulgarity, and liesand it did this every week,
being a hebdomadal  it recovered the ground it had lost
by beginning to talk of `the people' and their rights. This
the colonists could not withstand. All their sympathies
were enlisted in behalf of him who thought so much of
their rights; and, at the very moment he was trampling on
these rights, to advance his own personal views, and even
treating them with contempt by uttering the trash he did,
they imagined that he and his paper in particular, and its
doctrines in general, were a sort of gift from Heaven to
form the palladium of their precious liberties!
The great theory advanced by this editorial tyro, was,
that a majority of any community had a right to do as it
pleased. The governor early saw, not only the fallacies,
but the danger of this doctrine; and he wrote several
communications
himself, in order to prove that it was false. If
true, he contended it was true altogether; and that it must
be taken, if taken as an axiom at all, with its largest
consequences
.
Now, if a majority has a right to rule, in this
arbitrary manner, it has a right to set its dogmas above the
commandments, and to legalize theft, murder, adultery,
and all the other sins denounced in the twentieth chapter
of Exodus. This was a poser to the demagogue, but he
made an effort to get rid of it, by excepting the laws of
God, which he allowed that even majorities were bound to
respect. Thereupon, the governor replied that the laws
of God were nothing but the great principles which ought
to govern human conduct, and that his concession was an
avowal that there was a power to which majorities should
defer. Now, this was just as true of minorities as it was
of majorities, and the amount of it all was that men, in
establishing governments, merely set up a standard of
principles
which they pledged themselves to respect; and that,
even in the most democratical communities, all that
majorities
could legally effect was to decide certain minor
questions
which, being necessarily referred to some tribunal
for decision, was of preference referred to them. If there
was a power superior to the will of the majority, in the
management of human affairs, then majorities were not
supreme; and it behooved the citizen to regard the last as
only what they really are, and what they were probably
Vol. II.  18
designed to betribunals subject to the control of certain
just principles.
Constitutions, or the fundamental law, the governor went
on to say, were meant to be the expression of those just
and general principles which should control human
society
,
and as such should prevail over majorities.
Constitutions
were expressly intended to defend the rights of
minorities; since without them, each question, or interest,
might be settled by the majority, as it arose. It was but a
truism to say that the oppression of the majority was the
worst sort of oppression; since the parties injured not only
endured the burthen imposed by many, but were cut off
from the sympathy of their kind, which can alleviate
much suffering, by the inherent character of the tyranny.
There was a great deal of good sense, and much truth
in what the governor wrote, on this occasion; but of what
avail could it prove with the ignorant and short-sighted,
who put more trust in one honeyed phrase of the journal,
that flourished about the `people' and their `rights,' than
in all the arguments that reason, sustained even by
revelation
,
could offer to show the fallacies and dangers of this
new doctrime. As a matter of course, the wiles of the
demagogue were not without fruits. Although every man
in the colony, either in his own person, or in that of his
parent or guardian, had directly entered into the covenants
of the fundamental law, as that law then existed, they now
began to quarrel with its provisions, and to advance
doctrines
that would subvert everything as established, in
order to put something new and untried in its place.
Progress
was the great desideratum; and
change
was the
hand-maiden of progress. A sort of `puss in the corner'
game was started, which was to enable those who had no
places to run into the seats of those who had. This is a
favourite pursuit of man, all over the world, in monarchies
as well as in democracies; for, after all that institutions
can effect, there is little change in men by putting on, or
in taking off ermine and robes, or in wearing `republican
simplicity,' in office or out of office; but the demagogue is
nothing but the courtier, pouring out his homage in the
gutters, instead of in an ante-chamber.
Nor did the governor run into extremes in his attempts
to restrain the false reasoning and exaggerations of the
demagogue and his deluded, or selfish followers. Nothing
would be easier than to demonstrate that their notions of
the rights of numbers was wrong, to demonstrate that were
their theories carried out in practice, there could be, and
would be nothing permanent or settled in human affairs;
yet not only did each lustrum, but each year, each month,
each week, each hour, each minute demand its reform.
Society must be periodically reduced to its elements, in
order to redress grievances. The governor did not deny
that men had their natural rights, at the very moment he
insisted that these rights were just as much a portion of
the minority as of the majority. He was perfectly willing
that equal laws should prevail, as equal laws did prevail in
the colony, though he was not disposed to throw
everything
into confusion merely to satisfy a theory. For a
long time, therefore, he opposed the designs of the
new-school
,
and insisted on his vested rights, as established in
the fundamental law, which had made him ruler for life.
But it is hard to kick against the pricks. Although
the claim of the governor was in every sense connected
with justice, perfectly sacred, it could not resist the throes
of cupidity, selfishness, and envy. By this time, the
newspaper
,
that palladium of liberty, had worked the minds of
the masses to a state in which the naked pretension of
possessing rights that were not common to everybody else
was, to the last degree, tolerable and not to be endured.
To such a height did the fever of liberty rise, that men
assumed a right to quarrel with the private habits of the
governor and his family, some pronouncing him proud
because
he did not neglect his teeth, as the majority did, eat
when they ate, and otherwise presumed to be of different
habits from those around him. Some even objected to
him because he spat in his pocket-handkerchief, and did
not blow his nose with his fingers.
All this time, religion was running riot, as well as
politics
.
The next-door neighbours hated each other most
sincerely, because they took different views of
regeneration
,
justification, predestination and all the other
subtleties
of doctrine. What was remarkable, they who had the
most clouded notions of such subjects were the loudest in
their denunciations. Unhappily, the Rev. Mr. Hornblower,
who had possession of the ground, took a course which had
a tendency to aggravate instead of lessening this strife
among the sects. Had he been prudent, he would have
proclaimed louder than ever Christ, and him crucified;
but, he made the capital mistake of going up and down,
crying with the mob, the church, the church! This
kept constantly before the eyes and ears of the dissenting
part of the populationdissenting from his opinions if not
from an establishmentthe very features that were the
most offensive to them. By the church they did not
understand the same divine institution as that recognised
by Mr. Hornblower himself, but surplices, and standing
up and sitting down, and gowns, and reading prayers out
of a book, and a great many other similar observances,
which were deemed by most of the people relics of the
scarlet woman. It is wonderful, about what
insignificant
matters men can quarrel, when they wish to fall out.
Perhaps religion, under these influences, had quite as
much to do with the downfall of the governor, which
shortly after occurred, as politics, and the newspaper, and
the new lawyer, all of which and whom did everything that
was in their power to destroy him.
At length, the demagogues thought they had made
sufficient
progress to spring their mine. The journal came
out with a proposal to call a convention, to alter and
improve
the fundamental law. That law contained a clause
already pointing out the mode by which amendments were
to be made in the constitution; but this mode required the
consent of the governor, of the council, and finally, of the
people. It was a slow, deliberative process, too, one by
which men had time to reflect on what they were doing,
and so far protected vested rights as to render it certain
that no very great revolution could be effected under its
shadow. Now, the disaffected aimed at revolutionat
carrying out completely the game of puss in the corner,
and it became necessary to set up some new principle by
which they could circumvent the old fundamental law.
This was very easily accomplished in the actual state of
the public mind; it was only to carry out the doctrine of
the sway of the majority to a practical result; and this was
so cleverly done as actually to put the balance of power in
the hands of the minority. There is nothing new in this,
however, as any cool-headed man may see in this
enlightened
republic of our own, daily examples in which the
majority-principle works purely for the aggrandizement
of a minority clique. It makes very little difference how
men are ruled; they will be cheated; for, failing of rogues
at head-quarters to perform that office for them, they are
quite certain to set to work to devise some means of
cheating
themselves. At the crater this last trouble was spared
them, the opposition performing that office in the following
ingenious manner.
The whole colony was divided into parishes, which
exercised
in themselves a few of the minor functions of
government
.
They had a limited legislative power, like the
American town meetings. In these parishes, laws were
passed, to require the people to vote `yes' or `no,' in order
to ascertain whether there should, or should not be, a
convention
to amend the constitution. About one-fourth of
the electors attended these primary meetings, and of the
ten meetings which were held, in six yes prevailed by
average majorities of about two votes in each parish. This
was held to be demonstration of the wishes of the majority
of the people to have a convention, though most of those
who staid away did so because they believed the whole
procedure not only illegal, but dangerous. Your hungry
demagogue, however, is not to be defeated by any scruples
so delicate. To work these
lites
of the colony went, to
organise an election for members of the convention. At
this election about a third of the electors appeared, the
candidates succeeding by handsome majorities, the rest
staying away because they believed the whole proceedings
illegal. Thus fortified by the sacred principle of the sway
of majorities, these representatives of a minority, met in
convention, and formed an entirely new fundamental law;
one, indeed, that completely subverted the old one, not
only in fact, but in theory. In order to get rid of the
governor
to a perfect certainty, for it was known that he
could still command more votes for the office than any
other man in the colony, one article provided that no
person
should hold the office of governor, either prospectively,
18 *
or perspectively, more than five years, consecutively. This
placed Mr. Mark Woolston on the shelf at the next
election
.
Two legislative bodies were formed, the old council
was annihilated, and everything was done that cunning
could devise, to cause power and influence to pass into
new hands. This was the one great object of the whole
procedure, and, of course, it was not neglected.
When the new constitution was completed, it was
referred
back to the people for approval. At this third
appeal
to the popular voice, rather less than half of all the
electors voted, the constitution being adopted by a majority
of one-third of those who did. By this simple, and exquisite
republican process, was the principle of the sway of
majorities
vindicated, a new fundamental law for the colony
provided
,
and all the old incumbents turned out of office.
`Silence gives consent,' cried the demagogues, who forgot
they had no right to put their questions!
Religion had a word to say in these changes. The
circumstance
that the governor was an Episcopalian
reconciled
many devout Christians to the palpable wrong that
was done him; and it was loudly argued that a church
government of bishops, was opposed to republicanism, and
consequently ought not to be entertained by republicans.
This charming argument, which renders religious faith
secondary to human institutions, instead of human
institutions
secondary to religions faith, thus completely putting
the cart before the horse, has survived that distant
revolution
,
and is already flourishing in more eastern climes. It
is as near an approach to an idolatrous worship of self, as
human conceit has recently tolerated.
As a matter of course, elections followed the adoption
of the new constitution. Pennock was chosen governor
for two years; the new lawyer was made judge, the editor,
secretary of state and treasurer; and other similar changes
were effected. All the Woolston connection were
completely
laid on the shelf. This was not done so much by
the electors, with whom they were still popular, as by means
of the nominating committees. These nominating
committees
were expedients devised to place the power in the
hands of a few, in a government of the many. The rule
of the majority is so very sacred a thing that it is found
necessary to regulate it by legerdemain. No good
republican
ever disputes the principle, while no sagacious one
ever submits to it. There are various modes, however, of
defeating all `sacred principles,' and this particular `sacred
principle' among the rest. The simplest is that of caucus
nominations. The process is a singular illustration of the
theory of a majority-government. Primary meetings are
called, at which no one is ever present, but the wire-pullers
and their puppets. Here very fierce conflicts occur
between
the wire-pullers themselves, and these are frequently
decided by votes as close as majorities of one, or two.
Making the whole calculation, it follows that nominations
are usually made by about a tenth, or even a twentieth of
the body of the electors; and this, too, on the supposition
that they who vote actually have opinions of their own, as
usually they have not, merely wagging their tongues as the
wires are pulled. Now, these nominations are conclusive,
when made by the ruling party, since there are no
concerted
means of opposing them. A man must have a
flagrantly
bad character not to succeed under a regular
nomination
,
or he must be too honest for the body of the electors;
one fault being quite as likely to defeat him as the other.
In this way was a great revolution effected in the colony
of the crater. At one time, the governor thought of
knocking
the whole thing in the head, by the strong arm; as he
might have done, and would have been perfectly justified
in doing. The Kannakas were now at his command, and,
in truth, a majority of the electors were with him; but
political jugglery held them in duress. A majority of the
electors of the state of New York are, at this moment,
opposed
to universal suffrage, especially as it is exercised in
the town and village governments, but moral cowardice
holds them in subjection. Afraid of their own shadows,
each politician hesitates to `bell the cat.' What is more,
the select aristocrats and monarchists are the least bold in
acting frankly, and in saying openly what they think;
leaving that office to be discharged, as it ever will be, by
the men who
true
democrats, and not canting democrats
willing to give the people just as much control as they
know how to use, or which circumstances will allow them
to use beneficially to themselves, do not hesitate to speak
with the candour and manliness of their principles. These
men call things by their right names, equally eschewing
the absurdity of believing that nature intended rulers to
descend from male to male, according to the order of
primogeniture
,
or the still greater nonsense of supposing it
necessary to obtain the most thrifty plants from the
hotbeds
of the people, that they may be transplanted into the
beds of state, reeking with the manure of the gutters.
The governor submitted to the changes, through a love
of peace, and ceased to be anything more than a private
citizen, when he had so many claims to be first, and when,
in fact, he had so long been first. No sovereign on his
throne, could write
Grati Dei
before his titles with stricter
conformity to truth, than Mark Woolston; but his right
did not preserve him from the ruthless plunder of the
demagogue
.
To his surprise, as well as to his grief,
Pennock
was seduced by ambition, and he assumed the
functions
of the executive with quite as little visible hesitation,
as the heir apparent succeeds to his father's crown.
It would be untrue to say that Mark did not feel the
change; but it is just to add that he felt more concern for
the future fate of the colony, than he did for himself or his
children. Nor, when he came to reflect on the matter, was
he so much surprised that he could be supplanted in this
way, under a system in which the sway of the majority was
so much lauded, when he did not entertain a doubt that
considerably more than half of the colony preferred the
old system to the new, and that the same proportion of the
people would rather see him in the Colony House, than to
see John Pennock in his stead. But Markwe must call
him the governor no longerhad watched the progress of
events closely, and began to comprehend them. He had
learned the great and all-important political truth, THAT
THE MORE A PEOPLE ATTEMPT TO EXTEND THEIR POWER
DIRECTLY OVER STATE AFFAIRS, THE LESS THEY, IN
FACT, CONTROL THEM, AFTER HAVING ONCE PASSED THE
POINT OF NAMING LAWGIVERS AS THEIR
REPRESENTATIVES
;
MERELY BESTOWING ON A FEW ARTFUL MANAGERS
THE INFLUENCE THEY VAINLY IMAGINE TO HAVE SECURED
TO THEMSELVES. This truth should be written in letters
of gold, at every corner of the streets and highways in a
republic; for truth it is, and truth, those who press the
foremost
on another path will the soonest discover it to be.
The mass
may
select their representatives,
may
know them,
and
may
in a good measure so far sway them, as to keep
them to their duties; but when a constituency assumes to
enact the part of executive and judiciary, they not only get
beyond their depth, but into the mire. What
can
, what
does
the best-informed layman, for instance, know of the
qualifications of this or that candidate to fill a seat on the
bench! He has to take another's judgment for his guide;
and a popular appointment of this nature, is merely
transferring
the nomination from an enlightened, and, what is
everything, a
RESPONSIBLE
authority, to one that is
unavoidably
at the mercy of second persons for its means of
judging, and is as IRRESPONSIBLE AS AIR.
At one time, Mark Woolston regretted that he had not
established an opposition paper, in order to supply an
antidote
for the bane; but reflection satisfied him it would have
been useless. Everything human follows its law, until
checked by abuses that create resistance. This is true of
the monarch, who misuses power until it becomes tyranny;
of the nobles, who combine to restrain the monarch, until
the throes of an aristocracy-ridden country proclaim that
it has merely changed places with the prince; of the people,
who wax fat and kick! Everything human is abused; and
it would seem that the only period of tolerable condition
is the transition state, when the new force is gathering to
a head, and before the storm has time to break. In the
mean time, the earth revolves, men are born, live their
time, and die; communities are formed and are dissolved;
dynasties appear and disappear; good contends with evil,
and evil still has its day; the whole, however, advancing
slowly but unerringly towards that great consummation,
which was designed from the beginning, and which is as
certain to arrive in the end, as that the sun sets at night
and rises in the morning. The supreme folly of the hour
is to imagine that perfection will come before its stated
time.
CHAPTER XV.
This is thy lesson, mighty sea!
Man calls the dimpled earth his own,
The flowery vale, the golden lea;
And on the wild gray mountain-stone
Claims nature's temple for his throne!
But where thy many voices sing
Their endless song, the deep, deep tone
Calls back his spirit's airy wing,
He shrinks into himself, when God is king!
Lunt
.
For
some months after the change of government, Mark
Woolston was occupied in attending to the arrangement
of his affairs, preparatory to an absence of some length.
Bridget had expressed a strong wish to visit America once
more, and her two eldest children were now of an age
when their education had got to be a matter of some
solicitude
.
It was the intention of their father to send them
to Pennsylvania for that purpose, when the proper time
arrived, and to place them under the care of his friends
there, who would gladly take the charge. Recent events
probably quickened this intention, both as to feeling and
time, for Mark was naturally much mortified at the turn
things had taken.
There was an obvious falling-off in the affairs of the
colony from the time it became transcendantly free. In
religion, the sects ever had fair-play, or ever since the
arrival
of the parsons, and that had been running down, from
the moment it began to run into excesses and
exaggerations
.
As soon as a man begins to
shout
in religion, he
may be pretty sure that he is hallooing before he is out
of the woods. It is true, that all our feelings exhibit
themselves, more or less, in conformity to habits and
manners
,
but there is something profane in the idea that the
spirit of God manifests its presence in yells and clamour,
even when in possession of those who have not been
trained to the more subdued deportment of reason and
propriety. The shouting and declamatory parts of religion
may be the evil spirits growling and yelling before they are
expelled, but these must not be mistaken for the voice of
the Ancient of Days.
The morals decayed as religion obtained its false
directions
.
Self-righteousness, the inseparable companion of
the quarrels of sects, took the place of humility, and thus
became prevalent that most dangerous condition of the
soul of man, when he imagines that
he
sanctifies what he
does; a frame of mind, by the way, that is by no means
strange to very many who ought to be conscious of their
unworthiness. With the morals of the colony, its
prosperity
,
even in worldly interests, began to lose ground. The
merchants, as usual, had behaved badly in the political
struggle. The intense selfishness of the caste kept them
occupied with the pursuit of gain, at the most critical
moments
of the struggle, or when their influence might have
been of use; and when the mischief was done, and they
began to feel its consequences, or, what to them was the
same thing, to fancy that the low price of oil in Europe
was owing to the change of constitution at the Crater,
they started up in convulsed and mercenary efforts to
counteract
the evil, referring all to money, and not manifesting
any particular notions of principles concerning the
manner
in which it was used. As the cooler heads of the
minorityperhaps we ought to say of the majority, for,
oddly enough, the minority now actually ruled in
Craterdom
,
by carrying out fully the principle of the sway of the
majoritybut, as the cooler heads of the colony well
understood
that nothing material was to follow from such
spasmodic and ill-directed efforts, the merchants were not
backed in their rising, and, as commonly happens with the
slave, the shaking of their chains only bound them so
much the tighter.
At length the Rancocus returned from the voyage on
which she had sailed just previously to the change in the
constitution, and her owner announced his intention to go
in her to America, the next trip, himself. His brothers,
Heaton, Anne, their children, and, finally, Captain Betts,
Friend Martha, and their issue, all, sooner or later, joined
the party; a desire to visit the low shores of the
Delaware
once more, uniting with the mortification of the
recent
changes, to induce them all to wish to see the land
of their fathers before they died. All the oil in the colony
was purchased by Woolston, at rather favourable prices,
the last quotations from abroad being low: the ex-governor
disposed of most of his movables, in order to effect so
large an operation. He also procured a glorious collection
of shells, and some other light articles of the sort, filling
the ship as full as she could be stowed. It was then that
the necessity of having a second vessel became apparent,
and Betts determined to withdraw his brig from the fishery,
and to go to America in her. The whales had been driven
off the original fishing-ground, and the pursuit was no
longer as profitable as it had been, three fish having been
taken formerly to one now; a circumstance the hierarchy
of the Crater did not fail to ascribe to the changes in the
constitution, while the journal attributed it to certain
aristocratical tendencies which, as that paper averred, had
crept into the management of the business.
The vessels were loaded, the passengers disposing of as
many of their movables as they could, and to good
advantage
,
intending to lay in fresh supplies in Philadelphia, and
using the funds thus obtained to procure a freight for the
brig. At the end of a month, both vessels were ready; the
different dwellings were transferred to new occupants,
some by lease and others by sales, and all those who
contemplated
a voyage to America were assembled at the
crater. Previously to taking leave of a place that had
become
endeared to him by so many associations and
interests
,
Mr. Woolston determined to take the Anne, hiring
her of the government for that purposeGovernor Pennock
condescendingly deciding that the public interests would
not suffer by the arrangementand going in her once more
through the colony, on a tour of private, if not of official
inspection. Bridget, Heaton, Anne, and Captain Betts,
were of the party; the children being left at the crater, in
proper custody.
The first visit was paid to Rancocus Island. Here the
damage done by the pirates had long been repaired; and
the mills, kilns and other works, were in a state of
prosperous
industry. The wild hogs and goats were now so
numerous as to be a little troublesome, particularly the
former
;
but, a good many being shot, the inhabitants did not
despair of successfully contending with them for the
possession
of the place. There were cattle, also, on this
island
;
but they were still tame, the cows giving milk, and
the oxen being used in the yoke. These were the
descendants
of the single pair Woolston had sent across, less than
twelve years before, which had increased in an arithmetical
proportion, care having been taken not to destroy any.
They now exceeded a hundred, of whom quite half were
cows; and the islanders occasionally treated themselves to
fresh beef. As cows had been brought into the colony in
every vessel that arrived, they were now in tolerably good
numbers, Mark Woolston himself disposing of no less than
six when he broke up his farming establishment for a visit
to America. There were horses, too, though not in as
great numbers as there were cows and oxen. Boats were
so much used, that roadsters were very little needed; and
this so much the less, on account of the great steadiness
of the trades. By this time, everybody understood the
last; and the different channels of the group were worked
through with almost the same facility as would have been
the case with so many highways. Nevertheless, horses
were to be found in the colony, and some of the
husbandmen
preferred them to the horned cattle in working their
lands.
A week was passed in visiting the group. Something
like a consciousness of having ill-treated Mark was to be
traced among the people; and this feeling was manifested
under a well-known law of our nature, which rendered
those the most vindictive and morose, who had acted the
worst. Those who had little more to accuse themselves
of than a compliant submission to the wrong-doing of
others, in political matters everywhere the most numerous
class of all, received their visiters well enough, and in
many instances they treated their guests with delicacy and
distinction. On the whole, however, the late governor
derived but little pleasure from the intercourse, so much
mouthing imbecility being blended with the expressions of
regret and sympathy, as to cause him to mourn over the
Vol. II.  19
compliance of his fellow-creatures, more than to rejoice at
their testimony in his own favour.
But, notwithstanding all these errors of man, nature and
time had done their work magnificently since the last
progress of Woolston among the islands. The channels
were in nearly every instance lined with trees, and the
husbandry had assumed the aspect of an advanced
civilization
.
Hedges, beautiful in their luxuriance and flowers,
divided the fields; and the buildings which contribute to
the comforts of a population were to be found on every
side. The broad plains of soft mud, by the aid of the sun,
the rains, the guano, and the plough, had now been some
years converted into meadows and arable lands; and those
which still lay remote from the peopled parts of the group,
still nine-tenths of its surface, were fast getting the
character
of rich pastures, where cattle, and horses, and hogs
were allowed to roam at pleasure. As the cock crowed
from the midst of his attendant party of hens and chickens,
the ex-governor in passing would smile sadly, his thoughts
reverting to the time when its predecessor raised its shrill
notes on the naked rocks of the Reef!
That Reef itself had undergone more changes than any
other spot in the colony, as the Peak had undergone fewer.
The town by this time contained more than two hundred
buildings, of one sort and another, and the population
exceeded
five hundred souls. This was a small population
for so many tenements: but the children, as yet, did not
bear a just proportion to the adults. The crater was the
subject of what to Mark Woolston was a most painful
lawsuit
.
From the first, he had claimed that spot as his private
property; though he had conceded its use to the public,
under a lease, since it was so well adapted, by natural
formation
,
to be a place of refuge when invasions were
apprehended
.
But the crater he had found barren, and had
rendered
fertile; the crater had even seemed to him to be an
especial gift of Providence bestowed on him in his misery;
and the crater was his by possession, as well as by other
rights, when he received strangers into his association.
None of the older inhabitants denied this claim. It is the
last comers who are ever the most anxious to dispute
ancient
rights. As they can possess none of these established
privileges themselves, they dislike that others should enjoy
them; and association places no restraints on their
cupidity
.
Pennock, once in the hands of the people, was
obliged to maintain their rights, or what some among them
chose to call their rights; and he authorized the
attorney-general
to bring an action of ejectment against the party
in possession. Some pretty hard-faced trickery was
attempted
in the way of legislation, in order to help along
the claim of the public; for, if the truth must be said, the
public is just as wont to resort to such unworthy means to
effect its purposes as private individuals, when it is deemed
necessary. But there was little fear of the people's
failing; they made the law, and they administered it,
through their agents; the power being now so completely in
their hands that it required twice the usual stock of human
virtue to be able to say them nay, as had formerly been the
case. God help the man whose rights are to be maintained
against the masses, when the immediate and dependent
nominees of those masses are to sit in judgment! If the
public, by any inadvertency, have had the weakness to
select servants that are superior to human infirmities, and
who prefer to do right rather than to do as their masters
would have them, it is a weakness that experience will be
sure to correct, and which will not be often repeated.
The trial of this cause kept the Woolstons at the crater
a week longer than they would have remained. When the
cause was submitted to the jury, Mr. Attorney-General had
a great deal to say about aristocracy and privileged orders,
as well as about the sacred rights of the people. To hear
him, one might have imagined that the Woolstons were
princes, in the full possession of their hereditary states,
and who were dangerous to the liberties of the mass,
instead
of being what they really were, citizens without one
right more than the meanest man in the colony, and with
even fewer chances of maintaining their share of these
common rights, in consequence of the prejudice, and
jealousy
,
and most of all, the
envy
, of the majority. Woolston
argued his own cause, making a clear, forcible and manly
appeal to the justice and good sense of the jury, in
vindication
of his claims; which, on every legal as well as
equitable principle, was out of all question such as every
civilized community should have maintained. But the
great and most powerful foe of justice, in cases of this
sort, is SLANG; and SLANG in this instance came very near
being too much for law. The jury were divided, ten going
for the `people,' and two for the right; one of the last
being
Bigelow, who was a fearless, independent fellow, and
cared no more for the bug-bear called the `people,' by the
slang-whangers of politics, than he did for the Emperor of
Japan.
The day after this fruitless trial, which left Mark's claim
in abeyance until the next court, a period of six months,
the intended travellers repaired on board ship, and the brig,
with her party, went to sea, under her owner, captain Betts,
who had provided himself with a good navigator in the
person of his mate. The Rancocus, however, crossed over
to the Peak, and the passengers all ascended to the plain,
to take leave of that earthly paradise. Nature had done so
much for this place, that it had been the settled policy of
Mark Woolston to suffer its native charms to be marred as
little as possible. But the Peak had ever been deemed a
sort of West-End of the Colony; and, though the
distribution
of it had been made very fairly, those who parted with
their shares receiving very ample compensations for them,
a certain distinction became attached to the residence on
the Peak. Some fancied it was on account of its climate;
some, because it was a mountain, and was more raised up
in the world than the low islands near it; some, because it
had most edible birds, and the best figs; but none of those
who now coveted residences there for their families, or the
name of residences there, would allow even to themselves,
what was the simple fact, that the place received it highest
distinction on account of the more distinguished individuals
who dwelt on it. At first, the
name
was given to several
settlements in the group, just as the Manhattanese have
their East and West Broadway; and, just for the very same
reasons that have made them so rich in Broadways, they
will have ere long, first-fifth, second-fifth, and third-fifth
avenue, unless common sense begins to resume its almost
forgotten sway among the aldermen. But this
demonstration
in the way of names, did not satisfy the
minor-majorrity
,
after they got into the ascendant; and a law was
passed authorizing a new survey, and a new subdivision
of the public lands on the Peak, among the citizens of the
colony. On some pretence of justice, that is not very
easily to be understood, those who had property there
already were not to have shares in the new lottery; a
lottery
,
by the way, in which the prizes were about twice as
large as those which had originally been distributed among
the colonists.
But, Mark and Bridget endeavoured to forget
everything
unpleasant in this visit to their much-loved home.
They regarded the place as a boon from Providence, that
demanded all their gratitude, in spite of the abuses of
which it was the subject; and never did it seem to them
more exquisitely beautiful, perhaps it never had been more
perfectly lovely, than it appeared the hour they left it.
Mark remembered it as he found it, a paradise in the
midst of the waters, wanting only in man to erect the last
great altar in his heart, in honour of its divine creator.
As yet, its beauties had not been much marred; though
the new irruption menaced them with serious injuries.
Mr. and Mrs. Woolston took leave of their friends, and
tore themselves away from the charming scenery of the
Peak, with heavy hearts. The Rancocus was waiting for
them, under the lee of the island, and everybody was soon
on board her. The sails were filled, and the ship passed
out from among the islands, by steering south, and
hauling
up between the Peak and the volcano. The latter
now seemed to be totally extinct. No more smoke arose
from it, or had indeed risen from it, for a twelvemonth. It
was an island, and in time it might become habitable, like
the others near it.
Off Cape Horn the Rancocus spoke the Dragon; Captain
Betts and his passengers being all well. The two vessels
saw no more of each other until the ship was coming out
of the Bay of Rio, as the brig was going in.
Notwithstanding
this advantage, and the general superiority of the
sailing of the Rancocus, such was the nature of the winds
that the last encountered, that when she passed Cape May
lights the brig was actually in the bay, and ahead of her;
This circumstance, however, afforded pleasure rather than
anything else, and the two vessels landed their passengers
19 *
on the wharves of Philadelphia within an hour of each
other.
Great was the commotion in the little town of Bristol at
the return of all the Woolstons, who had gone off, no one
knew exactly whither; some saying to New Holland;
others to China; and a few even to Japan. The
excitement
extended across the river to the little city of
Burlington
,
and there was danger of the whole history of the
colony's getting into the newspapers. The colonists,
however
,
were still discreet, and in a week something else
occurred to draw the attention of the multitude, and the
unexpected visit was soon regarded like any other visit.
Glad enough, notwithstanding, were the near relatives of
Bridget and Anne, in particular, to see those two fine young
women again. Neither appeared much more than a
twelvemonth
older than when she went away. This was owing
to the delicious, yet not enervating climate, in which both
had lived. They were mothers, and a little more matronly
in appearance, but none the less lovely; their children,
like themselves, were objects of great interest, in their
respective
families, and happy indeed were the households
which received them. It in no degree lessened the
satisfaction
of any of the parties, that the travellers had all
returned
much better off in their circumstances than when
they went away. Even the two younger Woolstons were
now comfortable, and early announced an intention not to
return to the islands. As for the ex-governor, he might be
said to be rich; but his heart was still in the colony, over
the weaknesses of which his spirit yearned, as the indulgent
parent feels for the failings of a backsliding child.
Nevertheless
,
Bridget was persuaded to remain with her father a
twelvemonth longer than her husband, for the health of the
old gentleman had become infirm, and he could not bear
to part with his only child so soon again, after she had
once been restored to his arms. It was, therefore, decided,
that Mr. Mark Woolston should fill the Rancocus with
such articles as were deemed the most useful to the
colony
,
and go back in that vessel, leaving his wife and
children
at Bristol, with the understanding he would return and
seek them the succeeding summer. A similar
arrangement
was made for the wife and children of Captain Betts,
Friend Martha Betts being much in the practice of
regulating
her conduct by that of Friend Bridget Woolston.
Betts sold his brig, and consented to go in the Rancocus
as a passenger, having no scruples, now he had become
comparatively wealthy, about eating with his old shipmate,
and otherwise associating with him, though it was always
as a sort of humble companion.
The Heatons determined to remain in America, for a
time at least. Mr. Heaton felt the ingratitude of the
colonists
even more keenly than his brother-in-law; for he
knew how much had been done for them, and how
completely
they had forgotten it all. Anne regretted the
Peak, and its delicious climate; but her heart was mainly
concentred in her family, and she could not be otherwise
than happy, while permitted to dwell with her husband
and children.
When the Rancocus sailed, therefore, she had no one
on board her but Mark Woolston and Betts, with the
exception
of her proper crew. Her cargo was of no great
intrinsic value, though it consisted in articles much used,
and consequently in great demand, in the colony. As the
vessel had lain some months at Philadelphia, where she
had been thoroughly repaired and new-coppered, she
sailed well, and made an excellent run to Rio, nor was
her passage bad as far as the straits of La Maire. Here
she encountered westerly gales, and the Cape may be said
to have been doubled in a tempest. After beating about
for six weeks in that stormy ocean, the ship finally got
into the Pacific, and went into Valparaiso. Here Mark
Woolston received very favourable offers for most of his
cargo, but, still feeling desirous to serve his colony, he
refused them all, setting sail for the islands as soon as he
had made a few repairs, and had a little refreshed his
crew.
The passages between Valparaiso and the Crater had
usually consumed about five weeks, though somewhat
dependent
on the state of the trades. On this occasion the
run was rather long, it having been attempted to find a
new course. Formerly, the vessels had fallen in with the
Crater, between Betto's group and the Reef, which was
bringing them somewhat to leeward, and Mr. Woolston
now thought he would try a more southern route, and see
if he could not make the Peak, which would not only
bring him to windward, but which place was certainly
giving him a more striking object to fall in with than the
lower islands of the group.
It was on the morning of one of the most brilliant days
of those seas, that Captain Saunders met the ex-governor
on the quarter-deck, as the latter appeared there for the first
time since quitting his berth, and announced that he had
just sent look-outs aloft to have a search for the land. By
his reckoning they must be within twelve leagues of the
Peak, and he was rather surprised that it was not yet
visible
from the deck. Make it they must very shortly; for
he was quite certain of his latitude, and did not believe
that he could be much out of the way, as respected his
longitude. The cross-trees were next hailed, and the inquiry
was made if the Peak could not be seen ahead. The
answer
was, that no land was in sight, in any part of the
ocean!
For several hours the ship ran down before the wind,
and the same extraordinary vacancy existed on the waters!
At length an island was seen, and the news was sent down
on deck. Towards that island the ship steered, and about
two in the afternoon, she came up close under its lee, and
backed her topsail. This island was a stranger to all on
board! The navigators were confident they must be
within a few leagues of the Peak, as well as of the
volcano
;
yet nothing could be seen of either, while here was
an unknown island in their places! This strange land
was of very small dimensions, rising out of the sea about
three hundred feet. Its extent was no great matter, half
a mile in diameter perhaps, and its form nearly circular.
A boat was lowered, and a party pulled towards it.
As Mr. Woolston approached this as yet strange spot,
something in its outlines recurred to his memory. The
boat moved a little further north, and he beheld a solitary
tree. Then a cry escaped him, and the whole of the
terrible
truth flashed on his mind. He beheld the summit
of the Peak, and the solitary tree was that which he had
himself preserved as a signal. The remainder of his
paradise
had sunk beneath the ocean!
On landing, and examining more minutely, this awful
catastrophe was fully confirmed. No part of Vulcan's
Peak remained above water but its rocky summit, and its
venerable deposit of guano. All the rest was submerged;
and when soundings were made, the plain, that spot which
had almost as much of Heaven as of earth about it,
according
to the unenlightened minds of its inhabitants, was
found to be nearly a hundred fathoms deep in the ocean!
It is scarcely possible to describe the sickening awe
which came over the party, when they had assured
themselves
of the fatal facts by further observation. Everything,
however, went to confirm the existence of the dire
catastrophe
.
These internal fires had wrought a new
convulsion
,
and the labours and hopes of years had vanished in
a moment. The crust of the earth had again been broken;
and this time it was to destroy, instead of to create. The
lead gave fearful confirmation of the nature of the disaster,
the soundings answering accurately to the known
formation
of the land in the neighbourhood of the Peak. But,
in the Peak itself, it was not possible to be mistaken:
there it was in its familiar outline, just as it had stood in
its more elevated position, when it crowned its charming
mountain, and overlooked the whole of that enchanting
plain which had so lately stretched beneath. It might be
said to resemble, in this respect, that sublime rock, which
is recognised as a part of the everlasting hills, in Cole's
series of noble landscapes that is called the March of
Empire; ever the same amid the changes of time, and
civilization, and decay, there it was the apex of the Peak;
naked, storm-beaten, and familiar to the eye, though
surrounded
no longer by the many delightful objects which
had once been seen in its neighbourhood.
Saddened, and chastened in spirit, by these proofs of
what had befallen the colony, the party returned to the
ship. That night they remained near the little islet; next
day they edged away in the direction of the place where
the volcano had formerly risen up out of the waves. After
running the proper distance, the ship was hove-to, and her
people sounded; two hundred fathoms of line were out,
but no bottom was found. Then the Rancocus bore up
for the island which had borne her own name. The spot
was ascertained, but the mountain had also sunk into the
ocean. In one place, soundings were had in ten fathoms
water, and here the vessel was anchored. Next day, when
the ship was again got under way, the anchor brought up
with it, a portion of the skeleton of a goat. It had
doubtless
fallen upon the remains of such an animal, and
hooking
it with its flukes thus unexpectedly brought once more
to the light of day, the remains of a creature that may have
been on the very summit of the island, when the
earthquake
in which it was swallowed, occurred.
The Rancocus next shaped her course in the direction
of the group. Soundings were struck near the western
roads, and it was easy enough to carry the vessel towards
what had formerly been the centre of those pleasant isles.
The lead was kept going, and a good look-out was had for
shoals; for, by this time, Mr. Woolston was satisfied that
the greatest changes had occurred at the southward, as in
the former convulsion, the group having sunk but a trifle
compared with the Peak; nevertheless, every person, as
well as thing, would seem to have been engulfed.
Towards
evening, however, as the ship was feeling her way
to windward with great caution, and when the ex-governor
believed himself to be at no great distance from the centre
of the group, the look-outs proclaimed shoal-water, and
even small breakers, about half a mile on their larboard
beam. The vessel was hove-to, and a boat went to
examine
the place, Woolston and his friend Betts going in
her.
The shoal was made by the summit of the crater;
breakers appearing in one or two places where the hill
had been highest. The boat met with no difficulty,
however
,
in passing over the spot, merely avoiding the white
water. When the lead was dropped into the centre of the
crater, it took out just twenty fathoms of line. That
distance
,
then, below the surface of the sea, had the crater,
and its town, and its people sunk! If any object had
floated, as many must have done, it had long before drifted
off in the currents of the ocean, leaving no traces behind
to mark a place that had so lately been tenanted by human
beings. The Rancocus anchored in twenty-three fathoms,
it being thought she lay nearly over the Colony House,
and for eight-and-forty hours the exploration was
continued
.
The sites of many a familiar spot were ascertained,
but nothing could be found on which even a spar might
be anchored, to buoy out a lost community.
At the end of the time mentioned, the ship bore up for
Betto's group. There young Ooroony was found,
peacefully
ruling as of old. Nothing was known of the fate of
the colonists, though surprise had been felt at not receiving
any visits from their vessels. The intercourse had not
been great of late, and most of the Kannakas had come
away. Soon after the Woolstons had left, the especial
friends of humanity, and the almost exclusive lovers of the
people having begun to oppress them by exacting more
work than was usual, and forgetting to pay for it. These
men could say but little about the condition of the colony
beyond this fact. Not only they, but all in the group,
however, could render some account of the awful
earthquake
of the last season, which, by their descriptions,
greatly exceeded in violence anything formerly known in
those regions. It was in that earthquake, doubtless, that
the colony of the crater perished to a man.
Leaving handsome and useful presents with his friend,
young Ooroony, and putting ashore two or three Kannakas
who were in the vessel, Woolston now sailed for
Valparaiso
.
Here he disposed of his cargo to great advantage,
and purchased copper in pigs at almost as great. With
this new cargo he reached Philadelphia, after an absence
of rather more than nine months.
Of the colony of the crater and its fortunes, little was
ever said among its survivors. It came into existence in
a manner that was most extraordinary, and went out of it
in one that was awful. Mark and Bridget, however,
pondered
deeply on these things; the influence of which
coloured
and chastened their future lives. The husband
often went over, in his mind, all the events connected with
his knowledge of the Reef. He would thus recall his
shipwreck
and desolate condition when suffered first to reach
the rocks; the manner in which he was the instrument in
causing vegetation to spring up in the barren places; the
earthquake, and the upheaving of the islands from out of
the waters; the arrival of his wife and other friends; the
commencement and progress of the colony; its blessings,
so long as it pursued the right, and its curses, when it
began to pursue the wrong; his departure, leaving it still
a settlement surrounded with a sort of earthly paradise,
and his return, to find all buried beneath the ocean. Of
such is the world and its much-coveted advantages. For
a time our efforts seem to create, and to adorn, and to
perfect, until we forget our origin and destination,
substituting
self for that divine hand which alone can unite the
elements of worlds as they float in gasses, equally from
His mysterious laboratory, and scatter them again into thin
air when the works of His hand cease to find favour in
His view.
Let those who would substitute the voice of the created
for that of the Creator, who shout the people, the
people
,
instead of hymning the praises of their God, who
vainly imagine that the masses are sufficient for all things,
remember their insignificance and tremble. They are but
mites amid millions of other mites, that the goodness of
providence has produced for its own wise ends; their
boasted countries, with their vaunted climates and
productions
,
have temporary possessions of but small portions
of a globe that floats, a point, in space, following the
course pointed out by an invisible finger, and which will
one day be suddenly struck out of its orbit, as it was
originally
put there, by the hand that made it. Let that
dread Being, then, be never made to act a second part in
human affairs, or the rebellious vanity of our race imagine
that either numbers, or capacity, or success, or power in
arms, is aught more than a short-lived gift of His
beneficence
,
to be resumed when His purposes are accomplished.
THE END.